This is a title, this is a paragraph. Butterfly_effect ========= The reincarnation of the villain Five times in the first chapter I was wondering how to spend my fifth life. Yes, my fifth life. I'm living the same life for the fifth time. I suffered burning, guillotine, hanging and stabbing. And all my sad endings are tied to one person, my stepmother Rachel. Today is the day Rachel's mother married my father, Duke Cecil. It was the end of my beloved heir's life. After trying everything four times, I knew I wasn't the spoiled heir I loved. You are just a tool. A tool that connects two of the continent's most powerful families. Papa didn't like me. If a more modest, beautiful, and more temperamental Rachel takes my place, so be it. Compared to Rachel I was just disappointed. A temperamental person who only knows how to spend money. Over time, it became a disgrace to the family. He would have rejected me if his pride had allowed him to do so. In my first life I was a spoiled, childish heir. I looked at Rachel with disdain, and thought she was a silly country girl with no manners. She'll never be like me, he showed me the best too. I was so childish but I was wrong I pretended to be Rachel. Contrary to my famous bad temper, Rachel had perfect manners and temperament. Rachel was beautiful, but I was a person with fun characteristics. Rachel had more talent for magic than I did. Rachel shone on all sides and I shivered in her shadow. I did not expect that. I didn't think I was about to fly in the shadows. My pride couldn't stand it. I was full of jealousy. When my fiancé also fell in love with Rachel and told my dad that he wanted to marry Rachel, that was the last straw. I am the villainous villain in every romance story. Looking back, I knew it was childish and not worth it. What I was doing was just a pathetic joke to Rachel. But do I deserve to face my death? Burning in front of everyone? Do you know the pain of the burn? Do you know how your skin and tissues look and smell like turning to ash? Do you know the frustration of knowing your life is burning up a bit? I never physically harmed anyone. It's just angry words and hysterics as every spoiled heir threw his tantrums. The worst thing I did was try to trick Maya into trying to win the duel. I was really stupid. And so I fell into the trap of one of Rachel's companions and ended my tragic life. And this endless hell began. That's when I realized I was reborn in my second life. I was full of hate and anger, I wanted revenge. So much so that my second life ended faster than my first. I learned from my last death. I was determined to avoid Rachel and her marriage streak at all costs in my third life. Rachel was like the heroine in the story. All the gods were on her side, plus a group of assailants doing what Rachel told them to do or told them to do. I have lived longer than that life. In my quest to escape Rachel at all costs, I ran away from home and ran across the ocean to a continent that hates the peoples of our own. Seven years later, I thought I could finally stop hiding in fear outside. I thought I could go home. I had planned to settle in a small villa in the countryside. I was fascinated as soon as I bought my little villa. I was told that my parents, with whom I had not been in contact in years, had plans to betray. And I must secretly help my father. As for my dear half-sister, who has been the perfect daughter of my dear father all these years, she certainly knows no such thing! It was pure as snow! She was innocent! I was told that my punishment was worse for trying to insult Queen Rachel. It also predicted the wicked stepmother who threatened Rachel. When I ran away when Rachel entered the scene I had no idea how evil my stepmother had become. I have been hanged. At the age of four I got rid of my pride. I can no longer bear this endless rebirth. I thought that if I could also die like normal people, then the torture would end. I pretended to be the best sister. Rachel was given what she wanted. I was his best friend too. Throwing myself into the process, I was a puppet doing Rachel's order. A devastated woman who left him for childhood sweetheart Rachel, it all ended when our tea party broke into a frenzy. After a while, Rachel hid behind me and stabbed me. Not expecting it, I was busy serving Rachel's tea. I couldn't even say defensive spells. Thinking of all my failed attempts to survive, I had little hope of my fifth life. Sarah then ran into the room and shouted, "They've arrived, Mrs. Odette!" I have to stop sleeping in my bed. I have to start facing my fifth life. Let this life be my last. Let's really die this time. ---------- Author's Note Hello! Thanks for reading. I hope you liked the beginning of this new story. Why did Odette reincarnate over time? Who is this Rachel? Tell me what you think! Updates happen every Tuesday and Friday. This story takes place in the same world as my other stories, but on a different continent. So, it's free! ========== Chapter Two "Odette!" Rachel said with a slight blush on her face. "Can I call you Odette? I... I guess it wouldn't make me very far. But I really wish we were closer sisters, Odette." She smiles politely with her smoky lavender eyes. Before I could say anything, Dad said, “Sure Rachel can. We are all family.” He smiled at her and looked at me purposefully. She took a sip of her tea and smiled, 'Sure, Rachel. We're all family.' Yesterday's wedding went peacefully. Rachel became the talk of the capital in her stunning red dress. She showed off her feminine look in white porcelain and lavender eyes. I wore a simple navy blue dress that I was no longer foolish enough to believe I could take her down in the same outfit I wore in my first life. Now I decided to be innocent. I no longer run, it has proven ineffective. I will never again abandon myself and my pride in pleasing Rachel, and letting her use me as a shield when danger strikes. Come to think of it, playing with rival Rachel in my second life was one of the happiest of my four lives. Maybe I should consider playing the villain again? It is better to live happily than misery if I have to repeat it over and over again. I knew it wasn't Rachel's fault, the gods had blessed her. And although in the end I got more punishment than I deserved, I was wrong. Of course I am not a well-meaning girl. I liked to compare myself to the people around me and when people were better than me, I became a bitter and angry beast. I never really appreciated what I had. Thanks for letting someone know that in my past life, I was very aware of my guilt. I have now decided to follow the flow of life. “Odette, what are you doing today? Let’s hang out together! So… you don’t mind.” Rachel smiled shyly. “I don’t know anyone here.” Odette, take Rachel with you, meet some friends, "Father's command." Hana's having a tea party tomorrow. Rachel blinked her water deer like his eyes and looked at me with silent condemnation. Everyone starts thinking with eyes that I am the one who orders my friends to do this. There is no way to avoid this. Whatever you do, two things are going to get out of this tea party. Rumors spread that I hated Rachel and that one of her attackers saved her from her humiliation. From my previous life experiences, I could still be friends with Rachel after this incident, but if she secretly hated me, so I didn't know. What should I do at this time? What if I don't bring Rachel to the tea party? At some point in my life my father forced me to take her there and after a while I agreed because I wanted to humiliate her at the party like my wicked stepmother. In another life, I felt I wouldn't be ashamed if I didn't set the scene on fire. Not at all you know better now. There were some important events that had to happen anyway. They were like the foundation of a building. Like a tea party, where Rachel must be humiliated and meet one of her companions. Wait... Sweetheart? Think about it, all those cornerstones were Rachel and her thieves in one way or another. can i change it? What if Rachel can't meet her first tea party partner? Son of the Duke's first suitor, Lord Hank. This duke was a powerful priest serving the God of Thunder. In our country there were different temples serving different deities. Every noble family had a deity to serve. Nobles send their children to temples to study. The chosen lineage will become a priest or priest of this temple. The process of selecting priests and priests usually involves fighting each other with their magic. The peoples of our continent, unlike the peoples who live across the ocean continent, can practice sorcery or sorcery, which becomes more distinguished after learning in the temple. Most of the power in our country is divided between priests and priests of various temples. That is why wealthy people always send their children to temples in the hope that their children will become priests or priests. If he came to power, his family would also become powerful. My family once had hope, but unfortunately, I wasn't particularly gifted at magic. That is why he turned to the most talented Rachel, even though they were not from the family by blood. Back to Lord Hank. He was engaged to Mrs. Florence from a young age and word was that they were really well. But he fell in love with Rachel at first sight. Lady Florence is one of the candidates for the priesthood by her master. On the day of the last choice in my past life, she receives a letter from Hank regarding the termination of her engagement. This affected her greatly, and she was injured in the process and lost the match. She became a priestess second only to her opponent, but after that match her face burned. It really is a tragedy. What if Hank never met Rachel at the tea party? Then, a few days later, Florence did not hesitate to choose her. Their participation ends one way or the other. Hank sooner or later meets Rachel and falls in love with her. But what if you delay their meeting until Florence's election is over? It's not really worth losing your place and face to some jerk. But how do we prevent this tea party from happening? ---------- AUTHOR'S NOTE SECOND ========== Chapter 2! We have more information about which country Odette lives in! And of course Odette's stepmother Rachel. What is Odate Scheme? Odette has outlived all those lives. These lives are really his past, but to others it's like a reset. Hope this is understood! Thank you for reading this story. Tell me what you think! I hope you like it! ========== Chapter Three "Lady Odette, where are you going?" Seeing me climb out the window, my maid freaked out. "Hush!" I cast a spell to prevent Sarah from seeing Sarah flee the house in the middle of the night. Sarah wanted to speak again, but found that she could not speak. He looked at me unacceptably and said, "Lady Odette! It's almost midnight!" "Yes I know. That's why I chose to sneak in now!" I rolled my eyes and a drowsy spell went off before Sarah began to sink into me. Sarah fell to the ground. "Good night! See you tomorrow!" I walked out of my bedroom window and jumped down. When I jumped, I cast a simple wind spell to control my descent. The god my family served was the Wind God. When I was ten years old, I was sent to Pawan Mandir. My father expected me to I hold at least one priestly position, not a high position, only a low one. But I could not do that either. I could master simple spells related to the wind, but more complex and advanced spells? I could not master them as my father and teachers wanted. But a simple gust of wind was Enough to plan my escape. To avoid going to the tea party, I had to make a potion. A medicine that makes me think I have the flu. A disease that doctors can't understand. I'm a fake. Why do I know the Dark Lord's arts? From my second life I really turned into a villain. Do you think I used it on Rachel? Not at all, because of someone's laziness, I had to work as a priest of darkness. I remember the ingredients for that potion and because I made over twenty of them at the time. I pulled the blanket over my head to make sure it covered my face and quickly went into the woods near my property. Medicines are just simple herbs. I have to find them in the woods. After a few hours, I finally gathered all the ingredients I needed. Stretching out my narrow limbs, I saw a crow sitting next to me on a tree branch. As soon as he saw me, he bowed his head and roared. Then he flapped his wings and flew away. As it flew in front of me, a black wing of a crow flew up and landed next to my leg. I picked it up. Under the moonlight, there seemed to be a little gold in the shimmering feather. "It can't be... No it can't be." I laughed dryly. Although I could no longer believe that the crow was really that crow, I kept the feather in my pocket. "Just in case. Just in case." I patted my pocket for good measure. ------------------- “Odette, Sarah said you got sick,” my father looked me in the eye suspiciously. When I was younger I tried to pretend to be sick a few times. The old days when I was still naive and young. My dad was thinking I might get sick so I wouldn't have to bring Rachel to the tea party. Surprisingly my dad is absolutely right this time, but unfortunately he won't be able to reveal the truth. "Dad, I'm not feeling well. I might need a doctor." I sneezed. "Please tell Rachel I can't bring her to the tea party, I'm sorry." I coughed again. And an invitation.. bring the invitation to me, Sarah! Please don't I hold Rachel, maybe Rachel will go away on her own. Rachel will be very disappointed. "I wiped small tears from my eyes. At that moment the door opened and Rachel came in." Odette, how do you feel? You feel feverish! Oh dear, dear. How are you, my dear Odette? Rachel cried anxiously, her lavender eyes starting to fade. Just as she imagined. Rachel must run to see me. It is true that your enemy may be you know. Rachel, I'm sorry. It's an invitation, it looks like you should go on your own. It is a matter of great pity. I thought I might go with you to the first tea party. "I sighed and wiped my eyes with a handkerchief. Don't run. I'm sorry you're suffering now. Tears started to fall from Rachel's eyes. By saying this he squeezed my hand." Rachel... So much. I knew how to act like adorable and beautiful sisters. Which would make my dad very happy. When that's true, I just want to snow. Can you believe you have deep feelings for someone you've only known for a day?" Rachel, don't let me stop you. It's tea party time, get ready!" I waved my handkerchief for the door. Father nodded at Rachel. "You heard what your sister said. Get ready." Fighting the will to direct my eyes to this offer of a father's love, Rachel waited for her to decline. Heartbroken when she went out to play, Rachel did not leave her sick sister alone in her sick bed. "No. I'm not going!" Rachel cried. "How can I leave my sister here alone when I'm enjoying myself? I can't forgive myself! I'll be here and take care of Odette!" "As expected of a Hera's daughter," said the father, with a look of approval on his face. "Odette, learn something from your sister. Get some rest." Then he left the room. As expected of my father. I came here, from now on we will always compare. Although Rachel shines through to the end, I will always be incompetent by comparison. "Odette, would you like a cup of hot tea?" Rachel smiled sweetly. "That would be awesome." I smiled again. Now I had to keep Rachel at home until Mrs. Florence made her final choice. You may have to wait a little longer for Lord Hank to meet his true love. I smiled while sipping tea. ---------------------- Author's Note A small joke from Odette; P Hope you enjoy reading this ======== ===== Let's see you again! ========== CHAPTER 4 An invitation to a festive party was sent to Mrs. Florence a week later to our property. The father thought this would be a good opportunity for Rachel to enter society. When I was now recovering from a severe cold, he insisted on bringing Rachel with him. I have received such cruelty to Mrs. Florence. Will Lord Hank fall in love with Rachel at his own party? But I couldn't pretend to be sick again, could I? Then the idea itself was getting old. Another problem was the crow's feathers that she had brought from the forest when she was flying under the sun, shimmering golden. This means that the crow you met that night was actually the same crow. Why was this crow so far from home? He must be as lazy as his master. I shouldn't care, we don't know each other in this life. That's right, I have to pretend I've never seen this crow before. I want to burn wings. Sarah came into my room, "Looks like Mrs. Rachel was robbed in the street!" My thoughts calmed when I screamed excitedly. "What? Where are the servants?" It certainly hadn't happened in any previous life. What if they think it's my job again? “Mrs. Rachel saw some orphans in the street, so he bought bread with money from his wallet and ordered his maid and his guard to hand them over. She was handing out the money when I was robbed!” “I’ll see.” I rubbed my fingers in my temple. It's definitely something Rachel does, it's a miracle she doesn't get robbed too often.” “Does he get hurt?” “Not at all! Here comes the most exciting part, Lord Hank saved her! Mrs. Rachel was clearly shocked and terrified, so Lord Hank saved her! He was still in The drawing room!” Sarah looked at me anxiously and a chuckle fell into my throat. I was very worried that the two here would spoil the celebration of Mrs. Florence. On the first day Rachel was given the property. Let me spoil the celebration for Mrs. Florence. Outside, he immediately hit Lord Hank. Really inevitable. Perhaps in a moment there will be talk of how she hired thieves to frighten poor Rachel. I decided to stop caring now. Let the words spread. But in this life, she finally changed the fate of Lady Florence, so as not to waste her time with this capricious fiancé. I didn't want another stupid girl to become an evil villain because her fiancé cheated on her like I was in my first life. It's not worth it. If I can save them because I know where everything is going, why not? That night Rachel came into my room and told me about her big adventure today. When he mentioned Lord Hank, so his face lit up and he waved his hand excitedly and told how brave Lord Hank was. Young woman pretending to love someone for the first time. This is Rachel. In each marriage, she acted as she liked or loved him. This blush in her lavender eyes every time and a look of admiration and adoration. As I pretended to be her best sister in my previous life, I asked her if every friend should suggest who she should choose. She couldn't choose. Sometimes I wonder if she really loves any of them or is she really incapable of love. "Odette, I think I should thank Lord Hank. He's a gentleman. He knew I was nervous, and he brought me back! You didn't see how brave he was!" I feel very safe. Hug her! "All I can do is put a fake smile on my face." Do you know what kind of gift she might like? 'I'm not sure, I'm not really familiar with it, I'm sorry, Rachel,' she smiled apologetically 'How about if I baked some cookies?' Do you think he will like them? "I have no doubt that he will love what you do. I muttered to myself." Your gratitude is what counts, "Another happy fake smile." I'll go find one. A recipe Lord Hank said would appear around town tomorrow. It really makes him happy, doesn't he? "" naturally. 'So, did Lord Hank not stop for a moment to think of his betrothal and go on making the appointment?' After Rachel left my room, I wrote a handwritten note to Mrs. Florence so that she would not recognize me. I crept again that night, when I arrived at Lady Florence's house, and realized a problem. Great. How can I send this note to Florence without waking anyone? Now I miss Isobel, I kept my cat familiar in my second life. If Isobel had been here, a note could have been sent easily. In my third and fourth life I thought of raising Isobel again, but decided to turn it down I couldn't separate the things I loved so much and couldn't remember when I had to start over. I only remember past memories, but not one of them. They are no longer the people I met in my past life. Besides the fact that I would not cross Isobel with the current path I'm taking She smiled anxiously, hoping that Isabel would meet a better owner in this life. Now I have to solve the current problem, how can I leave this note in Florence's room without alerting anyone? Using magic was kind of dangerous. Legacies often cast spells around the building to discover unfamiliar magic. "You can go out," said a voice in front of me. "I can feel you there. It means you weren't hurt." This is Florence. She went out alone, wearing only a cloak over her night dress. "I am a priest of the Goddess of Hope. I feel deep despair and desire for hope." So he left me. I was awake but now that she was here, I had to give her a note. I pick up the note like a dart. It landed a few inches below his feet. Then I turned and melted into the dark. Do you want extreme despair and hope? Can you feel my desire to die? I laughed at a cruel joke. ---------------- Thanks for reading the author's note! Hope you liked this chapter ============ See you later! ========== Chapter Five Word quickly spread that Lady Florence was breaking off her engagement to Lord Hank. "Odette, how could Lady Florence break off her engagement to Lord Hank?" Rachel complained angrily. "Lord Hank is a wonderful gentleman! He is a great wizard but is very kind to the weak! Lord Hank is very impressed with the news! He was very sad when we met yesterday." I nodded in agreement and continued reading the book on my lap. On my note, I told Florence how Lord Hank offered to take Rachel around town. I asked him to look in the dark with my own eyes. It is entirely up to her whether she still wants to continue the courtship or is better off breaking up before it turns into a major scandal. From what I know, Florence had been so hurt in my past life because shortly before their duel her opponent had mocked her about the love of her new fiancé. She told him it was no surprise that his fiancée chose a Rachel-like beauty over him. And his opponent tells him that it is a well-known secret among the rich other than him, as his family withheld the news from him to avoid distraction. At that time, as planned, Lord Hank's servant brought him a letter from Lord Hank regarding the annulment of the engagement. For him, there was no respect for his family. Florence is a girl known for her sensitivity. If she had the chance to see how Lord Hank treated Rachel and how he treated her, she would have known how to act. All her loved ones looked at her in the same way, dotted eyes, drooping eyes. It is very easy to tell the difference between you and Rachel. There is no chance of getting in between them. The best way is to break it all down before the gossip breaks down. "Oh my goodness, poor Hank!" Rachel cried. “I wish I knew how to satisfy her.” Lord Hank was acting one hundred percent in front of Rachel to go and comfort her. “I can make him happy! He was so nice to me, it's time to bring him back!” Rachel clapped excitedly. “Odette, I'm sorry to go now.” I gave her a beautiful smile and waved my hand. Leave it! what! Do you think I want to hear about you the love of life?' Shortly thereafter, I walked out of the room. When I left the room, I rolled my eyes and fell on the chair, covering my face with the book I was reading. What will happen next? I thought. In all my past life there have been events that always happen. Let's call it the cornerstone. One of them is meeting Lord Hank at a tea party. I meddle a little in this life, but luck still befalls me. I brought the two together. Now what is the next cornerstone? “Ah! There must be a meeting with my stupid fiancé!” I sat down, the book that had been laid on my face fell into my lap. At the same time, the golden crow feather that I had planted in the book also flew into my bosom. "I had to burn it." As I sighed under my breath, I inserted the feather again into my leather-covered book. It's time for my father to take me back to the temple. Originally, sending Rachel to the Temple of the Winds wasn't even in the father's mind. But then my new stepmother intervened and told Rachel that she had dreamed of becoming a priestess since childhood. He thought it was some kind of prophecy. Or why did Rachel have the same dream since she was four years old? Baba was pretty sure. If Odette had some hope of becoming a priestess, what about Rachel? So Rachel was following me to the temple in a few weeks. My fiancé, Henry, came from a family that served the god of the wind. There he met Rachel. I knew nothing of Rachel, but here Henry fell in love with her. Rachel was not able to focus on her studies, so she asked for my help. In my first life, I was an evil stepmother who expelled her after some kind of humiliation. In the end, it was Henry who taught him. Then Henry said he had to call off our engagement because he loved Rachel so much. Check out the pattern here! Rachel met a man, fell in love, and then broke off the engagement. Wherever Rachel goes, she leaves traces of broken hearts. Girls are heartbreakers. After he died in his first life, she reversed. Why do I like it so much? Was it really worth it? Or am I just so angry that Rachel stole something from me again and am jealous? Was it all my stupid pride? When I saw Henry for the first time in my second life, I felt nothing for him but anger and hatred for his planning to kill me with the other attackers. I had no trace of jealousy when he was with Rachel. Even when they flirt here and there. Then I realized I don't like Henry as much as I thought. This is all my stupid pride. "Thank God I don't like him!" I rolled my eyes as I murmured under my breath. "I have such bad taste." In my past life I pretended to be the best sister alive. Give Rachel what she wants. So when Henry announced that he had broken off our engagement at a family meeting, where both of our families were sitting around the table, I was heartbroken, but then understood his ex-girlfriend and then the sad truth that Henry needed. accepted. Instead of marrying Rachel motivated. This made me agree with my father's point of view. But it was too much of a disgrace for Henry to announce that he was going to marry my stepmother by throwing me in front of everyone. No wonder when I was still childish and spoiled, then I came out early in my life. Anger starts to rise in my body now that I think about it. Do you know how humiliating that was? How offended do you feel when everyone you know points their fingers behind your back and makes fun of you? No, I won't let this happen to me again! I swear to God inwardly. Then how do we speed things up? My lips can't swell in this upcoming drama. ------------------- Author's Note This is the second time Odette has talked about crow feathers. What is her secret? What will Odette do with her ex-fiancé Henry? Stay tuned! Thanks for reading, see you next time! ========== Chapter Six “Odette, I heard you were bugging in your room recently,” said the father disapprovingly. Earlier he always told me to read more, now I hide in my room and continue to study all day, he did not agree. I wanted to move my eyes. To be clear, my personality had changed a lot after four years and he didn't suspect anything. I want to commend my father for being very sensitive. But now it's time to speed up my plan. “I…” the father declared, “Odette, Rachel will follow you when you return to the temple next week.” "We can be together, Odette! I'm so happy!" Rachel, who was sitting next to me, excitedly grabbed my hand. "truly?" I pretended to be surprised. "You know Rachel is busy studying to prepare herself! What is she doing? Reading useless romance novels all day! Did you practice while you were off?" If it was me when Rachel was reading a book, was she reading the romance novel? Once there is a certain perception of a person, it never changes. I didn't know why. I still feel a hint of despair. Four lost their lives! Wake up, Odette! "I'm going to start school with Rachel, Dad." The father tenderly said to my father's new wife, "Hera," Your daughter has a really good influence. You raised a good daughter. When I have..." He looked at me unacceptably. After Dad and Hera left the room, Rachel began to put her hand around me. "Don't be sad, Odette. Dad didn't understand your desire to have a rest." He gave me a reassuring smile. "Let's study together! I can't wait to study together at the temple! It will be very interesting." I laughed happily. I gave my consent. Although I don't want to be in the same room with Rachel for a second, it is essential to my future plans. "Odette, can you show me how? Cast this first degree wind spell?” Rachel asked shyly and shyly. “I’ll think about it. Well..." I looked at the book of magic in his hand and then buried my head in my hand so I was thinking. "I'll try." I misspelled for sure. It's over. The oddity and the strength of the wind was too weak to keep you out of your hand. "Ooops." I pretended to be ashamed. " I'm sorry Rachel, I'm a bad study partner. Is this the sixth mantra I've failed at?" I covered my face with my hand. "Don't worry, Odette. These are tough spells." They weren't. They could seriously look at Rachel this time, as she finished basic magic with an ordinary master in her village. Once she started learning more advanced techniques, she had mastered them all and surpassed me in no time. It was like This is my whole life. It's a genius, just a breeze. Not magic, but all kinds of magic, which certainly helped her when she was found in the Temple of the Winds, where it was said to be a treasure, but she was definitely a genius at first." Rachel, I know who we can ask for help. ! I'm a really bad study partner, but I know someone who's perfect for the job!" I applauded. "Wait! I'll find you a good study buddy tomorrow!" Then I walked out of the room. It would be better not to spend too much time with Rachel. Strangling When I returned to the room, I took some written notes. Delivered to Sarah a few days before the stairs. Send it to Lord Henry. “Lady Odette, you are finally getting close to Lord Henry!” All smiles. "I was so worried. I thought you two had a fight! She hadn't asked me to send her notes in weeks! From the Duke's wedding!" Of course, it's time for me to be born again. Who wanted to play love letters with Henry? When I was younger, I thought exchanging love letters was very romantic. I wrote letter after letter to Henry, and all I got in return was "Truth!" , "this is interesting!" I still felt that Enri's speech wasn't good. This illusion was shattered when I saw his love letter to Rachel. There is no person you do not like to talk to, and there is no person who is not good at talking. I was so innocent shivering from my naive and self-filling memories. I fell on my bed with my leather book and continued reading it. " Just send a note.” I said goodbye to Sarah. ----------------------- “Rachel, I found you a great study partner!” I searched the library we were using to study Odette! You're here!" cried Rachel. She looked pretty as usual. The morning sun was shining on her lavender eyes, making them sparkle like agate. I prefer "Rachel, this is Henry." I took Henry to the library. And he's a fellow student studying at the Temple of the Wind God." To Rachel I saw clearly that Henry was hardening. Best “Henry, this is my sister Rachel. She also goes to the temple as a student.” “I pulled out a chair from Rachel and made Henry sit.” Well, we have many questions about the mantra. I am sure you would be more than happy to teach us.” When I was younger I tried Mimicking the gentle champagne tone as I confronted Henry. "Oh! How silly of me, what are we missing? Snacks! I'll be back in a little while! Or not." I smiled as I got out of the library as quickly as I could. As I was closing the door, I heard Henry say to Rachel with some embarrassment, 'Odette won't be back,' 'Why?' I can imagine Rachel widening her eyes at this answer. "It's his normal gait, he hates studying," Henry sighed. "You won't come back. Did I say there are some phrases you want to hear?" "Yes, of course!" I went back to my room and lay down on my four poster bed. I took a leather-wrapped notebook from under my pillow and rolled the crow's feathers between the pages, muttering, "I hate reading. Who said that. Look what I'm doing now! Read a school history book!" ---------------- Author's Note What is Odette's plan? And why is Odette studying history? see you later! ========== Chapter Seven "Lady Odette, Lord Henry has arrived. She's in the library," Sarah says. As I flipped a page of leather volumes, I gave him a vague nod. " Lady Odette, did you and Lord Henry really quarrel? You rarely leave your room to meet her!” “I don’t want to meet him for that,” I rolled my eyes. “But he came to visit you! He cares about you so much that he's here to teach you!" I laughed at all this fake news. "Okay, I'll visit her today. Now prepare the shoes and tea," I united to drive out my smiling maid. Now that the lovebirds have been together for five days, Henry Rachel's love is fading even more. Don't disappoint me, Henry. I laughed. Let's meet him after tea. --------- ---- Opened the old oak door of the library and peeked inside.Henry and Rachel both sat side by side with their heads on the book of incantations.Rachel was so focused that her shiny lock of hair escaped from her braid.A lock of hair fell in front of his eyes.He looked Henry up and put his hair behind his ear.Rachel saw her blushing and smiling sweetly at Henry.Replica of a scene from a romance novel! I couldn't believe those romantic scenes in trash romance novels, as my dad put them, could happen in real life! I opened the library door and shouted excitedly: You've eaten your breakfast! Henry jumped up at the sound of my voice and immediately leaned as far from Rachel as he could. He started making doodles on paper in the foreground. "Odette! I... I was wondering where you've been for the past few days!" Rachel said her face was still red. "It's not the same without you studying with us! You said you'd study with me. But you never came. Only me and I left!" "Now I'm back, with snacks!" "You see, where's the tea, the biscuits, and... the cake? I must have left them! I ask..." "Go!" I laughed. Rachel jumped out of her seat and left the room. His face was still red. “Tell Sarah to bring her,” I finished the sentence. I blushed when I went to close the library door. "Hello, Enri. It's just the two of us left." I laughed, “Well… yeah…” Enri said in disgust. "You must read, Odette," said Henry, "Rachel is so talented, you've caught me a lot when you've been playing the past few days." I quietly thought that she would catch up with you too and soon outrun you. "I know." Leaning on the wooden door of the library was still smiling, "You should thank me, Henry. Do you enjoy reading with Rachel? Just the two of you." “What… what…” Enri stuttered, her ears red. I said innocently, "Calm down, calm down. All I'm saying is that you both seem to be good classmates." "Oh, Henry, you didn't tell Rachel that you were my fiancé, did you?" "No, why should I?" Enri inhaled hard. “I see, I understand if you mentioned that little thing, Rachel wouldn’t flirt with you. He totally understands.” “What… we don’t…” “Never mind. Never mind.” “I tried to give her a soothing gesture.” I've reached an agreement. A deal you won't regret "lit up my lips" work? “Let’s break off our engagement.” What? Odette What are you playing? Henry narrowed his eyes. It's a big deal! Break it down, you can flirt with Rachel however you want! You can marry her! Both our families agree that they want someone in my family to marry you. Whether it's me or Rachel, it doesn't happen. That's it, but that matters to you, am I right? “Enri looked at me in disbelief. But you like me, why would you leave him like this? If you think of pretending to hold back, I will fall in love with you. It won’t happen, run away. I know you, don’t try to hurt Rachel!” I rolled my eyes “You don’t know me. Not yet.” Now. There are some conditions that must be adhered to.” “Conditions?” I must be the one who announced it. Your throw is no other way. And only after my marriage can you and Rachel declare that you are together or married. Not before my marriage. Deal? “I raised my eyebrows. But I will never marry. “Why are you doing this?” He still looked at me suspiciously. “I don’t want to marry you, that simple. Let’s sign the contract.” I took a piece of paper from my sleeve. So I can count on you. "" a necklace? mascot? "" exactly. We both must swear to our Lord. Do you want to override your terms or not? "I gave her the paper." Rachel will be back any minute. Once a contract was signed between witches, related to both witches and their gods, they would surely encounter each other. The outcome was determined between the two parties before the contract was signed, and in our case, whoever violated the covenant had to be rejected by the family, and any covenant binding on witchcraft would not want to be broken. There are no flaws about it. You, sealing your covenant with God as a witness, quickly looked at the paper and looked at me suspiciously for the last time, obviously wondering why you gave it to him. But he knew it was his chance at freedom, so he cut off his thumb and put his blood in the knot. hire me. I smiled and pulled out my needle. I pricked my thumb and followed his lead, running down my blood on the knot. With a touch of my blood the settlement vanished with a puff of black smoke. Henry looked confused, "Smoke..." "What? You're worried I'm going to fail a simple spell like drafting a contract? Check the contract before signing it, right?" The small crease between her eyebrows was smoothed out, "It must have been a trick of the light. I thought the smoke was black. Yes, I checked its spelling before signing the contract, you did a surprisingly good job." Now it's my turn to take a closer look at the anger inside me. "That's the main motto. Are you looking down on me?" “Eh…” I gave him one last look and left the room. The smoke was black but it felt fine. Because the spell I used was from the Dark God book. If he breaks the agreement, it won't kill him. I was a normal wizard at first, and that was it. Bad luck for a day or two. When I got back to my room I was buzzing. --------------------- Author's Note Odette in Action This ============ Chapter ;) What happens next? keep watching! see you later! =================================================================== ================================================================== === =============================================================== ===== ============================ Rachel had to wait for her value to show up in the temple, but I was still happy with the pieces Any relationship with Henry the idiot. With our contract now signed, Henry had to step down while grooming Rachel. I was pleased with how he was feeling as Rachel wore more and more suits. He was the one who cheated on me in my first life. It is true that I was a fool, but if he had not led me, I would not have fallen into this trap. Then I won't burn at the stake. Now that's a little funny. If Henry is indeed Rachel's true love, then no matter how hard the process is, love will triumph, right? "Odette, I can't believe I'm going to study at the Wind Gods House! One step closer to my dream of becoming a priest! How long will it take to get there? Will Henry join us?" Rachel finally said shyly. "One day car ride," I said, like Sarah helping me in the car. "About Henry, I heard boys like to ride there." "Oh...we'll go with Henry. I thought," Rachel said sadly, then clapped her hands excitedly. "So we've been sitting all day. Together in the car! that's cool! I have so much to ask of you!" Rachel's eyes lit up. My head was hurting at the thought of living in a closed area with Rachel. Others might not know, but I knew very well that one day he pretended to be his best friend. Rachel really gossip. I made sure not to Having to be with Rachel during the trip.This one-day carriage was actually the cornerstone of Rachel's life. Oh, you might think it's normal, thieves in the middle to steal a young gentleman, would a prince come to save the day? No, it's Rachel who was kidnapped by a gang of outlaw heroes and then fell in love with she or the leader of the outlaw gang. In my first life, I didn't move in with Rachel, I hated my stepmother, how could I live with her? That day, as I was leaving, I begged Henry to pick me up. So when she was kidnapped, there were rumors that I conspired. Then in my fourth life, I was the older sister to Rachel, so of course I went with her. And then I was kidnapped with him. It is a very bad experience. It felt like a third wheel or a transparent person. Everyone was so focused on Rachel, I could run away from her if I could. They treated her like a queen. So, I decided not to move in with Rachel. I don't want to kidnap him. I leaned out of my car window and grabbed Rachel. Kay said, "I'm sorry, Rachel, I didn't know you were so excited to be with us." I wiped my eyes dry with a tissue. " Look, I'm planning to go to my mother's grave. It's a mountain and rocky road." "I can..." "I have some secrets to tell my mom." I hid my face behind a handkerchief as if I was embarrassed. "I'm sorry, Rachel." "No problem!" he said with false joy, but I could see the despair in his eyes. “I know this is your first visit to the temple, you should panic. So Sarah will go with you.” She smiled proudly. Sarah widened her eyes and was in denial when I saw her. “So you have both Sarah and your maidservant. Sarah can tell you more about life in the Hulk.” “Odette, you don’t have to…” “I will try to catch your car. Maybe we can meet on the street after dinner.” “That would be cool!” Rachel's face lit up. about their noise. I was looking out the car window while I was walking in the woods. He saw a car coming from that direction. It was a dark black car. The horse carriage was also black. But the different thing was that there was no coach, only a crow was standing on top of the car. When the sunlight fell on the crow, the black feathers began to shine like gold. It was impossible. This… “This is the chariot of the Priest of the Dark Lord,” he muttered anxiously to the guard next to the chariot. The bus also stopped our car. The guard knocked on the car window and said, "Lady Odette..." Shouldn't you be in the far north? It shouldn't be here. I don't remember coming to the south at this time in my previous life. But who knows, I haven't visited my mother's grave in the last four of my life. Maybe he came far south and I didn't know because I'd never met him. Calm down, you two don't know each other. He is the priest of the Second Temple. Say hello to him and then he'll leave. This might be your only chance to see him in this life, Odette. Find yourself lucky! I said to myself. I asked the staff to open the car door and got out of my car. I put my right hand over my heart, and with my sari I lifted my dress on the chair. I bowed my head a little. General congratulations to the priests. As the car approached, I suppressed my desire to look at it through the window. Then the car stopped in front of me. Someone jumped out of the car and then bowed my chin. When I took off his familiar lazy smile and the half-mask on his face, my eyes widened. "Look who I found on the street, the perfect candidate to serve the Dark Lord." ---------- Author's Note New character! Are you excited for the next chapter ========== ;) Stay tuned! see you later! ========== Chapter Nine “Who did I find here, the perfect candidate to serve the Dark Lord” said the person I remember. At that time, I was kneeling in front of the Temple of the Dark God, praying that the God of Darkness would help me take revenge. Then the large wooden door of the temple opened without any sound. Someone was saying the same words in front of me. He said: " So you're the one who wakes me up." "I slept well. I got back to my car and dug up the basket with the tea set, water and tea leaves that Sarah had left in the car before taking it out. She brought things to her car and started making tea. When he said he wanted tea, he wanted you to make him tea. He was too lazy to do it himself. I placed a cup of hot tea in front of him on the basement table in the car. There was still a lazy smile on his face and he slowly sipped the tea as if it was this world.” He said in the air as if they were only talking about the weather “I need a spy, you seem like a good candidate.” “Spy?” Why did he need spies? Around the temple All day in my second life, as the High Priest of the God of Darkness, he was summoned only when the continent really needed him, as when the wild beasts were untamed near the border and the priests of every temple were required to unite. “You can do it, right? Why? I’m just a disciple of the Wind God Temple,” he laughed. “I know, that doesn’t suit you. You are more suitable as a disciple of the Dark Lord. Your soul will sink into darkness.” He said the same thing in my second life as well. Having said that, I have such a bad character that I am probably more inclined to learn the arts of the Dark God. I was easily jealous. "I want you to watch the treasure so dear to your temple. Oh don't try to play the fool now, I know there's treasure in your temple." No wonder they knew about the treasure I had collected in my previous life, which was mostly a temple. They were all pieces of some kind of gem. In every life, when Rachel began to study in the Temple, she found fragments in the Temple. It was breaking some kind of closed wards. The piece of jewelry accepted him as its sole owner. This increased his strength. Then Rachel went on a journey to collect other sharks from other temples. Undoubtedly, the other temples did not want Rachel to take their rich treasure. This was a great discussion between Rachel and the other temples. The war caused "Do you want me to steal it?" I asked hesitantly. This is an impossible task for me. I couldn't fight Rachel. "not at all!" His smile widened. "Why do I need this shark? It's of no use to me. You should track his progress." "Provide it?" "When you collect a shark, inform me. It's easy, isn't it?" I have given my consent. "Wonderful! Now I will give you a gift. You work for me, I must give you some reward." Whistling and strange peeking out of the car window. "I am looking for your friend." Does strangely have any friends? But he knows only one crow. I became even more puzzled, it was the same as before, but I did not understand his movements. I don't remember if it was fixed specifically on those chipsets before. He became more interested in my attempts at revenge. "Meow meow." A black cat jumped out of a car window. He had soft black fur with golden eyes. Isobel? The cat landed on the high priest's lap and whispered, patting the cat. He said, "Your master." “My gift to you,” as she put the cat’s bosom on my lap. “What… what is the cat’s name?” "I suspect?" The cat looked just like Isobel, the way she lay on my lap when I touched her. I asked without hesitation: "Isobel?" "Meow meow." He answered me as he had done many times before and then started licking my fingers. Like Isobel in my second life. I saw that familiar lazy smile still hanging on his face. At the same time, a crow with black gold wings flew up. "It's a matter of time." Open the car door automatically. "Email me via Isobel. Nice to meet you." “It is my pleasure, your grace.” I got out of the car with Isobel in my arms. Then I felt his beauty more than the average man. Breath dripping from my ears. "Odette, see you soon" . I was still standing in the same spot when my guards and coaches started waking up from their deep sleep. I saw the cat in my arms. This cat was definitely Isobel. It can't be... ------------- Author Note Wohoo! This story has been viewed 2k times! Thank you very much for reading! Things are getting exciting ;) What do you think of the agreement between Odette and the High Priest? Stay tuned! see you later! =========== Chapter 10 The high priest created an illusion, all my staff and teachers thought the black car came out as we wanted. Best wishes It is better not to warn father. I told him I had found Isobel on the side of the road and that I would keep him. Without dismissing Sarah's idea, they all agreed to it. Another madness from Lady Odette, what's new? After that the flight went smoothly. I arrived at the temple just before sunset. When I got out of my car, I saw Henry riding his horse. When he saw me he stopped and ran towards me shouting, "You kidnapped Rachel!" "how did that happen?" I asked nervously. I cried in fear" Do you know who did this? I should have been with him. How can I tell my father about this? It's my fault.” “It's Chris and his fun band.” “Chris and his fun band? Who are they, did they leave some kind of note asking for money?" Sarah managed to escape as I expected. "No, they didn't even leave a note! We don't know who did this if it wasn't for your maid and Rachel's maid! They both ran away when their guards were too low to call for our help.” Rachel is there with the thieves?” I shouted angrily. And he made the right choice. It seems that Rachel and the maids were in different places. His guard was inferior to Rachel. This is the only chance to sneak in and ask for help. Fortunately, Sarah knew the way to the Temple.” “Do you know where their nest is? I have to save Rachel!” “We've already tracked her down. Now we're going to save him. The priest and me. We all hope you stay here. We can't take care of you as long as we protect someone else.” So that's a subtle way of saying I'm going to get in their way?" "Okay," I said disappointedly, "Rachel, please. Give back thank you, I went back to my bedroom in the temple. I lay on my bed tired. It's been a long time since Isobel lay on my pillow as she used to. I started running my hands over his soft fur. "I don't understand Isobel, why did you come to this life under her care? You must be a stray cat in a village down a hill from the Temple of the Black Lord. You have never set foot in that village. Why should I go?" "truly? Take me to him!" Let's finish the last scene of this play. When I got to Rachel's room, Henry was consoling her. He put his hand on her shoulder and spoke softly to her. Fortunately I had the courage to take a look before I ran. I caught my eye, I had my share of romantic moments in My Past Life.It's embarrassing and makes me want to wash my eyes after watching those beautiful moments live. I went back to the corridor and stomped on the floor. Several times to pretend to run to his room. I cried before I opened the door, "Rachel! Poor Rachel! How are you? Are you okay?" When I walked into the room, Rachel came over to give me a big hug. She screamed, "Odette, you're really worried!" "Rachel, it's my fault. If I had been with you, I wouldn't have realized it." I cried in my handkerchief. Soaking my handkerchief in mint, I had to cry whenever I wanted. “Those nonsense kidnappers! Poor Rachel, are you hurt?” “Not at all! Odette, you don’t know, they are really heroes! You see that the owner who takes care of this land is extreme and strict. The villagers have to pay high taxes and have nothing to eat! Chris was And his men are already plotting to kidnap the daughter of God so they can negotiate with the Lord and tell the villagers they can help! They are heroes!” Are you sure they are heroes, Rachel? They kidnapped people! He was planning to harass Prabhu with his daughter! I stopped talking to Rachel a long time ago so I sat there with my usual pretty smile and nodded. Rachel continued her wonderful adventure when Henry finally caught her eye and she was finally able to sneak in. That night, I was asleep when I realized that if I wanted to report on Rachel's progress in collecting the pieces, should I follow her? I could not speak to Rachel or her attackers. Maybe I can follow him from afar? This is definitely a good plan. ---------- The story of the author's note has reached a new level! Now that Odette has served under the High Priest, what will happen next? Stay tuned! Thanks for reading! Story 2.4k hits! ========== Chapter 11 My studies continued in the Temple. It is somewhat similar to my previous life. I don't have to spend a lot of time or effort to complete my homework. If I still haven't mastered the mantra after studying the same thing for the third time, no matter how much life I walk across the ocean, then I'd be a really great idiot. One day I was lying in my bed reading Isobel when the temple started shaking. I sat and hugged Isobel beside me. Rachel was breaking the seal. Keep the first piece. The time has really come, and soon she begins her quest to find other sharks. I went to my office and wrote a note. I had to do my job as an investigator. “Isobel,” I called the kitten. “I must give this note to the High Priest.” I put the note on the table. "Miano". Isobel jumped on the table and put his paw on the paper. Within moments, the tone disappeared amidst a plume of black smoke. As expected, he asked Isobel to send the news. The same thing happened in my second life as well. "Now, Isobel, stay in this room. I'll be back soon. I hope I don't have to go out and wonder!" Isobel's smooth black fur as I jokingly rolled my eyes ---------------- "Rachel, do you really want to go?" I asked anxiously. He said with an expression of piety on his face: It's my luck.” She was holding the pieces of the Pawan Mandir in her hands. “Shards is calling me. I can feel them." At that very moment he closed his eyes. "It's my luck, I have to help them!" Should you help the broken jewelry? I snapped the comment. "Rachel...that too...you'll be fine. I'm worried about you. Too bad I didn't achieve anything else. If I went with you, I would probably drag you down. But I will support you! “I squeezed his hand to support you. Odette… don’t worry Enri is coming with me and…” whistled and then a big white dog came out from the bush next to us. Rachel leaned over and hugged the big dog.” I met Lucian in the woods near the temple. When I met Lucian, he was about to die.” Rachel cried. “Poor Lucian, fortunately, Lucien is getting better now.” I saw a huge dog with white fur and blue eyes. Lucien might look like a dog now., but it turns out she's under some kind of curse. He's a human . He became one of Rachel's loyal companions. "Stay safe, Rachel!" I said goodbye to my handkerchief. As soon as I met Rachel, I realized that the use of wipes had increased. "Odette, I'll update you!" He screamed again when Henry took her in the car, the big dog jumped into the car to join him and they left. I stood there until his car disappeared and I went back to my room. I took my coat out of my wardrobe. "Isobel, let's go on an adventure! If I remember correctly, the first target is the Temple of Fire. We can wait in the city where the temple is." I put Isobel in the bag of the cross I had prepared for her, put on my overcoat and headed to the stables. Until we attended the final selection, the temple priests didn't really care where we went as students. It's not something I go into secretly, I've never been to the temple since my childhood. I have already told Sarah that I will look for medicinal herbs, she will not come to find me anymore. I got on my horse and went to the other side like Rachel. As I was going, I was arriving at the city where the Temple of Fire is. I don't want to follow in Rachel's footsteps, she would definitely attract trouble. If I remember correctly, on the way he met a prince and priest of the Temple of Fire. No, don't get involved in their confusion. Only in this way you are about to reach the city where the Temple of Fire is located. I don't want to follow in Rachel's footsteps, she would definitely attract trouble. If I remember correctly, on the way he met a prince and priest of the Temple of Fire. No, don't get involved in their confusion. Only in this way you are about to reach the city where the Temple of Fire is located. I do not want to follow in Rachel's footsteps, you will certainly attract trouble. If I remember correctly, on the way he met a prince and priest of the Temple of Fire. No, don't get involved in their confusion. Now only Fanu can deceive. I didn't live to collect all the pieces, or if I had, I'd be on another continent at once. So I definitely only knew the first two or three places. The sun was setting when I stopped to rest. I tied my horse to a tree and then set it on fire at night. She put a thick rug on the floor and sighed and sat down. Who would have thought that the spoiled Mrs. Odette would one day spend the night in the woods? I was making dinner out of bread and cheese and playing with Isobel when I heard a sound. Isobel replied with a light nod of his head and then meowed in a certain direction. In no time has a black car appeared on the road. It was a wagon without buses, and there were only two black horses on the way. The car stopped in front of my carpet and then the car door opened. "Would you mind if I join you?" asked the elegant man in the car. After a pause I smiled and said, "It is my pleasure, High Priest." ------------- Author's Note New Ark. are you excited? Tell me what you think!! The story is close to 3 thousand! thanks for your support! see you later! ========== Chapter 12 "I think you went to the city where the Temple of Fire is?" he asked while feeding his crow. I have given my consent. Why was he here? "Is this your dinner?" asked suspiciously. I looked at the bread and cheese on the mat. I have given my consent. “I hope you are not planning to give bread and cheese to the high priest.” "not at all". I smiled proudly. I took the quiver and the arrow from my horse. “I will go and find something for you, your grace.” You lazy priest! I really wonder if he shows up now so I can track him down and cook for him. Why was his shadow not called a puppet? “It’s great on you,” he smiled with a sinister glint in his eyes. "I thought I'd send my shadow puppets to hunt, you don't have to use my strength anymore! So glad you gave up!" Now some unheard of memories of dealing with him have resurfaced. The memories I had before my death in my second life must have been so wonderful that they blinded me. “Please wait a moment, your grace.” I bent down and turned to enter the forest. The beautiful smile that slipped off my face a little while ago as I turned my back on it, gritted my teeth and rolled my eyes. Cold hand around my wrist. "are you angry?" they laughed. "I'm kidding." While two black shadows were swimming in the forest, he snapped his fingers. You looked towards it. But after a second I regretted it. I lowered my eyes as I remember again. He was not the High Priest I knew in my second life. He was the High Priest of the Lord of Darkness. I was a spy in this life and we only met twice. I wasn't the High Priest who closed my eyes or dazzled. “If I let you chase after me, who knows when I will finally get my food.” shrug. "Dolls are more efficient." And now I wanted to strangle him again. I didn't want to confront him this time. I went and took the spices that I had in my bag. Odette doesn't know how to cook in her first or second life, but by running away from home and hiding outside, Odette makes at least one dish. I picked up more firewood around my camp and sat by the fire waiting for the raw meat to arrive. "You're still mad at me." I looked up and the high priest's face was an inch away from me, his red eyes staring at me. Some scenes flashed through my mind, my cheeks warmed up a bit, and I retracted as gracefully as I could. Don't be shy, Odette, you're not Rachel. “No… No, I am not angry with you, your grace.” "Do you know how to cook?" "a little." "Either you know how to cook or you don't. I covered my nose with my sleeve. After burning in my first life, I hated grilled meat. The smell of fire burning on meat and fat made me feel rebellious. I can still eat meat, don't roast. But there's no way to cook this rabbit." Except by roasting it. Just boiling the broth wasn't enough for him. The smell of burning meat was getting stronger at that time. It improved when I was reborn in the afterlife, but it still made me feel uncomfortable. Then I heard the sound of a finger and a mysterious hand grabbed the rabbit I had flattened. My wrist was again wrapped from the priest's cold hand and they walked away from the fire. "Let's stop here. The smoke there is becoming unbearable." "But I didn't cook..." "Your broth is more than enough to prove the fact that you can cook. You are close." He shook his head seriously. That's right, I actually gave him a bowl of broth while the rabbit was roasting. “Thank you for your acceptance, your grace.” "As promised... withdrew. The mask covered most of his face. The face that was staring at me flashed in my memory, dispelling my loneliness and sadness, I lowered my eyes to hide the emotional turmoil in my eyes, mine, the only one in my four life I could call my friend. He was the only one Who I can talk to but not now, it wasn't the pastor that I missed. I hope I'm not so bad, I want to make you stupid. How long has it been since my last conviction?" He was in deep thought. He made me sit with him on the carpet and grabbed a bowl of hot broth in my hand. I replied: "No, I'm stupid for you. Put a face like ours behind your mask." “Yes sure it is an old legend that only animals follow the god of darkness. Even today I am respected in society. Although I am good for a spoiled heiress, I am the only son of a Duke. After Rachel appeared, Rachel and I were compared in every moment. I am no longer unique from her type I'm changing and then slowly Rachel stole everything I had My father's attention, my daughter-in-law, even my respect in society. One time I tried to get back what I had I was so angry at my jealousy that I didn't recognize myself after my failed attempt To get revenge in my second life, I realized Rachel was doing it herself. I lost to Rachel because I wasn't good enough. I didn't try to improve myself much. I was jealous of him even today. Jealous of your fate. Jealous of his talent. Jealous of how I love her. Everyone she met. Maybe that's why I tried to avoid him in this life, so as not to be jealous of him. I don't hate him. I might have done it in the past. I just... don't like him," I explained as I removed the thread of my abaya. He offered him "I can help you take revenge." "It's a pity that you don't hate him." shrug. "An interesting thing to do?" He wanted to do something to satisfy his wicked, weary and twisted heart as a priest of darkness. In my second life, he led me to make potions or deals with Satan and sold them to desperate people who kneeled in front of his temple. "Well...even though I don't hate Rachel anymore, I suggested, 'We can do something to stop her.'" “Lord Hank, Henry, and Chris, Rachel paused and happy. I’m so wicked. I’m a crooked person. An evil smile appeared on the High Priest’s face.” Odette, what a good idea, you really fit into my temple studies.” If you come, I can leave you Take your place.” “If that happens I cannot look at you, for your grace.” "This is correct. Don't worry, the offer is always open to you. Same vengeance." He smiled appreciatively, "Notice appropriately." I lowered my head until my red hair covered my red ears and pretended to smooth a crease on the rug. There was silence for a moment before I asked what it was. And he said to me: What is your advantage in the south? Do you work in the south? In my memory, he only left his temple at that time before my death. The historical books mention that the high priest could not leave the temple grounds without reason. As recorded in the historical books, the High Priest of Darkness left the temple several times, when the continent needed to be rescued, Ironically, wild animals were out of bounds. Whether it was an invasion, a plague outbreak, or an internecine war to succeed the throne. He smiled mysteriously. "Do you know what scraps your stepmother collects?" This might sound like a trivial question, but I knew it was It wasn't. The splinters were strong and were near every temple. Rachel had to fight to cut those temples down. The high priests of those temples hated her, although sooner or later they would worship Rachel because of her magic and power. "It's a clue. When you solve it, you'll have answers to your questions." He looked at the moon and said again. As you know, the High Priest of Darkness cannot leave his temple. Prakash priests will scold after receiving this news. "Present," said the priest, and the mask he had taken off seemed to hang from his hand. He patted my head softly and whispered next to my ear: “Walk between us,” he smiled and returned the smile. "sweet Dreams." He waved and jumped back into his car. "see you soon." The horses started running as soon as the door was closed. Slowly the car carrying him disappeared into the mist. Collected. Next to the fire and I put Isobel in my arms. "He didn't answer my question in the end. Does that mean he could leave his temple if he wanted to? Maybe he didn't want to save me at the time. He appeared before I died." Some distant memories occurred to me that I wanted to bury. I covered my face with my arms. "Let's go to sleep, Isobel. Don't waste the protection pavilion that the Dark Priestess has set up for us." Then she slowly fell into a deep sleep. I think a good dream really falls on me, though I didn't really believe that the dark priest would give people good dreams. --------------- Author's Note Things are getting exciting! See you next time! In my second life the night before my execution, the night the high priest came to bid me farewell at last, I covered my face with my arms and wept, why did I dream that night? I stayed there. For a few minutes then I collected myself. I started packing everything in my luggage and putting it on my horse. "Come on, Isobel. Let's go!" Since I was sure I could get there before Rachel, the road took a slight detour. According to my memories, Rachel first met the Prince on his way to the Temple to receive blessings. Then on the second day of the trip, Rachel found an injured priest on the way. So she spent some time treating and caring for him. This priest turns out to be the priest of the Fire Temple, so Rachel can enter the Fire Temple without any problems. I wonder if this priest ever regretted letting Rachel go to the temple. This was a kind of reason for losing their temple treasury. The details of each life were a little different because I acted differently, but Rachel's path wasn't far from being a character in a novel whose life she planned. And she was doing her job in acting like him. Certain events must occur, meeting the Prince and the Priest of Fire are two of them. Just when I was thinking I came to a town with a fire station. I decided to settle first in a hostel and then walk around the city. The city where the temple is located has been as a tourist destination, there must be something interesting to see. And I missed shopping without chatting with Rachel Chet. It's great to take the beauty of this world with you when you go shopping. The sun was setting after I had been shopping to my heart's content, and I chose a restaurant for dinner. I occupied a table near the window in front of a busy street. I was reading the menu when I heard a noise in the street. Thinking it was Isobel, I looked at the high priest sitting upstairs and reading the list. I almost screamed. “Your Majesty, what are you doing here?” I have been silent. "Dinner?" He answered with a raised brow. “No matter what the legends say that the Dark Head Priests are human too, I will eat them.” "Yes I know." I closed my eyes and nodded my head. I knew I couldn't say what I said, but I watched him so often that I knew he could come out of his temple whenever he wanted. I grit my teeth, "Why are you in Fire Temple City? If you're so free, you can spy on your own! You don't even need me!" "But it's boring," he honestly said. "Boreal things have to be done by my subordinates. If the superior does it himself, what do subordinates do." He smiled innocently. “Then why are you here, sir?” " Like I said, I'm sorry. Are you here to have fun? I hold my head in my hands. Why does he have to appear now? I almost forgot the dream I had the night before and then almost came up! That too without a mask on! The scenes I pushed in the back of my mind, it seems They're running back. Stop thinking, stop thinking, Odette. I looked out the window. Oh, the shoes on the display window across the street look great. Look, that girl was wearing a beautiful dress. The lace was really complimenting her... Her face... I dropped the menu I had placed on the table, knocked on the glass of water, and splashed the water on my dress. I should have cast a simple wind spell to solve the problem but my hands were trembling. At the last moment the high priest cut off his fingers and the glass returned to its original position. "Who scared you so much?" ' he asked, looking out the window. 'No, I don't care,' I said as softly as I could. I held my trembling hands together. 'I was just surprised. Slowly coming back to my senses, focus on covering your hand. The memory of my being stabbed was still fresh in my mind. So everything that triggered that kind of memory took me back to that time. Over time, my reaction was not very good. When I was in my second life I would tolerate roasted meat rather than throw it away on the spot. I closed my eyes and shook my head to get the memories out of my head. I give her a faint smile, "I'm fine now, your grace. Thank you." “What scares you? The person who killed you in your past life?” I almost dropped the handkerchief I was pulling from my arm. Then I remembered that he loved making jokes like these. “What would you like to talk about, ========== Chapter 15 While we were eating dessert, the High Priest suddenly said, 'The girl you just saw is the friend of the fire priest. Did you steal his girlfriend? "He looked at me hopelessly. He seemed disappointed in my friend's taste." I'm not a cheap person! I do not lead people with a fiancé! "" it's better. "I nod with satisfaction." I can. " After two lives, why did the demon of this magic book return to my hands again? The Dark Priest was like a strange tyrant, he controlled people, he was easily bored, people wanted to entertain him, of course it wasn't by singing or dancing, he was the Dark Priest. This is not really surprising, as as a follower of the Dark God, the High Priest was bound by the rules according to the historical books, the Dark High Priest was not allowed to use his dark power without a valid reason approved by the committee. Priests of other gods. To prevent the high priest or priests from harming the continent. He was like a great god imprisoned in his temple. That is why he liked to make fun of people in front of harmless tricks to pass the time, although he himself did not do this. Instead, he now commands people to do it like me as a perverted priest of darkness. Now at this point, I was beginning to suspect that the High Priest only followed those rules because he wanted to. If he doesn't, it's very likely that he's breaking these rules. It was as if he was coming out of prison this time to be the person he wanted. When I crouched in front of his temple in my second life and begged him for help, so I was surrounded. So I figured out how to make a drug that would make people look sick and make bad deals. All this came from this magic book now in my hand. second. Let's go back to our room and study it. To be honest, I didn't want that girl to kill people because her boyfriend left her. But she clearly did not like Mrs. Florence, who could abandon her when she realized that her fiancé's heart had already left her. I wonder if there is any way to help that girl win back her boyfriend's heart. It was so difficult that not a single worthy young man had seen Rachel without falling in love. His mistress of the fire priest had already met Rachel. If he doesn't, then I can ask the girl to take her injured lover into the woods. Then Rachel did not meet the priestess of fire. Although Lord Hank and Rachel lost each other at the party, judging by the fact that they bumped into each other in the street. They will likely meet each other sooner or later. I turned another page of the magic book and sighed. On this page he talks about the fragrance that will make someone fall in love with you. Sometimes I wonder if Rachel has this kind of perfume. Or why do you fall in love with every handsome, decent man on the street you come across? I wonder if the High Priest would fall in love with her, too. Wait, he knew I had my stepmother. Does this mean he met her already? Was he asking me to spy on Rachel as part of his plan to get to know her? Am I just a ploy to get close to Rachel? What was I thinking why did my heart prick a little? Without noticing, my fingers crushed the corner of the dictation book page. I tried to smooth the angle with curved eyebrows. Why am I so angry all of a sudden? Suddenly I felt the urge to throw a tantrum. To throw this magic book around the room. It's like going back to the time when I was still a bad-tempered woman. "Miu Miu Miu!" Isobel licked my hand. “Hmmm, Isobel, play on yourself… what…” “We are two hours apart and someone has already offended you?” English उसका कौआ उसके कधे पर टिका हुआ थ "तुम यहाँ क्यों हो?" मेरा मुल गया। "क्या आप मुझ पर विश्वास करेंगे यदि मैंने कहा कि मैं कि पको बुरे सपने आ सकते है??" "नहीं। मु ) Status "एक इत्र जो लोगों को प्यार में डाल देता है। क्या यह आपकी योजना है?" अभी तक फफ इसने मेरे सामने इस महायाजक को याद किया। 'मै जो हूं ... मैं उसके चेहरे पर नज़र डालने पर रुक गया उसने एक भौं को संदिग्ध रूप उठाया जैसे कि वह मुझे विश्वास नहीं रहा था कि मैं कितना बेवकूफ था। ओडेट ओडेट ओडेट मैं हूँ हूँ उसने जोर आह भरी। ” Grand darkness? "I didn't understand where this was going." And is your stepmother related to the word "dark" in any way? “But aren't people drawn to things different from themselves? She is beautiful and every worthy young man who stares at her loves her… “What kind of romance novels are you reading? Throw them away.” He held his legs and looked at me with his red eyes and smiled, “If you have a lot of time to daydream, why not? Go back to the book of magic. A lot. Daydreaming is bad for your brain.” A second ago I didn't know what hit me. Why did you ask him such a question? He is a heartless demon. To help that girl win her boyfriend's heart with any spell? Or at least show him what he's doing, his girlfriend has no hope of getting back to him? I knew a fragrance to make people fall in love with it was a good idea, but for some unknown reason it made me anxious. In this case, she felt that someone was controlling the Fire Priest's heart. Well, how is that? "Looks like you have a plan." The high priest cut the macaroons. Anger began to boil inside me. A box of macaroons I bought yesterday for this afternoon tea. But this man showed up at midnight and refused to leave. After a while she said she should have breakfast. What do I do other than give her a candy box in the middle of the night? This annoying person. “Yes,” my teeth declared. He took another macaroon from the box. The volume inside the box was decreasing. You looked towards it. And do you care to share what's on your mind? I can't read your thoughts. Letting go of the deepest feelings emanating from you. "He smiled gracefully and picked up another macaroon. I wanted to kill him! I think he saw that dark object." At first glance, most men chase Rachel in love. Most of the time, it was a great way of saying they like his face. So what if Rachel isn't pretty? "Are you planning to spoil your stepmother's face?" Was it the excitement you saw on their faces?" No "I dare not. If Rachel is burned or hanged to death for my past barbaric deeds, so I think destroying Rachel's face will kill me even worse. I will not try. To make matters worse, I will probably be reborn afterwards. yourself over and over again?” I plan to use this mantra to create an illusion in his mind so that when he sees Rachel, Rachel looks like a normal looking girl. Let's see how his love continues after this.” Or not.” “Just this much?” “No, I will give the girl medicine that will erase the memory of the priests from her heart for two days.” "I don't think she would take it willingly." "If I tell her it's a test for her boyfriend. If he suddenly stops taking care of her, she will realize how important she is. To make it official, medication is necessary. "So at the end of the day the person who suffers." "he deserves it." He blushed.” I look forward to your performance. See you later.” He left with a wave. Meanwhile, the sun began to shine. I went to the coffee table to get what was left of my box of macaroons. Then I realized that the box was still full. Macron was missing. I could really hear his soft laugh. He was cheating on me the whole time. ---------------- I've prepared all day and I'm finally done. Now I just need the illusion of fire priest Kevin, now that I've sold the potion to my ex-boyfriend Doris. At first he didn't believe it, but now with those words Kevin is going to dinner with his new friend this evening. Yes, the rumors between Kevin and Rachel were all over town. I wonder who was boring. This made him want to check on his beloved. I sat in the café to wait for Rachel and Kevin. Who is walking towards me slowly? Henry was following Rachel like the third wheel. Poor Henry. The fur cloak pulled near me. When Kevin passed by, I muttered the spell I had been practicing that morning. This is not a difficult spell, it is just a dark development of the initial illusion spell we were taught in childhood. Kevin stumbled, then rolled his eyes. Then I found out that the spell was in effect. "Do you think Kevin will fall in love?" I asked the man sitting at the table. "His reaction isn't as hilarious as I thought," he said with a bored expression. And he doesn't care about me. It's the witch's fault! I was seduced by Kevin, "Doris shrieked crazily." I will kill her! Are you going to kill every pretty girl who catches Kevin's attention in the future? "At that very moment Doris collapsed." Here she is. Same drug but stronger. You will not remember him for the rest of his life. “I put the potion on his door and left.” "The Dark Lord didn't agree to that," said the man who was waiting at the end of the road. t need his approval. She did not succeed in killing Rachel. She is hurting others and injuring herself in this workYeh. "I involuntarily rubbed my neck in memory. I didn't take pity on her. I didn't want to be stabbed again. Her choice was whether to take this drug or not." Now I wonder if Rachel's face is really attractive. Kevin was clearly less excited than when he was under the illusion, but as the confusion faded, he became fascinated by her again. “The High Priest looked at me with his usual smile, something he knew but didn't tell me. It means I should be closer to the truth.” But if it was so amazing, why didn't anyone notice something? Like Kevin, he was a rather skilled priest, which is why he realized the illusion and broke it after a day. Henry and Lord Hank were also skilled magicians. “Do you think humans know when the gods cast a spell on them?” He asked me mysteriously. Abs. Who is Rachel? Does this suggest was there a god who cast a spell on Rachel? Witch spell? I patted a cold finger on my forehead. But you really got me involved! You asked me to spy on your behalf. Well, you have a point. Laughter. "It is my selfishness. But you must have known by now that I am a selfish tyrant." He got off the slope and then turned around. He looked at me with his red eyes, “When the time comes I will understand everything.” I was getting ready to come. It was also the tea party at which I had been stabbed in my previous life. No wonder I was surprised, I was in the first three of my life. I've never been to this party before, obviously hated my stepmother, and my dad told me to come back again this time. Early in my life, I hated my stepmother and my stepmother was very outspoken in showing that the father was afraid to spoil the party, so he asked the priest to lock me in my room in the temple and then chant a spell at the door to prevent me from coming back and spoiling the party. This time he ordered me to join in to show others what a wonderful big family we are. I think I should be more careful this time. I thought Doris wouldn't stab people again. I let out a sigh of relief, touching the protective charm I had made for the occasion. This should save me from being stabbed. "Lady Odette, it's time," Sarah announced. I have given my consent. I went down the corridor and knocked on my father's office door before going downstairs to greet my stepmother. "Odette," said the father. "what do you want?" “Father, I am breaking off my engagement with Enri.” Odette I sighed. "You know, it's up to you to decide. An arrangement between two families." Then he waved his hand, trying to inform me as an unreasonably naive heir. "Henry falls in love with Father Rachel. Do you still want to continue this partnership? Do you threaten scandals? You risk your family's reputation?" I asked with a raised brow. "What or what?" His eyebrows wrinkled. "Are you sure you weren't wrong? I know you probably didn't like the idea of ​​having a sister, but..." "Do you think I did? She heard me too." After a pause, he said, " I'll talk to Henry." "I'm Henry, Father. He said: Marry Rachel. So I made a pact to protect my family's reputation. We break off the engagement and he can't marry Rachel until after I'm married. You can still unite our families while everyone is happy. The question was whether I would marry someone and whether Rachel would really choose Henry now. But I kept my mouth shut. Papa looked at me. With a question in her eyes, she patted his desk and finally said, "Henry is the fiancé your mother chose for you." "It's not mine because he loves my stepmother." I laughed and smiled. sigh. “I will speak with Henry’s family about this.” “That is wonderful. Now upon your requests, I have come to celebrate the birthday of my dear stepmother.” I laughed and left the room. Now at least one annoying thing has been resolved. ------------- Author's Note More mystery ;) See you next time! ========== Chapter Eighteen When I arrived at the garden where the tea party is taking place, people were running here and there. I better stay away from Rachel. I decided to find my acquaintance group or a quiet corner. The truth is that even after many births, I was an introvert. I was never a straightforward person to begin with. I was walking into the crowd when someone tapped me on the shoulder. I tensed up and grabbed the protective magic I made. "Odette, I was wondering where you are!" I turned to see Rachel smiling at me. "I'm holding back because of something unimportant." "I was so worried you'd miss the party." His huge smoky lavender eyes blinked. "not at all." It's best to stay away from her, but first... "Rachel, where did your search lead you? You look skinny!" "For Fire Temple, but it was a hit! I met a new friend who is also at this party. Let me introduce you to her." Rachel's face lit up at the mention of the fire priest Kevin. I tried so hard not to roll my eyes. " Don't bother, don't bother. We'll have plenty of time after the party. “Where do you want to go next?” he asked innocently, as if I really cared about him. “The splinters call me to the east,” he said, closing his eyes, where the Temple of Water is. “Rachel, I will. Good luck. You now have many guests to attend. Don't let me hinder you." I waved to Rachel and ran away as fast as I could. The fire priest is here, who knows his lover is still holding on to him? I don't want to die again. Rachel, though I'm not a shield, all the assailants around her are protecting her. I didn't worry about him If only for a moment the party seemed to be going peacefully It was evening, the sun was setting It was close to the time I had been killed in my previous life I remembered I saw the sunset and my blood was slowly flowing I hid in the shade of the trees I would have gone back to my room if he hadn't stopped Father servants at every entrance and exit. No doubt I would report it if I entered again. “You are very upset.” A cold wind blew on my right ear. I cried when I realized I had lost my voice. And do you want everyone to know that I came to bless your stepmother? I doubt they will. “I would if I could. My father’s spies are everywhere. I’m sure he set up a ward to stop me from escaping. To show this to others. Great job that we are one big family.” I rolled my eyes. "If you will forgive me." When he put his hand on my hip and pounced on me, we were somewhere. With pillars of black marble, he immediately put his hand around my waist, and we were in a dark temple, and I tried to check all the corners of the temple except for him, and I think he noticed that my tender red face did not give. Some memories I won't admit I want to keep hidden "Is this your temple?" "yes." As he walked toward the rear of the temple, he took off his cloak, and the cloak followed him. "Why did you bring me here?" You said you wanted to get out of that party," she said with confusion in her eyes. She laughed. Thank you, Your Grace, for saving me from boredom, “I offered her a chair. We picnic here we can party. But unfortunately I didn’t steal any food with me.” "Ah now that you mention it, I want tea and cake. I'll show you the kitchen." Where is the kitchen? “What should I say. Now I had to cook for those lazy priests?” Oh no, he opened the door to the corner room.. This is the living room.. He smiled at the look of my confused face.. It was a joke.. He patted my face. He took two cups of tea and two pieces of cake from his finger and appeared on the coffee table. Isobel is standing next to Trey, meowing. Isobel? Are you in my room? "I patted Isobel's fur. Isobel licked my fingers and then jumped off the table. Isobel ran out of the room and disappeared into the corridor." Isobel knows where to go. Maybe Blake was looking forward to playing with her. "Blake was her crow. The high priest had already taken a chair with his clothes scattered on the floor. He was looking at the two slices of cake, and perhaps deciding which one looked like the food." Rachel instinctively put her hand on the Sharpie. However, amid the protection of her attackers, she was injured in the process. The Wind Temple priests were afraid that Rachel and I would bother them, so they asked the Water Temple to wait for the anger to subside. Until then I go home. So we went back to our family property. Rachel was stealing other people's property left and right, but I was kicked out of the temple. This is the reality of my life. Rachel's discovery infuriated many people, especially the priests of the Temples of Fire and Water. As for the Wind Temple, he had to pretend to be mad at Rachel, but I knew he was proud that the Wind Temple student was the one who was accepted by The Precious Shards. Now the priests of the Bumi temple were also working because Rachel's next target was their temple. I knocked on Rachel's bedroom door. Rachel is my stepmother, if I didn't visit her when she was injured, bad rumors would start to spread. So despite not spending time with him, I had to leave. When I opened the door so there was a romantic scene in my eyes between Rachel and her silver-haired boyfriend, Lucien. I wanted to stab myself in the eyes. Knocked down! Knocked down! Rachel let me in! What were they doing? I stood at the door in embarrassment, wishing the goodbye kiss would end soon. Finally he looked at Lucien and walked out the door. "Odette, did you see that?" Rachel hid half her face under the quilt, only her big lavender eyes were staring at me. "I'm so sorry." He covered his head with a quilt. All I could do was smile gracefully and pat. Please don't say "come" when you're not really ready. My throat cleared, "Are you okay?" Rachel nodded, her face still red. "Wound healing. I'm a little bored being in my room all the time." But half a dozen lovers lined up to meet you? "Do you want some books?" I gave advice like the caring older sister I was pretending to be. "I'm actually reading this. “He took out a large thomka from under his quilt. It is a magical record that records all the former priests and high priests of every temple for the past five hundred years. It was more like a book of family trees, but it contained priests.” After this battle with the High Priest of the Water Temple, I realized that I Need to know more about my enemies. This record lists the priests and the chants or incantations they know.” “Yes!” I said softly. Dad in it, you know!" I said, "It's more exciting." And I need to get dressed. Not every temple allows me to bring the pieces back in peace. "Why do they have to fight?" said Rachel, turning the pages, sighed in despair. They kept it over the years?” “But I found something interesting.” “Really?” It was a very interesting thing. It was a great thing in my third life before I ran away from home. Read the volume. “Look! This page is about the priests in the Temple of Darkness! the same name! Y. High Priest of Darkness. Arden. But that was five hundred years ago! Dark priests no longer register themselves with the Witches' Register. “They are dark priests, who do not follow the rules. "reddly shy." You have a point. Then it made my search more difficult. “Rachel surfs gracefully. The priests of the Dark Temple have never attended a social event. Nobody knows how powerful they are. Just when I thought checking the record would help, it’s blank! It’s too deceptive for them!” “They are called Priests of Darkness for a reason.” And that's chief Priests don't even have the interpretation of the spells they know! They are very naive. “Rachel muttered angrily. Do you think this high priest is still alive?” I asked boldly. "Not at all! Priests are known to live long, but certainly not that long! Like I told them how smart they were!" I laughed, "That's why he called the dark priest." "definitely!" Someone knocked on the door. Looks like it's time to leave this room. The suit is lined up. Must not. I occupy my stepmother's busy time. “Please come inside. Oh, that’s Enri!” Rachel smiled happily, “Enri, why are you so worried? Something has happened, Rachel,” said Henry curiously. The Priests of the Temples of Earth, Water, Fire and Wind pointed to the dark temple. The priests of darkness are responsible for stealing the treasures of their temples "But we don't steal! It has nothing to do with the Temple of Darkness! The fragments should go back to one, that points to me. "As for the priests who spent their lives guarding those pieces, you're stealing. But why are they pointing the finger at the High Priest of Darkness?" He said he had evidence. The high priest was not in the temple in the days when we kept the pieces. Even the High Priest of Darkness knows! "Rachel's eyes filled with tears at Lavender. She actually asked me to watch her, but she had to sneak up all the time! Now she's caught!" Well, right? I pressed my hands together, calmed down, of course he was right, he was the high priest of darkness. "No," Rachel said firmly. It has nothing to do with the poor High Priest of Darkness. These priests must be told. Enri, help me, let's say to these priests. Henry raised his hands to raise it. "Rachel... you're still hurting," Henry said anxiously. This has already been said by the chief priests of other temples. Join hands and plans to punish the High Priest of Darkness for not following the rules. The chief priests of darkness follow the rules. He had already left for the Temple of Darkness. “What? I knew there were rules, but other High Priests could punish them if they wanted to? They didn’t get hurt. He was a High Priest of Darkness. I was relieved…” That’s not true. Enri, we have to explain ourselves now! Henry! "After a deep sigh, Henry got Rachel out of his bed and left the room. I began to walk around the room. He's my boss, and I have to check on him. That's right, that's it." Courtesy of checking yourself in chief, I left Rachel's room and went to find Isobel ----------------- Author's note: Things are getting interesting!! Will the High Priestess of Darkness be safe? See the following =========== Chapter!! Thanks for reading! See you next time ;) Note: If you like my stories and want to support -> https://ko-fi.com/butterfly_effect (link is also on my profile) ========== Chapter 20 “Isobel, We find the High Priestess of Darkness." I took Isobel and my two fur coats. I wrote a note that I went to see the sea. They know it's a bad Odette fad. And I went to the stables. I had to ride north where the Temple of Darkness was. If you go horseback riding there, it can only be reached after about a week. I did not rest in the field. To speed things up, I decided to use transfer spells. They were installed in some major cities and were very expensive. I didn't have a choice, did I? " Isobel, can you go to the Hulk first? And look what's up there? "Isobel wagged her tail once, but it remained in my arms. Isobel bowed her head in confusion and meow." So he prevented you from coming. Let's go. "I went to towns with transportation periods and spent exorbitant money on them. If it wasn't my boss, I wouldn't care! I finally reached the far north. It was snowing. I saw in front of me a white snow mountain. There was a temple on top of that mountain. Just as it happened when I entered my second life." I went up the hill for another hour and finally reached the temple. The ground outside the temple was empty. What if Rachel assured the priests that the dark priest was not responsible for stealing the shark or that they had already left after punishing them? Before I knocked on the great door that closed the temple, it opened. It was There is a long dark corridor that leads to the unknown on the other side of the door. I step in. I try to find my way to this huge temple, after a while I finally find a room with a throne on a platform. A person with black hair and a black robe covered in silver was sitting on it. His mask was still on his face, but his face was much whiter than usual. His eyes were closed, too. He looked more like a statue than a living person. "Your grace?" I asked hesitantly. I cleared my throat and asked again, "Your grace? This is your assistant, Odette, coming to visit you." Only my voice was echoing in this huge room. The man sitting on the throne was still there. I walked towards the throne reluctantly. When I was a few meters away from him, I realized that he was really stable like a statue. He couldn't even breathe. Worried, she approached and grabbed his hand. It was cold as ice. "Your grace?" I started shaking him with the other hand. "Your grace!" I started to panic. He wouldn't kill like that. He was not dying! He is the mighty high priest of darkness. Which is bound by countless rules to prevent him from conquering the world. Among all the chief priests, he was given the title "Lord" because of his immense power. There was no response on his part. My eyes seemed full of tears. I didn't cry. There has to be a way. ways to contact him. Some distant memories occurred to me. "Aren't you curious about my name?" he asked while playing with my hair. "What a bitter joke." Have you heard the old saying that names have power? “Yes…” I was wondering where this was headed. It's an old saying, "He says of the inner joke grinning at the figure. It hasn't been used in a hundred years or so. Then there's some strength in the names. I curled my edges to try to decipher his secret words back then." He finally opened his eyes. He raised his hand to catch a tear that fell from my eyes. He smiled, "I knew it would be you. You always woke me up." "You can't say I'm cheating now, can you?" As soon as I realized it, I widened my eyes. I took a few steps back. My face started turning red at first and with time it became pale and dull. "So I know," I said coldly. "Are you the one who cursed me? The one who gave birth to us over and over again? Is that funny to you? Are you funny as you watch me torture and die over and over again?" The smile on his face disappeared a moment ago. He took off the mask, hid his face, looked into his reddened eyes and said, "Yes, I am." ---------- --------- Author's Note ========== Bombs for today's chapter! Surprise? Hope you enjoy it today She must have loved the class ======= === See you next time! ========= Chapter 21 “Am I funny to you? Was it in the past? One of your many pranks to entertain you?” I uttered words like poison. He gave me a signal. Much. I refused to think or believe it. I was shivering with anger. It was funny to him every time I struggled and then she died tragically. I've already experienced them all. Death, torture. I wished and then failed. “You were killed on your first birth,” he said suddenly. After your death, when Rachel and her gang came to collect the last piece of jewelry from my temple, you were killed. And then I revived myself. I am the high priest of darkness. I have many dark spells. My arms "" You didn't know me in your first life! Why did you revive me? “The mantra drained my energy. Before I could act again, I had to rest for a long time,” he said coldly. It’s like a knife piercing my heart. So you need to entertain. I’m amused.” I laughed.” And I thought you were really helping me. You’ve always been a clown!” I cried. He looked at me without emotion. I realized that he was actually a heartless beast. He was a real man without feelings. He was wearing a mask everywhere. I hugged him. The cloak approached me. I was feeling cold.” I won’t deny it. That was my initial intention. But I love your company. For the first time in five hundred years. After my parents passed away, I refused to see them, “If you read the record, you will realize that the God of Darkness does not have many followers. The Ardennes are the only family that worships God. May God bless us in the Jordan. I hope we live long. It's hard to get injured. immortality. You can handle the long prison in the temple. If possible,” her lips finally bloomed into a mocking smile. She went. “You can only end your life when you are crowned the next High Priest. As soon as I turned twenty-five, my father handed me his seat. He could no longer handle imprisonment and immortality. He was six years old in this temple. "Live for a hundred years. Now it's my turn." He has nothing to do with me. I won't give her my mercy, I'm not Rachel. "I thought you'd come to find me after you reincarnated into your third rebirth, but you ran across the ocean to the continent. I was angry." I sighed. "You knew I was a selfish animal." “In that whole life, not once did you come and try to save me!” "You said you weren't Rachel. You said you didn't need knights in shining armor to protect you." " So you're saying the flaws are mine?" "I told you to call me whenever you needed me?" he asked without an expression on her face. "You know I can't leave the temple without a reason. I was too weak after the mantra to revive you and me, I fell into a deep sleep to recover. I opened and closed my mouth again: "Call to wake me up." He told me to call him when I needed him. But I did not believe him or his promise. He kept saying it over and over. I woke her up and thought it was a joke. "So what now? You can sneak out of your temple now! I don't see you slumbering!" Magic weakened me, and after three births I was cured. 'I was in a hibernation,' I said, 'so you didn't need to be entertained!' Why did you hit me Do you understand the pain of torture and then open your eyes to see that I have to repeat it again? Want to torture again? I want to die in peace! “I cried and cried. I cried for the first time in my five lives. I finally lost that loneliness, regret and hate, the despair that filled me has cleared up.” I will. I live in this prison since I was born. I want this eternity to end.” He left his throne and walked toward me. Then he patted my head.” And even though I’m in a hibernation, I can feel my surroundings through Blake. It's a use of the familiar." Can I rest in peace after this life? I want to live a normal life and die when the time is right. I don't want to get caught up in Rachel's mess anymore. "I don't know." "It's your magic!" "Have you ever wondered?" Why did I revive myself if I had to end my semi-immortal?" That's right, he said he wanted to end everything, but why did he do that revival when his wish was fulfilled? Because you didn't appoint the next High Priest? He laughed and said, 'Partially, but not the main reason. Everyone in this world is a chess piece in a game played by angels.' Another vague sentence. I screamed in shock as he took me deep into the temple. "Let me get off!" Soon I lost all my inner struggles from my mind and tried to get rid of them. ------------- This author's note ========== I think this chapter is my favorite so far ;) Hope you like this story! see you later! ========== CHAPTER 22 I woke up when Isobel jumped on me, and kept tricking me with her claws. "Okay, well, stop eating Isobel." I hugged Isobel with one hand and sat down, rolling my fingers in my hair. Then I saw the high priests of darkness sitting around the room on a chair by the window. Oh, I was still in the temple. I held my face in my hands. "Good morning, you're finally awake!" He said. "I am hungry." I picked up the pillow from the side and threw it on her. "Cook yourself!" "Now who pissed you off this morning?" he asked with a smile. "I wonder who?" I threw another pillow. "Stop it!" I inhaled steam as I left the room. He only cares about his breakfast. I was still angry with him. Who cooks her breakfast? "Miano". Isobel jumped out of nowhere. He meowed several times and then ran toward a room. He saw me standing, turned his head and looked at me. And I follow her way to the living room. Eve was already sitting behind the table with the food. She took another chair in front of him. And I started digging. I still don't know how to face it. Am I angry with him because he imposed the curse of reincarnation? To treat me as entertainment? But I knew it was so from my other life. since I met him. He agreed to help me get revenge because it was fun for him. And at that time I didn't mind because I got what I wanted. And I want to improve myself and live a better life. I still don't know how to face it. Am I angry with him because he imposed the curse of reincarnation? To treat me as entertainment? But I knew it was the second this was life. since I met him. He agreed to help me get revenge because it was fun for him. And at that time I didn't mind because I got what I wanted. And I want to improve myself and live a better life. I still don't know how to face it. Am I angry with him because he imposed the curse of reincarnation? To treat me as entertainment? But I knew it was so from my other life. since I met him. He agreed to help me get revenge because it was fun for him. And at that time I didn't mind because I got what I wanted. And I want to improve myself and live a better life and at that time I didn't mind because I got what I wanted. And I want to better myself I want to live a better life and at that time I didn't mind because I got what I wanted. I want to improve myself and live a better life. I have valuable opportunities to run. I have a life I've been very controversial. I sighed. "Where did you steal the food?" I asked after a long silence. I couldn't stand it any longer. "Please don't use such a dirty word to describe me. You asked me to make you breakfast. So I did." “Did you… cook it?” “Is there another high priest in this room?” " Do you know how to cook?” “If I don’t, how can I live in this temple for hundreds of years?” “Why didn’t you cook earlier?” “Lazy.” I looked at him and ate food in my mouth. This horror is brutal. “Do they? Did the High Priest punish you for breaking the rules?” He had a smile on his face as usual. “Are you worried he might get hurt by me?” “No.” I averted his eyes. “But I remember someone who rode three times. Today I kneel before my throne and weep. Have you dreamed?” I said, with clenched teeth, “I did not kneel before your throne and wept.” He shrugged, absent-mindedly. “It is the high priest's game that I play. His punishment is like tickling. They groan, I fell asleep listening to their flying sound. I'm not that weak.” He looked at me cautiously with his eyes and then smiled back. “I’m not worried about you anymore.” And excuse me?” “They thought it was you. I had no desire to be associated with this stepmother.” When Rachel came to my temple to steal the Sharpie, “Maybe they thought it was just a ploy.” “If I were to accept it. I don't want others to take away my respect. "I rolled my eyes." Are you planning to take revenge on Rachel? He answered with a mysterious smile. Then he suddenly asked how she died in the third life? What about your third life? Hanged because my father tried to betray I froze and then groaned with my head in my hands “Betrayal! How can I forget? Even if I leave all the traps now, if my father’s betrayal is discovered, I will still be dead! I just want to die! When I get old! Is it hard?” Eve smiled at me. She groaned with sadness." Of course you know. Blake is spying on you. If it was Blake, why did you tell me to spy on Rachel? "If I don't find you in this life, you've probably forgotten about your father's betrayal by late." I looked at him "That way it's more Fun.” He shrugs, “I'm not mad at you anymore. He was angry because when I was reborn in the third, I didn't come to find him. I may not have trusted him as much as I thought. My second life was certainly the happiest of my four lives, but they all still ended tragically. I probably didn't want to break my heart once Other.” “Rachel’s next target was Earth Temple.” “Oh yeah. You don't have to spy for me this time. The city in which Bhumi Mandir is located is boring.” He shook his hand indifferently. “Do not hesitate to reconcile your father’s desire to betray the Emperor in time.” I sighed. Can I ask my father to reject me? I am not related to him then. No. He seemed to me to be very cold-blooded. He was still my father. The book of magic was pushed on the table. Eve was laughing at me wildly, “Use it freely.” “Are you trying to make me a dark high priestess and then die?” He smiled innocently “Not at all.” It will take a long time.” I wanted to pour a cup of tea in front of his face. I kicked Eve under the table before pushing him away from the magic book. ------------- -- Thank you for reading the author's note, see you again! === ======= Chapter 23 I was very disappointed. I didn't remember much about the father's infidelity case in my third life. Continent Sagar hid for more than seven years. After I got home, I was arrested and then to prison. I didn't know much about the case. I did not ask. Was my father involved? You can't blame me for thinking that, Father was a priest in Pawan Mandir. But he was not the high priest. He was one of the many temple priests. He didn't even have a great deal of strength. The father was not a fool. This is not a king with the little power he has in the temple. In our country, the emperor or empress was considered neutral. The king bless all the gods. They do not worship any particular deity. This prevented each temple from supporting its candidate. Thus, not all potential successors study in any temple. How did the father try to betray? What was he cheating on? I was pulling my hair when Isobel meowed. "You look very frustrated." The heartless demon known as Eve laughed shamelessly. You looked towards it. “You asked me to solve my father’s riddle, so now I devote all my brain power to it! I have no idea! Is your folded heart content now? To see me disappointed?” “A little.” He smiled happily. I couldn't hold back any more. Throw him a pillow. He shrugged his shoulders to avoid it.” Do you know something? I know you would. Blake has always been a spy. “His smile deepened.” I’m the High Priest of Darkness, I don’t work for free.” “So what do you want?” “I’m going to take a nap now. It would be nice to eat Tea when I wake up. Better even if its timing is perfect.” I'm confused, but there's a short way, I wanna grab it There's no point in overworking my mind when I obviously don't have that information. I left the room to bake some biscuits. I took him ------------- cookies and a tray with tea I entered the room where Eve was sleeping. When I opened the door, he was already awake sitting in a chair. Argh! "you are late." "Do you want it or not?" He approached me and took a piece of biscuit from the stairs. She thought about it a bit and said, "I've learned a lot really in your last couple of years. The girl I met for the first time definitely couldn't make cookies." "Try pretending to be Rachel's best friend, I'm sure you can make a three-tier cake too." "Would you take?" Hang the half-baked cake in front of me. "All just..." He said he kept the cookie near my mouth, and I took a bite without thinking. My face started cracking after that. "Do you want to eat it or not?" Threaten started laughing uncontrollably. "Why are you still shy?" He looked at me with a big smile. I gently patted my head and took the plate from my hand. He sat down on a chair and said, "I hope you know that your stepmother has finally become an Empress. Empress." "Holy Empress Rachel... Wait, do you mean that she didn't just marry the Emperor? I thought she married the Emperor and was crowned Empress. Do you mean that she was a ruler?" "Of course, her goal is nothing less. I think your stepmother also chose one of the idiots who surrounded her." And was my father framed? “Imagine if your daughter is sitting on the throne, but you find your husband trying to find his missing daughter. Your daughter-in-law, what do you think? "" My step mother? Did he think I would jeopardize Rachel's status as queen? Did he plan to kill my father and me? That's stupid. On what grounds can I threaten the Magnificent Holy Empress Rachel? "reddly shy." I can tell your stepmother is more foolish than you could have imagined. Why are you telling me this? I'm pushing you to ask the right questions so you can let me know. "" do you feel bored? " No, I couldn't believe it. Through it all, it was like he wanted to tell me that my dad cared about me more than I thought. And the thing I needed to be wary of was my stepmother. I told him. I looked for a moment and then left the room. When I got back I had a bowl of baked macaroni for me. I put it on the table in front of him. "I baked more than I thought." I turned my head thinking he didn't find my deep red ears. He laughed. Then he pulled my little finger with his finger and said, "Let's eat together." ----------------- Author's Note This is sweet ========== Chapter, Never see you again! ========== Chapter 24 "Not because I'm complaining, but can you stay here longer?" Eve, the chair I was sitting in, stood behind him and leaned over and whispered in my ear. "Can you speak properly!" I moved away from him. He laughed and finally sat down on the seat next to me. "And they don't care, until I finally come back." I shook my hand in despair. He looked at me with his red eyes, as if hoping for some scene this time to entertain him. "Why are you looking at me like that? You guessed me again!" It's always like this, I disappear, I might go on a nationwide shopping spree, Dad says nothing. Didn't care until I got back. "I've given you enough. Hint already. Don't come to hate me when you have difficulties." A smile stuck to his face. She died in my second and fourth birth. At the third, when I was still alive, I hid. So this left my first life. At that time I remember Enri threw me in front of all of my family. Rachel's hatred increased. I always thought of ways to defeat Rachel. The final selection of Pawan Mandir was in a few weeks and there I met my last autumn. The worst scandals and rumors about me, I remember at that time. Broadcasting started. I had many lovers, Henry rejected me. Like how I beat up my slaves. On the other hand, an angel of Rachel, described as an angel who came to our country. This definitely made me more angry at the time. Final selection of Pawan Mandir for Priests and Priests. My last downfall. Those gossip. My stepmother had a hand in my death. Now I guess even that gossip is from my stepmother. But I have never been such a hater of my stepmother and Rachel in this life. I was following basic etiquette. Not too close, but not too aggressive. She doesn't plan to kill me in this life, does she? “Can my stepmother do me any harm?” I asked hesitantly. “Could you be afraid that I would jeopardize Rachel’s position in the Temple of the Winds?” Eve didn't say anything, but continued to slowly feed Blake. “This is stupid, I am bad at magic. Everyone knows this. There is no way I can defeat his daughter Davey!” “But you were born again” “Stop…” Since I've lived four lives already, my ability to cast magic has improved a lot. I wasn't the best at everything, but I was skilled. In my first life after my death. This is because I spent a lot of time studying magic. I knew I shouldn't hate Rachel when I never spent time studying. True, Rachel can see every spell well. I cast a spell. “Although my magical abilities are no longer as bad as I initially thought, that does not mean that I can beat his daughter. And Rachel is a genius.” “Your stepmother is a country freak.” She is myopic, narrow-minded country stupid. All he had in mind was the welfare of his daughter. She did not understand the logistics of choice or my magical abilities. She knew that my father did not scold me as much as he had expected in my studies. Then he was afraid that I would threaten Rachel. Why would my father choose such a wife? I sighed. This is an insult to our family. “If she was indeed a narrow-minded woman from the countryside, as I said, then rumors would arise about me now that I had been away from home for so long.” "How do I know?" I saw him when I called Isobel. I turned the spell book on the page for you, about your familiar spy. "Isobel, I need your help. When you get back, I'll cook you a big meal. All right?" I smiled at Isobel and stroked her fur. Isobel's meow then disappeared. "A great meal." Eve raised his eyebrows. "And the person who helped you got nothing. How the world has changed after sleeping. What an unfair world." “You priest of darkness, what do you know about justice?” "Contrary to popular belief, the god of darkness is a god who places great emphasis on equality and justice. I am a friend of the god of order." I rolled my eyes at him. “And do not forget that you are now a visitor to the Dark Temple.” smile to me. "What do you want? Macaroons? Maybe my stepmother isn't as bad as you say it is! Then I'm not worried about anything." "Want to bet?" He leaned down, his face an inch away from me. I really believed him about my stepmother. I said maliciously. If my stepmother had been involved, a lot could have been explained. In my experience dealing with Rachel, there is not an iota of malice in Rachel's heart. So I felt bad for her marriage, they were like mindless creatures who obeyed her every command and made a cruel plan to get rid of me in my first life. But what if she was his stepmother? In my third life, I remembered Rachel as soon as she entered the scene. Who still remembers me after seven years? But as soon as I was caught, rumors spread about Rachel's bullying. Gossip about painful details about me and my family that only insiders know. This always bothered me. Now if my stepmother is involved that can be explained. I don't like to bet with him unnecessarily. I escaped his sight. "are you scared?" His lips were wrinkled, his face barely an inch away from me. In the end, I decided to close my eyes while waiting for my sentence. ---------- Another sweet author's note ==================================================== ================================================== == = ==================== Chapter! Well, am I too generous? ; p tell me what you think! Thanks for reading, see you next time! ========== Chapter 25 My stepmother has already started working. Rumors spread throughout the capital that I had many lovers and that I did not always return home. "That's funny, what does that mean?" I closed my eyes. "Isobel, come on." Isobel stopped playing with Blake near the fire and ran towards me. Isobel sat in front of me and turned her head and patted Isobel's head with this. "Help me give this to Sarah. Then I'll give you another big meal." I put the medicine bottle and the note in front of Isobel. After a "meow" sound, Isobel disappeared with the bottle and the note. Yves, who was lying on the sofa with the book covering his face during all this, removed the book from his face after Isobel's disappearance. "Are you going to leave him like this?" Asked. "This is boring." “Sorry, this does not satisfy your bent heart of entertainment.” I shook my head hard. " It's not worth my time, the truth potion has to work." "What real potion did you make?" A sinister glint in his eyes. And I made a true potion out of your spell book. I knew there was something sinister about this truth potion in the High Priest's spell book. Darkness!” I cried and applauded excitedly. Do you like Twisted Wives? Why were you so excited? I said her stepmother wasn't worth my time to acclimatize, but giving her a lesson was a different matter entirely. I've already asked Sarah to include this potion in my stepmother's breakfast. During breakfast, I took Sarah to tell my father about the bad rumors that had been circulating about me lately. Perhaps this raises a dose of truth. "Oh, it's nothing special. People who take this truth medicine won't stop talking until they reveal every lie they've read and every bad thing they've done in their lives. A sinister smile appeared on his face. I wonder how many lies your stepmother made up to capture your father's heart." " Maybe she's as innocent as snow, like my dear stepmother." I didn't believe this sentence at all. Now I was excited for this major drama, Potion of Shared Truth. Of course it's unattainable. Next week is Rachel's birthday party. Please come back to the property." I read the note Sarah sent me via Isobel. "What a boring punishment for your stepmother," said Eve. "What a boring father to you." He shook his head and dashed away, dragging his long robe with them, as expected, to uphold the family's prestige. My father sent my stepmother to the country, father needed Rachel to continue the marriage between my family and Henry, and now that I had declared that I would not take Henry back. The father cannot divorce my stepmother. And so our great work continued. I had to go to Rachel's birthday party. I had to find a gift for him. Well, I'll buy something from the city near the Temple of Darkness. "will you come back?" Eve asked with a sulky brow. He was still resting on his sofa, reading a book. I raised my eyebrows and said: A sad amusement that leaves you rotting in boredom? He smiled and nodded, "I want a box of macaroons. For rent. Won't you be punished by these priests for getting you out of your temple." “Maybe these fools got drunk. The day he left the temple. When he came. Let's go now. Blake, get our car ready.” He took my hand and pulled me out of the temple. I was still thinking as his car drove us down the hill to the town near the temple. He must be planning something. I never did. Did he see if I was excited or was it me? In a confused mood, Eve accompanied me in the afternoon. went shopping. Help me get luggage and bags like a really noble shopping partner. And to my fear, he said what outfit should I buy? Can you stop giving me this side look? You made me think I was a bad person who would hurt you.” And you can confidently say that you are not? “I am the High Priest of Darkness, Oda.” A strand of my hair. "But I won't hurt you. I can say with great confidence," he said, laughing. "Uh-huh". I looked out the car window. Hope you don't get blush on my cheek. I almost believed him. Odette, beware, he's the High Priest of Darkness! “Did you buy this necklace for your dear sister?” I turned my head to see him take the sapphire necklace from the box. His fingers touch the huge sapphire necklace. “Yes, where did you go when you bought this necklace?” I asked for the necklace to be returned and put in a soft padded box. “Why should I be present when you buy a gift for your half-sister?” shrug. "It's a waste of my time." “What…” I closed my mouth in time. So does that mean he won't waste his time when he goes shopping with me? I shook my head to clear my head. But at the same time, my father set me on dozens of blind dates. Was he worried about marrying me ASAP so that Rachel could marry into the Henry family? I couldn't take it anymore. I bothered my teeth. I looked at where this party was taking place and Rachel was there. “Happy Birthday Rachel,” I greeted her with a smile on my face. "This is my gift to you". She held the gift box and necklace in her hand. "Thanks Odette! You're finally back from vacation! I missed you!" Rachel came up and hugged me. I received a deer from Lucien, the silver-haired man standing behind Rachel. I rolled my eyes inside. Poor Lucien, you wouldn't be happy if you were. It is property. Rachel had at least 5 suits at all times. And your search so far. How are you, Rachel? Last time I heard, she was on her way to Earth Temple. If she succeeded, Eve Temple was her next target, Eve was definitely planning something. Yeah, it all started since she was killed in my first life, he gave us the spell to be reborn four times. This time he finally came out of the drain with this magic spell. For some unknown reason, I think he spent all his time plotting and eventually his plan will go through in this life. “It was absolutely cured, I ran away! It was an uphill battle,” she said sadly. Hurt Lucien save me!" Lucian hugged her and her eyes filled with tears as she consoled her. Rachel thanked Lucien and held his hand. "Why don't you understand!" cried Rachel. The shrapnel wants to reconnect! It hurts to hear my soul cry! "Your soul... Pain?" This is a fun way to put it. I can only nod because I understand how a soul hurts." Now, Rachel Lucian said as Lucien gently wiped tears running down his face, "There's one last piece left. Then the shark meets." Congratulations, Rachel. But where is the last piece? “I asked innocently, not knowing where the last piece was.” It's in the temple of the Dark Lord. “His beautiful eyes blurred for a second, before settling on his face again. No matter how hard it was. Hu, I’ll do it!” I didn't know how to react, all I could do was smile helpfully and change the subject.” See if you like your birthday present.” “I opened the box and picked up the sapphire necklace inside.” It’s so beautiful, I run!” Her eyes lit up as she saw the necklace. Thank you very much! Lucien, help me put it on!” Her fingers rested on the giant sapphire necklace. Is the necklace very beautiful? I thought it was completely normal. I didn't really think much of a gift for Rachel. She took what was appropriate for her condition. Maybe she likes sapphires or she's good. I ignored it. With some friendly exchanges, I went back to my bedroom. Fortunately, this time the father was not interested in the spy. I was reading a novel in the room where I saw a flower. It is the only flower found in the Garden of the Dark Temple. I saw Eve standing in front of me, he had a lazy smile on his face. I closed my lips anxiously. " what are you doing here?" I asked in a confused tone. “Rachel is in this mansion too! What if I find you? You know her fate! What if she suddenly breaks into my room?” He furrowed his eyebrows in response. “Without having to spy on her, she was waiting in line for two more of her attackers. to meet her. Your stepmother's life is so predictable." He had a point. "But that still doesn't explain why you're here?" "B-" "Don't tell me you're bored." I looked at him. Bring her. You're a letter. "She looked at me slowly." “. A message?” “Do you know where your stepmother is going next?” he asked deliberately. I nodded seriously. “She will probably come to visit me…” I held the flower near the window, “Four days later.” Why did he say this to me? Did he want me to do something?” “And all you have to do is…stay in this room.” I widened my eyes in confusion. “Don't step anywhere near the temple, stay well in this room, Odette.” , he said standing in front of me, his hands tightly pressed to my shoulder, looking at me seriously. “But…” “Oh, I know, you must be curious, you can call whatever you want. I can even teach you a spell. Give me a word, don’t go near the temple under any circumstances.” He leaned forward and whispered the last part near my ear. "Concept?" "What a.. a hall with a throne. Yves was sitting on the throne, his face was covered with his usual mask, his usual smile on his face. Rachel and her knights were armed with shining weapons. There were seven of them. It's eight to one, how is that fair? I began to move." With my finger. No matter how strong Eve is, Rachel is still with the seven most capable wizards. Added to the fact that Rachel is almost invincible. “Good day, High Priest of Darkness.” Rachel cursed her face with a sweet smile. “I'm coming for a shark I guess. It is in your possession now. Can you be kind enough to give me those poor pieces so they can rejoin?" Rachel put her hands in front of him and after a flash, something with a flash so strong that it hurt my eyes, appeared in his hand. The substance emits beams of light in all colors but you can't Seeing any color apart. The body was in the shape of a heart, but it didn't have much of it. It should be the last piece. A heart? An idea came to my mind, but before I could understand it, it blinked. Rachel was still smiling sweetly, a heart shining in her hand, She seemed like a saint coming to cleanse the world.The Seven Knights around Rachel looked at Eve, which might seem like a peaceful exchange if you exclude the fact that their weapons could strike at any moment. “Meet again?” asked Eve with a smile on his lips. “Yes, meet.” once again. The last shark summons my soul. He earns her reunion with the other sharks." Soon there was silence. It was the longest few seconds I'd ever had. Then Eve said, "Sure." He hit his finger and then I saw the ground shaking. Soon the knights surrounded Rachel and began to cast spells on the wives. Eve patted his foot and a black mist surrounded him. The spells cast on him were all destroyed as soon as he touched the mist. After a few seconds, the black mist dissipated. Eve nodded, "I'm impatient, I asked for a sliver in my temple, so I'll give it to you." He pointed to a high stone pillar in front of Rachel, the shiny piece resting on a pillow. “There is such bad behavior of priests these days.” Rachel's gaze was fixed on the pieces on the pillow. She moved forward with her hand outstretched as if she had forgotten. Henry's hand on his shoulder, "Rachel, it could be a trap!" “No. It’s not. The piece is pointing at me. It’s the last piece!” Her eyes were frenzied.” Chauri might have nets, Rachel! One of Rachel’s knights shouted “It can’t be that easy!” Rachel tried to stop them one by one. But Rachel got closer and closer to the shark with a crazy look on her face, each of her riders. Except for a warning, he pushed away any hand that was in his path. He finally got the last sliver in his hand. The last crust melted with a heart-like body in his hand. I was blinded by the rays of light for a moment, Dia. When my eyes came again, my heart was now floating in the air. Eve was still sitting on his throne, he had the same confident smile on his face. No wonder he did. Maybe he didn't repeat his life over and over again like me. Yves said he was killed in his first life. Was he killed because he refused to give Rachel a piece? But Rachel did not kill anyone in her search. Yes, this High Priest was mortally wounded, but he was not killed. Seeing his attitude from the start, he did not care about Sharpe. Or in other words, they didn't care about the sharks when they were still separated. Wanted them in one? And Rachel, unknowingly, works for him? He wanted to take the crystal heart out of Rachel's hand, but did Rachel and her knights kill her? But why didn't he do that? He had the strength. Can Rachel just catch the shark? For centuries only Rachel managed to pierce the wings around the Shard in the Wind Temple. Rachel Key? Just who is he? At that very moment, the crystal heart started to shine again and then went straight into Lucian's body. Rachel had a man with silver hair. Rachel's friend. The man who followed Rachel broke the curse of the stray dog ​​that had saved him. Lucian took her heart. Finally Eve abdicated his throne. He got on his knees and put his left hand on his heart and bowed his head. He said, "Lucian, God of Light, please accept my humble compliments." ---------------- Author's note work. Previous Chapter Activity ========== There are some clues in the class. See if you can catch them! see you later! ========== Chapter 28 Gods of Light... What? My eyes moved wide. "God of Light?" Rachel grumbled. So Eve's goal was to revive the God of Light? But wasn't he the High Priest of the Lord of Darkness? And why did he kill him in his first life? I was more confused. Lucian, or the supposed god of light, grabbed his head in pain. "Lucian!" Rachel cried. Hug her and try to calm her pain. "What happened? Why are you in so much pain?" Tears began to fill his eyes. Lucien cried out in pain, holding her head. "Lucian!" A torrent of tears flowed from his face. And what can I do to relieve your pain? I wish I could bear your pain, Lucien. Seeing you this way breaks my heart. “The God of Light is not complete,” Eve said, “until the last piece is returned. Otherwise they are just mortals who have no divine power from God. These memories in particular were not supposed to come to mortals.” “The last piece?” asked Rachel. I have collected every piece I call my soul!” Phrases again. Wait... Soul? Let it be the last. You can cut... Rachel. “Don't you dare. Arden!" Lucian clenched his teeth. He stood forward and saved Rachel from Eve. He tried to use his strength. As Eve said, her strength was nowhere near as divine. Divine level, if Rachel was the last piece, then everything would make sense. If Eve's goal is to revive the God of Light, he must capture Rachel. In the context of The Last Segment, Lucian's apparent defense of Rachel, the Last Segment might mean killing Rachel. Otherwise, Lucian would not have to work on the "Last Snippet" reference. Eve tried He killed Rachel in his first life. Lucian may not have had God's power but he had God's memory. He could find a way to save himself and Rachel. It adds to the fact that the gods have blessed Rachel so much. He is himself a genius unparalleled by the high priests of other temples." What dare you?” asked Eve. He returned to his throne. “I haven’t moved an inch since you entered the dark temple. I am now explaining the position of my hand.” Lucien looked at Eve uncertainly. Wait, what's the point of that last piece?" Rachel imposes herself behind the tight protection of all her seven knights. Eve's lips quivered, "It's in your soul." "My soul?" asked Rachel in confusion. Then his face became fixed, "How can I save my soul?" Lucian? How can I return this last piece of my soul to Lucien?” “No, Rachel, you don’t have to!” His hand gently caressed Rachel’s face. “I can live without the last piece.” Rachel, being Rachel, was none of that. ! you do not see! you are suffering! I must help you! Tell me, your grace, how can I save Lucien?" He reached out and looked at Eve with his teary eyes. "It's easy," Eve's lips were folded into a perfect smile. "All you have to do is die." He broke his finger and immediately Rachel grabbed his heart in pain. Blood started to flow from the corner of his mouth. After that, the knights started attacking Eve. He asked, “What did Rachel do?” Lucian immediately tried to heal Rachel with his own power. But whatever she did, Rachel shed more blood. "I fulfill his wish," said Eve, as he said, and brushed all the spells that had been so easily cast aside. on its way. "Rachel, don't die. Rachel... Rachel..." Lucien murmured softly. He was doing his best, but Rachel's breath became softer and softer. He finally closed his eyes forever after giving Lucien one last smile. Something pricked my heart. Couldn't it be... Rachel's dying like that? that's easy? Rachel made my life miserable but she was still a human being. A man who was good to everyone in his life. Even Eve didn't manage to commit a murder in his first life, but he lost his life in seconds, something wrong, some unnatural, as Rachel's life dries up, something bright comes out shiny. Later he broke into a million. Fragments, one piece flew into Lucian's body. Strength and light crept into his body until he finally transformed. His look did not change, but the enthusiasm he displayed was definitely different from the mortals that were before. He hit Rachel's face one last time and then stood up. "You'll regret it, Jordan," he said, disappearing from the temple. Eve's face turned red. There was a worried look on his face. Anxiety When my vision became blurry, I began to suffer. “It has nothing to do with him, God of Light,” Eve’s voice was heard out of nowhere. Shall we go back to the temple? Then my stranger must be the god of light that I felt. The hand of God on my neck relaxed a little. As soon as my vision became clear, air entered my lungs. Eve was kneeling in front of Lucien, who looked at me with concern in his eyes. "Nothing to do with that?" Lucien was joking. “Don't you think I might, Eve said, 'If it wasn't her birthday present, you could kill my dear Rachel?'” He jumped angrily. It had nothing to do with her. 'I might not be able to kill you,' said Lucien. 'But I can kill her.' She tightened her grip on my neck again. "I can fulfill your wish," said Eve sternly, angrily and cut off Odette's life. Then he began reciting the mantra. Lucien, angry at Eve's words, turned to me. But I loosened my fist. Brutally thrown to the ground. After a gasp of air, my vision faded and Eve's face turned really pale. Finally, get the blood out of his mouth. Cough. "Don't drag her into this mess," she said, holding her breath. "She was supposed to be her father's only daughter and lived her life as a heredity." “But the gods dragged her to their game. They changed her luck. One look at her stepmother, a blessing on Rachel… I fix the mess you made… Please leave her alone…” “I admire your dedication to saving your lover…” he said God Prakash,” But nothing will bring Rachel back to me. No one can bring her down. No one can calm my anger. “Your death too!” With that, a beam erupted from his palm. Like lightning, it struck my stomach. “Odit!” His face became more ashy and began Coughing uncontrollably. I lay on the cold temple marble. Like blood began to flow from my stomach. I was surprisingly calm. It was very familiar to me, death again. Will it end in the end? I thought about Eve's words, were the gods responsible for my misfortune? Were you just a chess piece at his game? To be abandoned after the end of his mission. Something cool to touch my hand. It was Eve, who was wandering his way through the temple. His expression in my second life was similar to that of the night before my death. A sign of sadness, a sign of regret, and what next? "I'm sorry, I ran," she said faintly. She raised an eyebrow in surprise. Did the dictator just apologize? She said wistfully, “I thought I could make it happen by giving that poor girl another chance at life, who was involved in God’s game. I was so full. No one could get away with God.” He stroked my face. This is your last life. ...and my life. All your troubles will be over.” My fingers trembled as I tried to stick his face with my other hand. I smiled with satisfaction, finally realizing that this reincarnation curse for me was not just for his amusement, it was a part of him cursing me. “Could you… finally give me a hug?” I said softly, “I feel cold. Eve hugged me back. As I got colder and colder from losing blood, I felt a god-like presence in the temple. “Odette, live long after that, don’t forget that you will die when you grow up.” Eve whispered in my ear. I looked up inches from my face a moment ago to find a sad mask on his face. In his place was his usual smile. Then I realized that this was his whole plan! No wonder I haven't bled for so long! ------------------- Author's Note All readers have complained about the previous chapter =========== So here's the next chapter === === == === Chapter! see you later! =========== Chapter 29 "Lucian, does that girl really mean that much to you? Should you kill my only supporter for revenge?" A cold voice was heard in the temple. "I don't understand," Lucien exclaimed sadly. "You haven't understood in a thousand years, you still don't understand! Rachel is my life! Without her, what's the point of being God again?" It was a shocking statement. I didn't know if I would appreciate his love or turn a blind eye to such a dramatic statement. I realize now, my wound was severe, but I was not as dead as I expected, the power of God must have been fatal to us, but the wound was not as painful as I expected, and was not equal to the wound I received. My past life is so weird...I'm still in Eve's arm, he had the decency to play a bracelet on my wrist. Back from town, the day Rachel bought her birthday present. She looked at him and returned with a familiar smile. Did you cast a protective spell on the bracelet? To absorb a portion of the energy he threw at Lucian? A sigh brought me back to reality. “I don’t understand where your intense love comes from! How long have you known each other? A few weeks! And then you have to get rid of everything? Even your life?” A cold, disgusted voice. In the middle of the temple, a voice dressed in a black cloak in front of Lucian. “A heartless man will not understand you for a million years,” Lucian replied. Then he began to attack the masked man. “Your order must be to kill Rachel!” “My dear brother, I will save you, if you do not Come back, the other gods will give you the plan for a change! This whole plan is to get you down, don't you understand? He combined a piece of you with that girl's soul and recreated it to lure Rachel into his trap! Look what you would have done if Eve Rachel had not been killed. You are about to unleash your divine power! You are about to die! “That’s my choice! At least as a mortal, I could have spent the rest of my life with Rachel. Now what do I get as a God of Light? Rachel is not with me!” She continued fighting her brother, the God of Darkness. According to legend, the god of light and the god of darkness were actually twins. This means that the shape of the head facing Lucian was a sign of darkness. You must be a god “When do you grow your mind, brother? You are God! You have the power of God!” If you really want your sweet Rachel, collect the pieces of her soul that are floating around while you're still around! Then you still have little chance of reviving it, but what do you do? Kill my only follower, destroy my temple! shouted angrily. The Dark Lord's head figure raised his hand. A circle began to form in his palm. Holds a doll in the other hand. Rachel was formed from the ruins of Lucian in the Temple. He forcefully pushed the globe toward the marble statue and then applauded. "See how she uses God's power! Her body may be damaged, but you can make one for her! Only useless people cry when they have trouble. What a shame for Anna. What a shame for God." The masked character walked towards us leaving her brother who was crying with joy when the marble doll named Rachel opened her eyes. The Dark God's face was still covered in the shadow of the hood. If Lucian's twin brother, are they both the same? And don't let me catch you trying to kill you before I crown the next High Priest! “He mocked Eve angrily.” You will not let the devil come! “Do you care about anything coming? Otherwise, you wouldn't be able to summon my ghost, "Eve pulled me off the ground. Then I realized my wound had stopped bleeding and an iota of pain remained." But, sir, Eve alone continued, “You better go away now. The God of Order can appear at any time. Although reviving Rachel was a wonderful thing, it was against her order book.” He smiled after finishing the sentence. Last. The God of Darkness removed his throat and then said, “The mortal world is always suffocating.” Great Gods my Lord. The Dark God nodded in agreement and then disappeared into the dark mist. I dropped my mouth and watched the entire exchange. Is the God of Darkness afraid of the Order of God “Lord of the Order is a Nightmare,” Eve said, again with a mask of laziness on his face, “The Lord of Light is an idiot. The Lord of Darkness is a talkative old man, you better send him as soon as possible.” "Huh?" "Come on, I'm tired. Let's sleep a little." Then he dragged me and grabbed my hand, leaving the wreckage, the lovebirds, and the third wheel (Rachel Knights) behind. --------------------- Author's Note There is a lot in this ===================== == =============== I promise Rachel will never be seen again, haha, even if her legend continues... Note: I'm considering a title for my new story, companion to this story, the main characters are mentioned here ! Guess who the lucky ones are ;) Here are some titles to keep in mind, which one do you prefer the most? - the villain who failed to bring down the gods - the villain who defeated evil - after the evil failed to bring down the god =========== Chapter 30 I couldn't sleep. What happened to me this evening was blowing my mind. Rachel was killed and then rose from the dead. The silver-haired suitor's dog Rachel is actually a god of light. Just because the dog and God charm is only a reflection, doesn't mean I can accept it! More importantly, I was just a chess piece in God's game. All my sorrows seem irrelevant to him. The Wives and Gods of Darkness kept talking about a game the gods were playing, but what exactly is that game? Rolled for the tenth time. I couldn't sleep, and had to get some answers. “Eve, get up,” I called, and he shook him. "Get up! Get up! Get up!" The man in front of me groaned and covered his eyes with his forearm. "You said you can wake me up whenever you want, but I never expected that. Wait for your curiosity?" "number." "I'm so glad you now know how to use my name, and I'm so happy." He smiled as if he wanted to kill me. "what do you want to know?" "Truth. What are the gods planning?" “Next to us, the gods, but they all lost their memories. Once they signed a pact with the devil, this forced him to give up his memories in exchange for more power. Eve bit his hand into a macaroon and said, “Many years ago humans, gods and animals lived in peace. The gods ignored the existence of animals and considered humans to be their servants, and humans and gods began to invade the land of animals. The gods at that time were still hiding in our land. I found it deadly amusing. This poor balance continued for a long time. Think what happened next? Were the animals sad? If I had been in an animal state, I would have done the same. Animals were originally ignored by humans and humans and humans invaded their habitats. Animals are a great group. Few were as weak as humans, but some were by the power of gods. The mighty decided to rebel. On the gods. They planned to drag the gods down.” “Where did Rachel come from?” The old man said that the animals chose a beauty with a heart of gold and sent her to the Temple of Light. “Roll over. His eyes.” As I said, the gods lag far behind humans. The god of light was a fool. “Was he referring to the Dark God as an old man? He brings someone else together.” So I love the god of light Rachel. But how did he kill him? it's his! " While gods and men used magic, animals were born with their powers and abilities. Didn't you learn anything from bedtime stories? All clues were found. Bedtime stories are stories written by invaders.” He grinned. In those stories, evil animals had all kinds of powers and abilities. They could change their appearance to look like humans, but they were also animals at the same time. Rachel was part animal? “No, it was fatal. An animal hypnotizes her and she goes through exactly the plan. The animals gave her a dagger specially made to smash God's Spirit. And the hypnotic Rachel did. “Dagger. In the end, the soul of the God of Light shattered into millions of pieces.” “Did God not notice anything at that time?” I asked the Dark God and his High Priest knew a lot of details. Well," Eve smiled mischievously, "Do you think it's possible? These are dark thoughts and dark plans. "" So ... Did the Dark God know about this plan? Didn't that prevent him from killing his brother? "He found it amusing," said Eve shyly. The most fun thing he's found in years. He was not neutral at first. He is the god of darkness. He may start a war to please himself. For all I know, the idea that monsters invaded Earth may have inspired him.” So when the animals planned to kill his brother, and his plan was accomplished, did he stay with him? “He is God. God is proud and narcissistic” laughs Eve “Who knew his brother was that stupid?” He thought his brother could capture Rachel and kill her, but in the end his brother found love more important than God “But by collecting pieces of his soul they can revive him, so why Put it in your temples? I indicated. “The gods are all a bunch of lunatics hungry for power. Then the Twin Brothers of Light and Darkness were so powerful, they were like kings over them. Now one of them has fallen. Do you think they will allow God to revive them and revive the Light? To rule again?” But the Dark God wouldn’t agree?” “Who knows what the old man was thinking at that time? Maybe he was having fun. Perhaps he thought his foolish brother deserved punishment. Perhaps he was too shy to say anything. If it were me, I'd be like this. "Let a fool rot in hell." But monsters still failed, right? “Although the other gods backed down when they killed the mighty monsters. The gods responded, Lord, by expressing their gratitude by banishing them to the Forbidden Forest. The gods are ungrateful. "She nodded her head." The god of darkness said that the gods recreated Rachel as a trap for the god of light. If they wanted the God of Light gone, why would Rachel start over to revive him now? See how sleep deprivation can wreak havoc on your brain? I used my mind. "It's the dark side." There is a god who wants to revive his brother. Or why do I inflict the curse of reincarnation that we hate so much? "wait ... After Lucian had regained all his memory, he chose to live and die as a human rather than kill Rachel. The other gods wanted to kill. Lucien at once! My eyes moved wide. "Like I said, the world is a chessboard for the gods. We are just chess pieces." Eve looked at me with his red eyes. "Now, that I've told you a bedtime story, it's time for bed." ------------------- Author's note is about to expire! Now more clues are emerging about my next story: D Can you guess the heroes now? After the bad guys fail to overthrow the evil gods, the best VS. who are you? ========== CHAPTER 31 Life is back to normal, except that Rachel is gone or her knights have been crying amongst themselves. , much to the annoyance of their high priests, I didn't know where Rachel had gone, but I felt that Lucian had brought him back to his divine presence. After Rachel left, she became the only heir to the family. Again with my marriage problem. "Odette," she sighed. " I think you have an understanding of the situation we're in. Rachel... has been out of contact for a few months. Henry’s family… ah… worried.” “Does he care about his runaway bride or the fact that Henry has been crying like a loser all day?” After a long silence, the father replied, “Both.” “Henry is a loser and now you see how he loves Rachel, Do you still want to marry her?” She raised an eyebrow. “Not at all!” The father’s face flushed with anger: “I will not allow my daughter to marry such a loser!” “Ah, are we done then?” “Thing, Odette. I'm afraid they might have their eyes on you again. Now that Rachel is gone, you'll be a candidate again. You know the Henry family wants to join us. Everyone in the world is a chess piece,” I whispered curiously. My father was shocked at my words. After a while, he finally said, “Henry, I know you don't want to marry. That's why you should get married soon. For someone you love, of your choosing, before they turn into Rachel." He lost all hope. I'm just a priest in the Temple of the Winds, but Henry's grandfather is the high priest. Grandfather, if you ask the emperor to marry his family, I can't stop it." That's what my father has been telling me for a long time. Who do I want to marry according to my choice? An image of a person popped into my mind. I quickly pushed him back. In my imagination we met several times after that incident, but he left me as before. We were teasing or managing, we were only the chief and his servants, nothing more. He cursed me for reincarnation, in part because he took pity on me, but in large part because he wanted to entertain. I think things are cancelled. "What do you want me to do?" "This is a list of eligible young men who can marry into our family. Odette, you don't have to leave the house. I invited her to the family dinner." I nodded once and left the room. Everyone in this world is a chess piece in the other's game. I sighed. ---------------------------- I met the candidate after the candidate's father chose me. It was undoubtedly one of the most deserving and desirable husband choices in society. But I didn't get excited when he dazzled me with his jokes or when he invited me to dance. I knew that to avoid the fate of marrying Henry, I had to choose someone I liked and marry early. But everything felt wrong. I couldn't understand any of them. He still thought I was a spoiled and naive heir. Some people said that I would stay at home after marriage, and now there was no need to study at the Temple. But now I'm crazy asshole was not the caliph. I want to have meaning in life. Something must be done. I have some work. Something to be proud of. They will never understand the fatigue I have felt in so many lives. Worrying that one day another Rachel will come and steal everything. Even though I was surrounded by many people, I felt lonely. "If you marry me, I can buy you one, whether it's jewelry or a handbag!" said the man standing in front of me. I don't need anyone to buy me anything. I can buy it..." She loves to buy things herself. With her own money,” someone tweets. I turn my head and smile as I see Eve standing behind me. “Who are you?” The man shouted angrily. “Why are you here?” I asked at the same time. “I’m bored. You're having a great party here, I couldn't name Eve. “What is this… what…” “I am loving your daughter” with a mischievous smile on her face. The father widened his eyes in astonishment. Hearing what he said, my heart literally stopped for a few seconds. After that my heart started beating like a horse to make things right. What he was saying must be one of his jokes. "Am I right, Ran?" Squeeze a strand of my hair behind my ear. How should I act? Was it funny, it must be funny. ok right? "Odette?" His eyes narrowed at the warning and returned the coldness she felt now. He was really angry. angry about what? Because I decided to choose a husband without telling him? I muttered, pulling at Eve: "If you'll forgive the two of us, Dad." And what does that mean? " I said with wet teeth.” “I guess that’s my question. What does this mean? Husband-choice party?” “We… you… but…” I couldn't form a complete sentence. The rage within me finally helped me say, 'You never did anything I tell! How am I going to know? How do I know if something else is a joke?' 'Yes! He seems a bit mean, poor of the common people. He…” “Oh, shut up if you don’t want to be bald the next moment!” “How boring and disgusting,” I cried,” Eve interrupted. “Don’t you think it would be more interesting if he turned into a big fat toad?” “And is it delicious?” I answered. “Odette, can I have some clarification?” he asked. Father again.” “Dad, this… ah… High Priest of Darkness…” observed the father, fainting. And yes I want to kidnap your daughter in the Temple of Darkness. here.” Eve smiled sweetly. Then the father fainted. “Do you have to say something like that?” “Well, isn't that a joke?” I rolled my eyes in response. ------------- Note Author Introduction Hope you like this chapter =========== I really love XD Also in this universe - Just posted! A demo from Odette's story There is a defeated villain in every story What happens to the defeated villain? After Lorelei's plot to overthrow the gods fails, her power and voice are stripped away.The mermaid becomes tied to a lake, protected by her enemy (God).It is a story between a defeated villain and his enemies.Oops!Esta Imageum Nao as Diracres de Contodo by Sego Nosa.The acclaimed publisher continues. Depiction of the different rimova-o au carrega uma Conclusion A girl with dark dark hair and ruby ​​red eyes sat under a huge tree. Snow was falling from the sky, and slowly the fur coat turned white. "If you ask them they will stay." Said the Golden Winged Crow, sitting on a branch. The girl replied, "I know. If you ask them to stay for a few years, they will. Because they loved me." So why didn't you do that? “The crow asked again.” Because this is life. Everything has an end. You live, you grow up and then you die. It makes life precious and meaningful. “I am not dying, but I find my life worthwhile. "A laughter came from the girl." No, you don't. Years ago I lost the meaning of life. If so, why are you now comforting a little girl like me? "The silence of the girl's face." My parents all wanted me to die after living a long and meaningful life. disappeared after s. the girl. "Do you want me to tell you a secret?" asked the masker after a long time. "Entertain yourself by telling a secret?" He turned around and wiped the tears from his face. After a moment the man under the headscarf bowed his head and said, “I think this will amuse both of us.” The girl looked at him anxiously and finally nodded. The man under the hood smiled and leaned forward, whispering something in the girl's ear. The girl rolled her eyes. I bent down and grabbed a handful of snowflakes and threw them at the masked man screaming "I will never trust you!" The man's laughter spread throughout the garden ನ ನ. ನ, ನ ನ, ನ ನ. ನ ನ ನ ನ ನ. Ethnic group, ethnic group. “.., ನ.,” ಸುಳ್ಳುಗಾರನ. “ನನು ನ,” ವಿದಾಯ, ನ. “ನ ನ ನನು! Racial, ethno-ethnic, ethno-ethnic group, so I’m so glad I finished this story! I hope you all enjoyed reading Odette and Eve’s story! The whole time I was publishing the story, I was afraid that you, the reader, would find out the secret ( Maybe you already have, just shut up about it.) The truth is that Odette has not reincarnated five times, only four times. Odette has lived 5 lives, but has not gone through the process of reincarnation 5 times. But when I found out, more than 10 chapters have already been published And the Reborn Four Times isn't quite as good as the Villainness title now. So... as I mentioned earlier in another author's comment, I love reincarnation stories. I also love a good villain who realizes his mistakes and turns a good story. But the stories available these days don't satisfy me, so I decided to write one myself! Here's the inspiration for this story. Thanks again for watching this story. Your comments and support really motivate me to keep writing this story! see you later! If you really like my stories and want to support: https://ko-fi.com/butterfly_effect 1/2/2020-2/5/2020 Also in this universe - published now! View from Odette's story. com/butterfly_effect 1/2/2020-2/5/2020 Also in this world - now posted! View from Odette's story. com/butterfly_effect 1/2/2020-2/5/2020 Also in this world - now posted! View from Odette's story. Oops! Esta Imageum Nao as Diracris de Contodo by Sego Nosa. The image of the publisher, Ehsan Dolo, Rimowa or Kariga Uma, is different. Each story has a defeated villain. What happens to the defeated villain? After Lorelei's plot to overthrow the gods fails, her power and voice are stripped away. The mermaid became tied to a lake, protected by her enemy (God). It is a story between a defeated villain and his enemies. Butterfly_effect ========= The reincarnation of the villain Five times in the first chapter I was wondering how to spend my fifth life. Yes, my fifth life. I'm living the same life for the fifth time. I suffered burning, guillotine, hanging and stabbing. And all my sad endings are tied to one person, my half-sister Rachel. Today is the day Rachel's mother married my father, Duke Cecil. It was the end of my beloved heir's life. After trying everything four times, I knew I wasn't the spoiled heir I loved. You are just a tool. A tool that connects two of the continent's most powerful families. Papa didn't like me. If a more modest, beautiful, and more temperamental Rachel takes my place, so be it. Compared to Rachel, I was just a disappointment. A temperamental person who only knows how to spend money. Over time, it became a disgrace to the family. He would have rejected me if his pride had allowed him to do so. In my first life I was a spoiled, childish heir. Looking at Rachel, I thought she was a silly country girl with no manners. She'll never be like me, he showed me the best too. I was very childish but I was wrong I played Rachel's stepfather. Contrary to my famous bad temper, Rachel had perfect manners and temperament. Rachel was beautiful, but I was a person with fun characteristics. Rachel had more talent for magic than I did. Rachel shone on all sides and I shivered in her shadow. I did not expect that. I didn't think I was about to fly in the shadows. My pride couldn't stand it. I was full of jealousy. When my fiancé also fell in love with Rachel and told my dad that he wanted to marry Rachel, that was the last straw. I am the villainous villain in every romance story. Looking back, I knew it was childish and not worth it. What I was doing was just a pathetic joke to Rachel. But do I deserve to face my death? Burning in front of everyone? Do you know the pain of the burn? Do you know how your skin and tissues look and smell like turning to ash? Do you know the frustration of knowing your life is burning up a bit? I never physically harmed anyone. It's just angry words and hysterics as every spoiled heir threw his tantrums. The worst thing I did was try to trick Maya into trying to win the duel. I was really stupid. So I fell into someone's trapComrades Rachel and I ended my tragic life. And this endless hell began. That's when I realized I was reborn in my second life. I was full of hate and anger, I wanted revenge. So much so that my second life ended faster than my first. I learned from my last death. I was determined to avoid Rachel and her marriage streak at all costs in my third life. Rachel was like the heroine in the story. All the gods were on her side, as well as a series of people who would do whatever Rachel commanded or called her to do. I have lived longer than that life. In my quest to escape Rachel at all costs, I ran away from home and ran across the ocean to a continent that hates the peoples of our own. Seven years later, I thought I could finally stop hiding in fear outside. I thought I could go home. I had planned to settle in a small villa in the countryside. Once I bought my little villa, I was enchanted. I was told that my father, with whom I had not been in contact in years, had plans to betray. And I must secretly help my father. As for my dear half-sister, who has been the perfect daughter of my dear father all these years, she certainly knows no such thing! It was pure as snow! She was innocent! I was told that my punishment was worse for trying to insult Queen Rachel. It also predicted the wicked stepmother who threatened Rachel. When I ran away when Rachel entered the scene I had no idea how evil my stepmother had become. I have been hanged. At the age of four I got rid of my pride. I can no longer bear this endless rebirth. I thought that if I could also die like normal people, then the torture would end. I pretended to be the best sister. Whatever Rachel wanted, I gave her. I was his best friend too. Throwing myself into the process, I was a puppet doing Rachel's order. It all ended when a devastated woman, left to childhood sweetheart Rachel, storms the tea party into a frenzy with a knife. After a while, Rachel hid behind me and stabbed me. Not expecting it, I was busy serving Rachel's tea. I couldn't even say defensive spells. Thinking of all my failed attempts to survive, I had little hope of my fifth life. Sarah then ran into the room and shouted, "They've arrived, Mrs. Odette!" I have to stop sleeping in my bed. I have to start facing my fifth life. Let this life be my last. Let's really die this time. ---------- Author's Note Hello! Thanks for reading. I hope you liked the beginning of this new story. Why did Odette reincarnate over time? Who is this Rachel? Tell me what you think! Updates happen every Tuesday and Friday. This story takes place in the same world as my other stories, but on a different continent. So, it's free! ========== Chapter Two "Odette!" Rachel said with a slight blush on her face. "Can I call you Odette? I... I guess it wouldn't make me very far. But I really wish we were closer sisters, Odette." She smiles politely with her smoky lavender eyes. Before I could say anything, Dad said, “Sure Rachel can. We are all family.” He smiled at her and looked at me purposefully. She took a sip of her tea and smiled, 'Sure, Rachel. We're all family. Yesterday's wedding was quiet. Rachel became the talk of the capital in her stunning red dress, showing off her feminine looks like porcelain whites and lavender eyes. I wore a simple navy blue dress, no more Foolishness. To think I could put her down dressed like my eldest son. I decided to stay innocent for a while, and no longer run. It proved ineffective. I thought I would let go of my pride and myself and use myself as a shield in times of danger to please Rachel. Of the four lives when I played Rachel's antagonist. Maybe I should consider playing the villain again? I'd rather live happily than misery if I had to repeat it over and over. I knew it wasn't Rachel's fault, the gods had blessed her. And although in the end I got more punishment than I deserved, I was wrong. Of course I am not a well-meaning girl. I liked to compare myself to the people around me and when people were better than me, I became a bitter and angry beast. I never really appreciated what I had. Thanks for letting someone know that in my past life, I was very aware of my guilt. I have now decided to follow the flow of life. "Odette, what are you doing today, let's hang out together! So... you don't mind, that's it." Rachel smiled shyly. "I don't know anyone here." The father commanded, "Odette, bring Rachel with you. Go and meet some friends." "Hana's having a tea party tomorrow. I'll take Rachel with me." I remember Hana's tea party. No matter how she changed, how she acted, Hannah's tea party was an event that never changed. Rachel was humiliated. No matter how hard I tried to stop the humiliation. As it went on, it was like a certain plot in a novel, the way it always should. Apparently, if I did not participate, then the heir would be the chief of the congregation of people who insult Rachel. In another notable family, if I had veered to Rachel's side and tried to defend her, my logical argument would backfire, so it looked like I was making a sarcastic comment on Rachel. The next day the same rumors spread about my hatred of my stepmother. I once tried to hide so as not to get involved in insulting everyone at once. When I got back, Rachel was blinking her deer eyes and looking at me silently with disdain. Everyone starts thinking with eyes that I am the one who orders my friends to do this. There is no way to avoid this. Whatever you do, two things are going to get out of this tea party. Rumors spread that I hated Rachel and that one of her attackers saved her from her humiliation. From my past life experience, I could still be friends with Rachel after this incident, but if she secretly hated me, I wouldn't know. What should I do at this time? What if I don't? Bring Rachel to the tea party? At some point in my life my father forced me to take her there and after a while I agreed because I wanted to humiliate her at the party like my wicked stepmother. In another life, I thought, if I hadn't made a scene, it wouldn't have been such an embarrassment. Not at all you know better now. There were some important events that had to happen anyway. They were like the foundation of a building. Like a tea party, where Rachel must be humiliated and meet one of her companions. Wait... Sweetheart? Think about it, all those cornerstones included Rachel and her thieves in one way or another. Can i change it? What if Rachel can't meet her first tea party partner? Sutter Number One is the son of the Duke, Lord Hank. This duke was a powerful priest serving the God of Thunder. In our country there were different temples serving different deities. Every noble family had a deity to serve. Nobles send their children to temples to study. The chosen lineage will become a priest or priest of this temple. The process of selecting priests and priests usually involves fighting each other with their magic. The peoples of our continent, unlike the peoples who live across the ocean continent, can practice sorcery or sorcery, which becomes more distinguished after learning in the temple. Most of the power in our country is divided between priests and priests of various temples. That is why wealthy people always send their children to temples in the hope that their children will become priests or priests. His family becomes more powerful when he comes to power. My family once had hope, but unfortunately, I wasn't particularly gifted at magic. That is why he turned to the most talented Rachel, even though they were not from the family by blood. Lord Hank has been engaged to Lady Florence since he was little and the word is, they get along well. But he fell in love with Rachel at first sight. Lady Florence is one of the candidates for the priesthood by her master. On the day of the last choice in my past life, she receives a letter from Hank regarding the termination of her engagement. This had a bad effect on her, she was injured in the process and lost the match. She became a priestess second only to her opponent, but after that match her face burned. It really is a tragedy. What if Hank never met Rachel at the tea party? Then, a few days later, Florence did not hesitate to choose her. Their participation ends one way or the other. Hank sooner or later meets Rachel and falls in love with her. But what if you delay their meeting until Florence's election is over? It's not really worth losing your place and face to some jerk. But how do we prevent this tea party from happening? ---------- AUTHOR'S NOTE SECOND ========== Chapter 2! We have more information about which country Odette lives in! And of course Odette's stepmother Rachel. What is Odate Scheme? Odette has outlived all those lives. These lives are really his past, but to others it's like a reset. Hope this is understood! Thank you for reading this story. Tell me what you think! I hope you like it! ========== Chapter Three "Lady Odette, where are you going?" Seeing me climb out the window, my maid freaked out. "Hush!" I cast a spell to prevent Sarah from seeing Sarah flee the house in the middle of the night. Sarah wanted to speak again, but found that she could not speak. He looked at me unacceptably and said, "Lady Odette! It's almost midnight!" "Yes, I know. That's why I chose to sneak out now!" I rolled my eyes and then a sleeping spell erupted before Sarah started sinking into me. Sarah fell to the ground. "Sleep well! See you tomorrow!" I got out of my bedroom window and jumped down. As I jumped, I cast a simple wind spell to control my descent. The god that my family served was the god of the wind. When I was ten years old, I was sent to Pawan Mandir. My father expected me to hold at least one priestly office, not a high office, but only a low one. But I couldn't do that either. Can I master simple spells related to wind, but more complex and advanced spells? I could not master it as my father and teachers wanted. But a slight gust of wind was enough to plan my escape. To avoid going to the tea party, I had to make a potion. A drug that makes me think I have the flu. Disease A disease that doctors can't understand I'm fake. Why do I know the arts of the Dark Lord? From my second life I really turned into a villain. Do you think I used it on Rachel? Of course not, someone's laziness made me do the work of a dark priest. I remember the ingredients for that potion and because I made over twenty of them at the time. I pulled the blanket over my head to make sure it covered my face and quickly went into the woods near my property. Medicines are just simple herbs. I have to find them in the woods. After a few hours, I finally gathered all the ingredients I needed. Stretching out my narrow limbs, I saw a crow sitting next to me on a tree branch. As soon as he saw me, he bowed his head and roared. Then he flapped his wings and flew away. As it flew in front of me, a black wing of a crow flew up and landed next to my leg. I picked it up. Under the moonlight, there seemed to be a little gold in the shimmering feather. "It can't be... No it can't be." I laughed dryly. Although I could no longer believe that the crow was really that crow, I kept the feather in my pocket. "Just in case. Just in case." I patted my pocket for good measure. ------------------- “Odette, Sarah said you got sick,” my father looked me in the eye suspiciously. When I was younger I tried to pretend to be sick a few times. The old days when I was still naive and young. My dad was thinking I might get sick so I wouldn't have to bring Rachel to the tea party. Surprisingly my dad is absolutely right this time, but unfortunately he won't be able to reveal the truth. " Dad, I'm not feeling well. I might need a doctor." I sneezed. "Please tell Rachel I can't bring her to the tea party, I'm sorry." I sneezed again. And a call.. Sarah bring me an invite! Please don't let me hold Rachel, maybe Rachel can go. Alone. Rachel must be very disappointed.” I wiped small tears from my eyes. Only then did the door open and Rachel came in. “How do you feel, Odette? You look frenetic! My dear Odette. How are you, my dear Odette?” Rachel cried anxiously, her lavender eyes as blurred as she imagined. Rachel must run to meet me. It's true that your enemy knew you very well" Rachel, I'm sorry. Here's the invitation, looks like you'll have to go alone. That's a pity. I thought I'd go with you to the first tea party, "Sigh, wipe my eyes with a handkerchief." Don't run. I'm sorry you suffer now." Rachel had tears in her eyes. Saying he squeezed my hand. “Rachel…” I actually pretended to be touching. I've learned something from myself. My acting has improved a lot in a past life. I knew how to act to look like gorgeous and beautiful sisters. The way my dad would be happy. When it's real, I want to talk. Do you believe you have? Deep feelings for someone you only knew for one day? "Rachel, don't let me stop you. It's tea party time, get ready!" I waved my handkerchief towards the door. Father nodded at Rachel. "I heard what your sister said. Get ready." Fighting the will to direct my eyes to this offer of a father's love, Rachel waited for her to decline. Heartbroken when she went out to play, Rachel did not leave her sick sister alone in her sick bed. "No. I'm not going!" Rachel cried. "How can I leave my sister here alone while I'm enjoying myself? I can't forgive myself! I'll be here and take care of Odette!" "As expected of a Hera's daughter," said the father, with a look of approval on his face. "Odette, learn something from your sister. Get some rest." Then he left the room. As expected of my father. Come on, from now on we will always compare. Although Rachel shines to last, I will always be incompetent by comparison. "Odette, would you like a cup of hot tea?" Rachel smiled sweetly. "That would be great." I smiled again. Now I had to keep Rachel at home until Mrs. Florence made her final choice. Lord Hank may have to wait a little longer to meet your true love. “I smiled as I drank the tea. —Author’s note A little joke from Odette ;P Hope you enjoy reading this ============ ==== Let’s see you again! ========= = Chapter 4 An invitation to a festive party was sent to Mrs. Florence to our house a week later. Father thought it would be a good opportunity for Rachel to enter the community. Now that I have recovered from a severe cold, I asked Rachel that I found this harsh to Mrs. Florence. Will Lord Hank fall in love with Rachel at his own party? But I couldn't pretend to be sick again, could I? Then the idea itself was getting old. And there was another problem, the crow feathers I brought from the forest were actually shimmering golden when they were flying under the sun. This means that the crow you met that night was actually the same crow. Why was this crow so far from home? He must be as lazy as his master. I shouldn't care, we don't know each other in this life. That's right, I have to pretend I've never seen this crow before. I want to burn wings. My thoughts were cut short when Sarah walked into my room and shouted excitedly, "Looks like Mrs. Rachel was robbed in the street!" "What? Where are the servants?" It certainly hasn't happened in the past few ages. What if they think it's my job again? Mrs. Rachel saw some orphans in the street, so he bought bread with money from his wallet. He ordered his maid and guard to distribute it. She was distributing money when she was robbed! "" I will see. "I rub my fingers in my temple. It's definitely something Rachel does, it's a miracle she doesn't get robbed very often." What hurt him? " "not at all! Here comes the most exciting part, Lord Hank saves her! Lady Rachel was clearly shocked and terrified, so Lord Hank saved her! Still in the drawing room here comes the most exciting part, Lord Hank saving her! Lady Rachel was clearly shocked and terrified, so Lord Hank saved her! Still in the drawing room here comes the most exciting part, Lord Hank saving her! Lady Rachel was clearly shocked and terrified, so Lord Hank saved her! Still in the drawing room I was! When Sarah saw me, a laugh came out of my throat. anxiously. And here are two ladies I was so worried that Florence would ruin their celebration. The first day I left Rachel out of the estate, I immediately met Lord Hank. Really no one can escape. Maybe in an instant, he'll post how you hired thieves to scare poor Rachel. But in this life, she finally changed the fate of Lady Florence, so as not to waste her time with this capricious fiancé. I didn't want another stupid girl to turn evil because her fiancé cheated on her like I was in my first life. It's not worth it. If I can save them, I will know where it all goes. Why didn't Rachel come to my room that night and tell me about your big adventure today? When he mentioned Lord Hank, so his face lit up and he waved his hand excitedly and told how brave Lord Hank was. Young woman pretending to love someone for the first time. This is Rachel. In each marriage, she acted as she liked or loved him. This blush in her lavender eyes every time and a look of admiration and adoration. As I pretended to be her best sister in my previous life, I asked her if every friend should suggest who she should choose. She couldn't choose. Sometimes I wonder if she really loves any of them or is she really incapable of love. "Odette, I think I should thank Lord Hank. He's a gentleman. He knew I was afraid, and he brought me back! You never saw how brave he was back then!" I felt safe in her arms! "All I can do is put a fake smile on my face." Do you know what kind of gift you might like? “I don't know for sure, I'm not really familiar with him. And I'm sorry, Rachel. She smiled apologetically, 'How would you feel if you baked some cookies? Do you think he will like her? "I have no doubt that he will love everything you do. I muttered under my breath." Your gratitude is what matters, "Another fake happy smile." I will go find him. Outside. Recipe, Lord Hank said he would show up across town tomorrow. It really pleases him, right? "" surely. So Lord Hank didn't. After stopping to think about your engagement for a second and set a date? After Rachel left my room, I wrote Mrs. Florence a note in an elaborate handwriting, so that it could not be returned to me. That night I entered again. When I got to Mrs. Florence's house, I realized a big problem. How can I send this note to Florence without waking anyone? I have now lost Isobel, a feline acquaintance I had in my second life. If Isobel had been here, a note could have been sent easily. In my third and fourth life, I thought of raising Isobel again, but decided to refuse it. I couldn't separate the things I loved so much and couldn't remember when I had to start over. I only remember past memories, but not one of them. They are no longer the people I met in my past life. Adding to the fact that I won't cross Isobel with the current route I'm on. She smiled anxiously, hoping that Isabel would meet a better owner in this life. Now I have to solve the current problem, how can I leave this note in Florence's room without alerting anyone? Using magic was kind of dangerous. Legacies often cast spells around the building to discover unfamiliar magic. "You can go out," said a voice in front of me. "I can feel you there. It means you weren't hurt." This is Florence. She went out alone, wearing only a cloak over her night dress. "I am a priest of the Goddess of Hope. I feel deep despair and desire for hope." So he left me. I was awake but now that she was here, I had to give her a note. I pick up the note like a dart. It landed a few inches below his feet. Then I turned and melted into the dark. Do you want extreme despair and hope? Can you feel my desire to die? I laughed at a cruel joke. ---------------- Thanks for reading the author's note! Hope you liked this chapter ============ See you later! ========== Chapter Five Word quickly spread that Lady Florence was breaking off her engagement to Lord Hank. "Odette, how could Lady Florence break off her engagement to Lord Hank?" Rachel complained angrily. "What a gentleman Lord Hank is! He is a mighty wizard but very kind to the weak! Lord Hank is deeply moved by the news! His opponent tells him that it is a well-known secret among the rich others, as his family has withheld the news from him to avoid being distracted. At that time, as planned. , Lord Hank's servant brought him a letter from Lord Hank about the broken courtship. There was no respect for him or his family. Florence is a girl known for her sensitivity. If she had the chance to see how Lord Hank treated Rachel and how he treated her, she would have known how to act. All her loved ones looked at her In the same way, the polka-dotted look, the honey and honey look. It's very easy to tell the difference between you and Rachel. There is no chance of getting in between them. The best way is to break it all down before the gossip breaks down." Poor Lord Hank!” cried Rachel. I wish I could comfort her. “Lord Hank was one hundred percent behaving in front of Rachel to go and comfort her.” He was so kind to me, it was time for me to give him the money back! “Rachel clapped her hands excitedly.” Odette I'm sorry I have to go now.” I gave her a pretty smile. Di and waved your hand. Just go! You know I want to hear about your love life. What's your opinion? Shortly after she left the room. When I came out of the room, I rolled my eyes and fell on the chair, covering my face with the book I was reading. What would happen next? I thought. There are some events that always happen in my past life. Let's call it a cornerstone. One of them is meeting Lord Hank at a tea party. I meddle a little in this life, but luck still brings the two together. Now what's the next cornerstone? "Ah! There must be a meeting with my stupid fiancé!" I sat down, my face book falling into my lap. At the same time, the golden crow feather that I had planted in the book also flew into my bosom. "I had to burn it." As I sighed under my breath, I inserted the feather again into my leather-covered book. It's time for my father to take me back to the temple. Originally, sending Rachel to the Temple of the Winds wasn't even in the father's mind. But then my new stepmother intervened and told Rachel that she had dreamed of becoming a priestess since childhood. He thought it was some kind of prophecy. Or why did Rachel have the same dream since she was four years old? Baba was pretty sure. If Odette had any hope of becoming a priest, then what about Rachel? So Rachel was following me to the temple in a few weeks. My fiancée, Henry, comes from a family that serves the god of the wind. That's when Rachel met him. I knew nothing of Rachel, but here Henry fell in love with her. Rachel was not able to focus on her studies, so she asked for my help. In my first life, I was an evil stepmother who expelled her after some kind of humiliation. In the end, it was Henry who taught him. Then Henry said he had to call off our engagement because he loved Rachel so much. Check out the pattern here! Rachel met a man, the man fell deeply in love and then broke off the engagement. Wherever Rachel goes, she leaves traces of broken hearts. Girls are heartbreakers. After he died in his first life, she reversed. Why do I like it so much? Was it really worth it? Or am I just so angry that Rachel stole something from me again and am jealous? Was it all my stupid pride? When I saw Henry for the first time in my second life, I felt nothing for him but anger and hatred for his planning to kill me with the other attackers. I had no trace of jealousy when he was with Rachel. Even when they flirt here and there. Then I realized I don't like Henry as much as I thought. This is all my stupid pride. Anger starts to rise in my body now that I think about it. Do you know how humiliating that was? How offended do you feel when everyone you know points their fingers behind your back and makes fun of you? No, I won't let this happen to me again! I swear to God inwardly. Then how do we speed things up? My lips can't swell in this upcoming drama. ------------------- Author's Note This is the second time Odette has talked about crow feathers. What is her secret? What will Odette do with her ex-fiancé Henry? Stay tuned! Thanks for reading, see you next time! ========== Chapter Six “Odette, I heard you were bugging in your room recently,” said the father disapprovingly. In the past he always asked me to study more, now I study in my room all day, he did not agree. I wanted to move my eyes. To be clear, my personality had changed a lot after four years and he didn't suspect anything. I want to commend my father for being very sensitive. But now it's time to speed up my plan. The father declared "I..." Odette, Rachel will follow you when you return to the temple next week.” “We can be together, Odette! I'm so happy!” Rachel, who was sitting next to me, held my hand excitedly. “Really?” I pretended to be surprised. “You know Rachel is busy studying to prepare herself! and what are you doing? Read useless romance novels all day long! Let's read together! I can't wait to read with us at Temple! This will be fun." I laughed happily. I nodded. While I didn't want to be in the same room with Rachel for a second, that was essential to my future plans. "Odette, can you show me how to cast a first-rate wind spell?" Rachel asked blushing and hesitating “Let me think about it. Well..." I looked at the book of magic in his hand and then put my head in my hands so I was thinking. "I'll try." I naturally created a mess of mantras. It's over. Anomalies and strong winds were too weak to keep you out of your hand. "Oooops. When I got back to the room, I pulled the note out of the drawer. Dr wrote a few days ago and handed it to Sarah. Send it to Lord Henry. “Lady Odette, you are finally getting close to Lord Henry!” All smiles. "I was so worried. I thought you two quarreled! She hadn't asked me to send him notes in weeks! Since the Duke got married!" Of course, it was a time of rebirth for me. Who wanted to exchange love letters with Henry? When I was younger, I thought exchanging love letters was a very romantic thing. I wrote message after message. For Henry, in return I get a "Really!" , "this is interesting!" I still think so because I thought Henry wasn't good with words. This illusion was shattered when I saw his love letter to Rachel. Never a bad word for someone you don't want to talk to. I was so innocent I shivered from the flashback of my naive and airy face. I threw my leather-covered book on my bed and continued reading" Just send a note.” I waved at Sarah. --------------------- “Rachel, I found you a great study partner!” I looked at the library I was reading. “Odette! You're here!" cried Rachel. She looked pretty as usual. The morning sun shone on her lavender eyes, making them sparkle like sapphires. I prefer "Rachel, this is Henry." She took Henry to the library. "He. A fellow student studying at the Temple of the Wind God.” Looking at Rachel, I saw Henry stiffen. Excellent “Henry, this is my sister Rachel. You'll also be a disciple in the temple." She pulled a chair across from Rachel and took Henry to sit down. "Well, we have a lot of questions about the mantra. I'm sure you'll be more than happy to teach us." When I was younger, I tried to imitate the sweet champagne tone while confronting Henry. "Oh! What silly of me, what do we miss? snacks! I will be back in a while! Or not.” I smiled as I left the library. As I closed the door, I heard Henry say to Rachel, slightly embarrassed, "Odette won't be back." "Why?" I can imagine Rachel taking her eyes away from this answer. And it was her natural gait, she hated studying, "Henry sighed." You will not come back. You said there's some cheer you want to hear? "" Oh yes! "I went back to my room and lay on my four-poster bed. I took the leather-covered notebook from under my pillow and put it between the pages in a whisper. A raven's feather muttered," Who said I hate studies. Look what I do now! Read a school history book! ---------------- Author's Note What is Odette's plan? And why was Odette studying history? See you again! Chapter Seven “Lady Odette, Lord Henry has arrived. Sarah explained that they are in the library. I gave her a vague nod as I turned the page of the leather-covered section. " Lady Odette, did you and Lord Henry really quarrel? You rarely leave your room to meet him! “This is because I don’t want to meet him,” I imagined rolling my eyes. But he came to visit you! He cares about you a lot, so come here to teach you! "I laughed at all this fake news." Good. I will go and meet him today. Now boots, I can't believe this could happen in real life! I opened the library door and shouted excitedly: You've eaten your breakfast! Henry jumped up at the sound of my voice and immediately leaned as far from Rachel as he could. He started making doodles on paper in the foreground. "Odette! I... I was wondering where you've been for the past few days!" Rachel said her face was still red. “It is not the same without studying with us! You said you would study with me. But you never showed up. Only me and I left!” “Now I’m back, with snacks!” I laughed. I must have left them! I'll ask... "" I go! "Rachel jumped out of her seat and left the room. Her face was still red." Tell Sarah to get it, I finished the sentence. The library door blushed and went to conclude, “Hello, Enri. So that's all we have left. "I laughed." Well…yes…” Enri said in disgust. “You must read, Odette, Rachel is so talented,” said Henry, “she’s been so caught up in when I’ve been playing for the past few days.” I quietly thought she would catch up with you too and overtake you. Soon.” Leaning on the wooden door of the library was still smiling, “You should thank me, Henry. Do you enjoy reading with Rachel? Just the two of you.” “What… what…” Enri stuttered and her ears reddened. “Calm down, calm down,” I said innocently, “Calm down, calm down. All I'm saying is that you both seem to be good classmates." "Oh, Henry, you didn't mention the fact that you were my fiancée to Rachel, did you?" No why on me?” Henry was hovering inconsolably. “I get it, I get it. If you mentioned that little conversation, Rachel wouldn't be able to flirt with you. Totally understandable.” “What… we don’t…” “Don't bother. Don't bother." I tried to signal him to calm down. And I made a deal. A deal you won't regret. "My lip shivered" Work? "Let's break up" "What? Odette What are you playing? Henry narrowed his eyes. This is a big deal! Break it down, you can flirt with Rachel however you want! You can marry her! Both of our families agree that they want someone in my family to marry one of you. Me or Rachel, it doesn't matter. But it's important to you, am I right? Henry looked at me in disbelief. But you love me, why do you leave it like that? If you pretend to back off, I'll fall for you. It won't happen, run. I know you, don't try to hurt Rachel! You don't know me not anymore. There are some conditions that you must adhere to. "" the conditions? "I must be the one to announce it. I throw you there's no other way. And only after my marriage can you and Rachel declare that you are together or married. Not before my marriage. A deal?" I raised eyebrows. But I can never marry.” Why would you do this?” “He still looked at me suspiciously.” I won’t. I don’t want to marry you, that’s easy. Let’s sign the contract “I just took a piece of paper out of my sleeve so I can count on you” “Contract” ? A spell?” “Exactly. We both should swear to our Lord. Do you want to override your terms or not?” “I gave her the paper.” Rachel would be back any moment.” Once the contract between the witches was signed, the wizard and their gods were bound by both. They will definitely encounter it. The outcome was determined between the two parties before the contract was signed, in our case, the termination of the contract had to be refused by the family, and no one wanted to break the contract tied to magic. There are no loopholes around it, you make your bargain with your gods as a witness. He quickly looked at the paper and gave me one last suspicious look, clearly wondering why I left him. But he knew it was his chance at freedom, so he cut off his thumb and put his blood in the knot. hire me. I smiled and pulled out my needle. I pricked my thumb and followed his lead, running down my blood on the knot. With the touch of my blood the deal vanished as a plume of black smoke rose. Henry looked confused, "Smoke..." "What? You're worried I'm going to fail a simple spell like drafting a contract? Check the contract before signing it, right?" The small crease between her eyebrows was smoothed out, "It must have been a light trick. I thought the smoke was black. Yes, I double-checked her spelling before signing the contract, you did a surprisingly good job." "Now it's my turn to feel the anger inside me." It's a basic motto. Are you letting me down?" "Eh..." I gave him one last look and left the room. He was right that the smoke was black. Because the spelling I used was from the book. Dark Lord, if he breaks the contract, he won't kill him, I was a normal mage at first, who would have given him bad luck for a day or two, I went back to my room. ------------ Author's Note Odette is in the process of working on this chapter =============================== ================================================== == === ============================================================= ==== ============================================================== ====== ======= ====] The dissolution of the engagement had to wait for Rachel to show her worth in the temple, but I was still happy to cut any ties with stupid Henry. With our contract now signed, Henry had to step down while courting Rachel. I was pleased with how he was feeling as Rachel wore more and more suits. He was the one who cheated on me in my first life. It is true that I was an idiot, but if he does not lead me, so I do not fall into this trap. Then I won't burn at the stake. Now that's a little funny. If Henry is indeed Rachel's true love, then no matter how hard the process is, love will triumph, right? "Odette, I can't believe I'm going to study at the Wind Gods Temple! One step closer to my dream of becoming a priest! How long will it take us to get there? Will Enri join us?" Rachel said at last, blushing. "A day trip in the car," I said, and Sarah helped me into the car. "And as for Henry, I've heard the boys love to ride there." “Oh… I thought we were going with Enri,” Rachel said in disappointment, then applauded excitedly. "So we're going to spend the whole day together in the car! That's cool! I have so much to ask of you!" There was a twinkle in Rachel's eyes. My head was hurting at the thought of living in the barn with Rachel. Others may not know, but I am well aware that I once pretended to be his best friend. Rachel really chatty. I made sure I didn't have to be with Rachel during the flight. Adding to the fact that the one-day hauling trip was actually a cornerstone of Rachel's life. Oh can you imagine the common people, the thieves jumping in the middle to steal a young noble, a prince coming to save the situation? No, it's Rachel who was kidnapped by a gang of outlaw heroes and then fell in love with she or the leader of the outlaw gang. In my first life, I didn't move in with Rachel, I hated my stepmother, how could I live with her? That day, as I was leaving, I begged Henry to pick me up. So when she was kidnapped, there were rumors that I conspired. Then in my fourth life, I was the older sister to Rachel, so of course I went with her. And then I was kidnapped with him. It is a very bad experience. It felt like a third wheel or a transparent person. Everyone was so focused on Rachel, I could run away from her if I could. They treated her like a queen. So, no, I decided not to go with Rachel. I don't want to kidnap him. I leaned out of my car window and grabbed Rachel's hand, ' I'm sorry, Rachel, I didn't know you were so excited to walk with us." I wiped my eyes dry with a handkerchief. "Look, I'm planning on going to my mother's grave. It's a mountain and rocky road." And I can... ""I have some secrets to tell my mom. I hid my face behind a handkerchief as if it was embarrassing." I'm sorry, Rachel. in his eyes. “I know this is your first visit to the temple, you must be nervous. So, Sarah is going with you.” She smiled gracefully. Sarah widened her eyes and was about to deny when I saw her.” So you have both Sarah and your maid. Sarah can tell you more about life in the temple.” “Odd, you don’t have to…” “I’ll try to catch your car. Maybe we can meet on the street after Dinner.” “That would be great!” Rachel’s face lit up. “I’ll go first.” I said goodbye a little. Now that I've gotten rid of both Rachel and Sarah, the ringing around my ears has stopped. You had no idea how loud they were. I was looking out the car window while I was walking in the woods. He saw a car coming from that direction. It was a dark black car. The horse carriage was also black. But the different thing was that there was no driver, only a crow standing on top of the car. When the sunlight fell on the crow, the black feathers began to shine like gold. It was impossible. This… “This is the Dark Lord Priest’s chariot,” he muttered anxiously to the guard next to the chariot. The bus also stopped our car. The guard knocked on the car window and said, "Lady Odette..." Shouldn't he be in the far north? It shouldn't be here. I don't remember coming to the south at this time in my previous life. But who knows, I haven't visited my mother's grave in the last four of my life. Maybe he came far south and I didn't know because I'd never met him. Calm down, you two don't know each other. He is the priest of the Second Temple. Say hello to him and then he'll leave. This might be your only chance to see him in this life, Odette. Find yourself lucky! I said to myself. I asked the staff to open the car door and got out of my car. I put my right hand over my heart, and with my sari I lifted my dress on the chair. I bowed my head a little. General congratulations to the priests. As the car approached, I suppressed my desire to look at him from the window. Then the car stopped in front of me. Someone jumped out of the car and then bowed my chin. When I took off his familiar lazy smile and the half-mask on his face, my eyes widened. "Look who I found on the street, the perfect candidate to serve the Dark Lord." ---------- Author's Note New character! Are you excited for the next chapter ========== ;) Stay tuned! see you later! ========== Chapter Nine The person I remember said "Who I found here, the perfect candidate to serve the Dark Lord". At that time, I was kneeling in front of the Temple of the Dark God, praying that the God of Darkness would help me take revenge. Then the large wooden door of the temple opened without any sound. Someone was saying the same words in front of me. And he said: Then you are the one who wakes me up from my sleep. "Sleep well. I got back to my car and dug up the basket with the tea set, water and tea leaves that Sarah had left in the car before taking it out. I brought the goods in his car and started making tea. When he said he wanted tea, he wanted you to make him tea. He was too lazy to do that." himself. I put a cup of hot tea in front of him on the bottom desk in the car. He still had a lazy smile on his face and slowly drank the tea as if it were this world. He said in the air as if they were only talking about the weather: "I need a spy, you look like a filter." Good.” “Inquisitor?” Why do I need spies? If I remember correctly, so in my second life he's been around the temple all day. As the High Priest of the Dark God, he was only summoned when the continent really needed him, such as when the wild animals near the borders became uncontrollable and the priests of each temple were required to unite. "You can do that, right?" She said with a smile on her face, her ruby ​​red eyes numbing me. “For what? I am just a disciple of the Wind God Temple.” He laughed, "I know." “This does not suit you. You are more suitable as a disciple of the Dark Lord. Your soul will sink into darkness.” He said the same thing in my second life as well. Having said that, I have such a bad personality that I am probably more inclined to learn the arts of the Dark God. I was easily jealous. And I want you to watch the treasure dear to you in your temple. Oh not at all! "His smile widened." Why do I need this shark? It is of no use to me. You must track its progress. “You offer? “When you collect a sliver, inform me. It's easy, isn't it?” I gave my consent.” Great! Now I give you a gift. You work for me, I should give you a little reward. “Whistling and a crow peeked out of the car window.” I'm looking for your friend. “Does a stranger have any friends? But he was only one person who knew the crow. I was more and more confused, it was as before, but I did not understand his actions. I don't remember if he'd particularly frowned at those sharks before. He was more interested in my attempts at revenge. meow. meow. "A black cat jumped out of a car window. It has soft black fur with golden eyes. Isobel? The cat fell into the lap of the high priest and died when the cat was petted." “Your master,” she said, holding a kitten in my lap. "my gift to you". “What… what is the cat’s name?” , I said, "Isobel?" "Meow meow." He answered as he had done several times before and then started licking my fingers. Like Isobel in my second life. I looked up to see the still familiar lazy smile on his face. At the same time, a crow with black gold wings flew up. "It's almost time." Open the car door automatically. "Send me the words via Isobel. Nice to meet you." “It is my pleasure, your grace.” I got out of the car, holding Isobel in my arms. Then I could feel his coldness, not an ordinary man's breath dripping from my ear. "Odette, see you soon." I was still standing in the same place when my bodyguard and bodyguard woke up from a deep sleep. I saw a cat in my arms. This cat was definitely Isobel. It can't be... ---------- Author's Note Wow! This story has been viewed 2k times! Thank you very much for reading! Things are getting exciting ;) What do you think of the deal between Odette and the High Priest? adjust! See you again! All the guards and coaches thought the black car went up just as we wanted to welcome them. Best wishes It is better not to warn father. I told him I had found Isobel on the side of the road and that I would keep him. Without dismissing Sarah's idea, they all agreed to it. Another madness from Lady Odette, what's new? After that the flight went smoothly. I arrived at the temple just before sunset. When I got out of my car, I saw Henry riding his horse. When he saw me he stopped and ran towards me shouting "Rachel has been kidnapped!" "How did this happen?" I asked nervously. And do you know who did this? I should have been with him. How do I tell my father about this? It's my fault, "I cried with fright." It's Chris and his hilarious band." Chris and his hilarious band? From? Did they leave a message asking for money? "Looks like I expected, Sarah managed to escape." No, they didn't even leave a note! We don't know who did it if it wasn't your maid and Rachel's maid! They both ran away when their guards were close enough to ask for our help. "He left Rachel there with the thieves?" she cried angrily. You made the right choice. It seems that Rachel and the maids were kept in different places. His guards were shorter than Rachel's guards. This was his only chance to secretly seek help. Fortunately, Sarah knew the way to the temple. “Do you know where their nest is? I have to save Rachel!” “We have already found her. Now we are ready to save him. The priest and I. We all think you better stay here. We can't take care of you as long as we protect someone else.” So that's a subtle way of saying I'm going to get in their way? "Okay," I said, disappointed. "Please return it to Rachel. Thank you, Henry." Henry nodded at Lee and then mounted his horse to join the others in the rescue team. As expected, Sarah successfully survived. Like I said, if I really fought my maid, her security was lost to people other than Rachel. Return to the temple for help, as quickly as possible. He gave them a place to save Rachel. I might have a little doubt. It became big news when I lost Rachel for more than my first three days. The life that no one can trace, people began to doubt everyone, especially me. Now things are different with Sarah's help they can protect her better today. But then Rachel and Chris did not have time to develop their romance. Hope I don't mix things up. It would be my fault if Chris turned out to be her true love. I went back to my bedroom in the temple. I lay on my bed tired. It's been a long time since Isobel lay on my pillow as she used to. I started running my hands over his soft fur. “I don’t understand, Isobel, why did you take care of her in this life? You must be a stray cat in a village at the bottom of a hill from the Temple of the Black Lord. You have never set foot in that village. Which is why does he know my name? He may have heard, and he may know. But that Tone, that… that gesture… Argh… I must have been thinking too much…” I buried myself deep in the pillow to hide my burning cheeks and ears. A few hours after dinner, Sarah came knocking on the door. "They brought Mrs. Rachel back...!" “Really? Take me to her!” Let's finish the last scene of this play. When she got to Rachel's room, Henry was comforting her. He put his hand around her shoulder and spoke softly to her. Good luck I rolled my eyes to watch before I walked in. I've had my share of romantic moments in my past life. It's embarrassing and I want to wash my eyes right after watching those beautiful intimate moments. I go back to the corridor in which I came back and stomp on the floor several times to pretend to be in her room. I was crying even before I opened the door, “Rachel! Poor Rachel! How are you? Are you okay?” When I entered the room, Rachel came to hug me so much. She cried, 'Odette, you're really worried!' 'Rachel, it's my fault, if I've come with you, I have to go through this.' I cried in my handkerchief. I have to soak my handkerchief in mint so I can cry whenever I want." These kidnappers are bullshit! Poor Rachel, are you hurt? "" not at all! Odette, you don't know, they're really heroes! You see that the owner who takes care of this land is tyrannical and strict. The villagers have to pay high taxes and have nothing to eat! Chris and his men were already planning to kidnap the daughter of God so that they could negotiate with the lord and tell the villagers that they could help! They are heroes! "Are you sure they're heroes, Rachel? They kidnapped people! He was plotting to threaten Prabhu with his daughter! Not long ago I had lost all hope of speaking to Rachel, so I sat there with my normal self. With a beautiful smile and nod, Rachel continued her wonderful adventure, when Henry finally caught her attention and she finally managed to sneak in. That night I was about to fall asleep when I realized I should report Rachel's progress in collecting the pieces. For him, does that mean I should follow him? Maybe I can follow him from afar? This Definitely a good plan. ---------- The story of the author's note has reached a new level! Now that Odette has served under the High Priest, what will happen next? Stay tuned! Thanks for reading! Story 2.4k hits! ========== Chapter 11 My studies continued in the Temple. It is somewhat similar to my previous life. I don't have to spend a lot of time or effort to complete my homework. If I still can't master mantras after studying the same thing for the third time, no matter how much life I walk across the ocean, I'd really be an idiot. One day I was lying in my bed reading Isobel when the temple started shaking. I sat and hugged Isobel beside me. Rachel was breaking the seal. Keep the first piece. The time has really come, and soon she begins her quest to find other sharks. I went to my office and wrote a note. I had to do my job as an investigator. “Isobel,” I called the kitten. “I must give this note to the High Priest.” I put the note on the table. " Meow." Isobel jumped on the table and put his paw on the paper. Within seconds, the musical note had disappeared in a puff of black smoke. As expected, he asked to send her the news through Isobel. That's what happened in my second life. "Now, Isobel, stay in this room. I must be back soon. I hope I don't have to go out and surprise!" I caressed Isobel's soft black fur, and rolled my eyes. ---------------- "Rachel, do you really have to leave?" I asked anxiously. He said with an expression of piety on his face. “It’s my luck.” She was holding the pieces of the Pawan Mandir. “The pieces there are calling me. I can feel it.” He closed his eyes at that very moment. “It's my luck. I have to help them!" Need help with the broken jewelry? I snapped the comment. "Rachel...that's cool. I'm worried about you. Too bad I didn't achieve anything else. If I went with you, I would probably drag you down. But I will support you from afar. “!” I squeezed his hand to support him. "Odette...Don't worry Henry's coming with me and..." He whistled and then a big white dog came out of the bushes next to us. Rachel leaned over and hugged the big dog. "I met Lucian in the woods near the temple. When I met Lucian, he was about to die." Rachel cried. “Poor Lucian, fortunately, Lucian is now recovering.” I glanced at the giant dog with white fur and blue eyes. Lucien may look like a dog now, but it turns out he was under some kind of curse. He was human. He became a loyal companion of Rachel. "Stay safe, Rachel!" I said goodbye to my handkerchief. As soon as I met Rachel, I realized that my handkerchief usage had increased. "Odette, I'll update you!" Screaming again, Henry took him to the car, and the big dog jumped into the car to join him and they were off. I stood there until his car disappeared and came back. My room took my coat out of my wardrobe. "Isobel, let's go on an adventure! If I remember correctly, the first target is the Temple of Fire. We can wait in the city where the temple is." I put Isobel in the bag of the cross I had prepared for her, put on my coat and went to the stables. The priests of the temple did not care that we were students. We continued until we appeared at the final selection. Since childhood I have already said that I will find Sarah, since I was a child, she will not be in the Temple for me. I have already told Sarah that I have been looking for her since I was a child, she will not be in the Temple for me. I have already told Sarah that I will look for herbs For medicine, you won't come to find me anymore. I got on my horse and went to the other side like Rachel. That way I was going, I was getting to the city where the Temple of Fire is. I don't want to follow in Rachel's footsteps, she surely will attract trouble. If I remember correctly. On the way he met a prince and a priest of the Temple of Fire. No, do not interfere with their confusion. Only now I can cheat. I didn't live to collect all the pieces, or if I were to live on another continent at once. So I definitely only knew the first two or three places. The sun was setting when I stopped to rest. I tied my horse to a tree and then set it on fire at night. She put a thick rug on the floor and sighed and sat down. Who would have thought that the spoiled Mrs. Odette would one day spend the night in the woods? I was making dinner out of bread and cheese and playing with Isobel when I heard a sound. Isobel replied with a light nod of his head and then meowed in a certain direction. In no time has a black car appeared on the road. It was a driverless car. There were only two black horses on the road. The car stopped in front of my carpet and then the car door opened. "Would you mind if I join you?" asked the elegant man in the car. After a pause I smiled and said, "It is my pleasure, High Priest." ------------- Author's Note New Ark. are you excited? Tell me what you think!! The story is close to 3 thousand! thanks for your support! see you later! ========== Chapter 12 "I think you went to the city where the Temple of Fire is?" he asked while feeding his crow. I have given my consent. Why was he here? "Is this your dinner?" asked suspiciously. I looked at the bread and cheese on the mat. I have given my consent. “I hope you are not planning to give bread and cheese to the high priest.” And no, not at all. "I smiled gracefully. I took the quiver and the arrow from my horse." I will go and find something for you, your grace. ​​ “You lazy priest! I really wonder if he’s showing up now so I can hunt him down and cook for him. Why didn’t he call his shadow a puppet? He smiled with some evil glint in his eyes: “That’s great on you.” Now I don’t even have to use my strength! So glad you made an offer!” Dealing with her has now brought back some good memories. The memories I had before my death in my second life must have been so wonderful that it would have blinded me.” Please wait for your moment of grace.” My hands were wrapped around my wrist. She can cook at least one dish. I picked up more firewood around my camp and sat by the fire waiting for the raw meat to arrive. "You're still mad at me." When I looked at the High Priest, his face was an inch away from me, his reddened eyes staring at me intently. Some scenes flashed through my mind, my cheeks were getting warmer, and I leaned back as hard as I could. Don't be shy, Odette, you're not Rachel. “No… No, I am not angry with you, your grace.” "Do you know how to cook?" "a little." "You either know how to cook or you don't. There is nothing in between." You looked towards it. "Do you want to bet?" A smile spread across his face. "So you won?" I said after a minute of silence. "Take off your mask." His smile deepened. "What if I win?" “Then I will be a disciple of the God of Darkness.” I raised an eyebrow from the challenge. laughed joyfully. "You are very confident in your culinary skills." "I still feel uncomfortable. Then I heard a mysterious flick of a finger and a hand grasping the rabbit I was roasting. I clasped my wrist again in the priest's cold hand and walked away from the fire" Let's wait here. The smoke there became unbearable. “But I didn’t cook…” Your broth is more than enough to prove the fact that you can cook. You are close.” She nodded earnestly. That's right, I offered her a cup of broth while I was frying the rabbit." "Thank you for your kindness." "As promised..." He almost removed his masked face. The face looking back caught one of my memories. The way he looked at me was very familiar in my memory. I suddenly felt the urge to talk to him, to get rid of my loneliness and sadness. I lowered my eyes to hide the emotional turmoil in my eyes. In my four births, he was the only person I could call my boyfriend. Although he was my boss most of the time, I could talk to him. But not now, he was not a priest from my memory. " I guess I'm not as bad as I see you knocking you down. How long has it been since I last took off my mask?” He was lost in deep thoughts. He pulled me up and made me sit with him on the carpet and held a pot of hot broth in my hand.” No, I replied, “I am amazed that you have the same face behind your mask as we do. " Oh yeah, there is an old legend that only animals follow the god of darkness. Perhaps that is why I tried to avoid him in this life, so as not to be jealous of him. I don't hate him. I might have done it in the past. I… don't like him," I explained as I removed the thread of my abaya. He offered him "I can help you take revenge." "It's a pity that you don't hate him." shrug. and "Something interesting to do?" He wanted to do something to satisfy the perverted evil heart that carried him as a priest of darkness. In my second life, they surrounded me and sold me to desperate people for potions or evil deals. He got on his knees in front of his temple. "OK.. Although I don't hate Rachel anymore, we can do something to stop her," she suggested. Just kidding. “Why do I look evil? Evil now? Maybe I was actually that twisted person who couldn’t see anyone better than me. Stopping Rachel, then Lord Hank, along with Henry and Chris, made me happy. Am I a twisted, evil person. An evil smile appeared on The high priest’s face.” Odette, what a good idea, you are really suitable for reading in my temple. If you come, I can let you take my place.” If that happens, I can't watch you, your grace. “This is true. Don't worry, the offer is always open to you. To take revenge on him he "smiled with astonishment." Look right.” I lowered my head until my hair covered my red ears and pretended to smooth a crease on the rug. What I had in mind was a moment of silence before I asked, “Why is your grace facing south?” Do you have something on the south side?” In my memory, he only left his temple before my death. She once said she was confined to her temple. Historical books mention that the High Priest of Darkness was so powerful that the High Priest could not leave the temple grounds without reason. As recorded in the historical books, there were times when the High Priest of Darkness left the temple to save the continent, and how ironic it was, whether it was an invasion of wild beasts from across the border, a spread of plague, or inland. The war for the caliphate. Why the crown mysteriously smiled. And do you know what sharks your stepmother collects? "It might seem like an unrelated question, but I knew it wasn't. These sharks were strong and close to every temple. To Rachel, a battle had to be fought for those temples. The priests of those temples hated them. But sooner or Later, they worshiped Rachel for her charm and power.” That was proof. When it is resolved, then you will have answers to your questions." He looked at the moon and said, " As you know that the High Priests of Darkness cannot leave their temple, the Priests of Light will scold me if this news reaches them. These priests are idiots.” The mask that had been removed earlier was hanging from the hand. Over my head. He clicked gently, and whispered next to my ear, “It is a secret between us.” He smiled charmingly and put on the mask again. “Let the sweet dreams fall.” Then he jumped up. Back to his car waving his hand. "See you soon." The horses started running as soon as the door closed. Slowly the car carrying him disappeared into the mist. I sat by the fire and took Isobel in my arms. "He didn't answer my question at the end. This means he can leave his temple if he wants? Maybe he didn't want to save me at the time. At least he showed up before I died." Some distant memories come to mind that I wanted to bury. I covered my face with my arms. "Let's go to bed, Isobel. Don't let the High Priestess of Darkness waste a protective wing on us." Then I slowly started falling into a deep sleep. Although I didn't really believe that a dark priest could give people good dreams, I hope that the good dreams will actually accompany me. ------------- Author's Note Things get even more exciting!! see you later! ========= Chapter 14 I dreamed about my past. The night before my execution was my second life. The night the High Priest came to bid me one last goodbye. I covered my face with my arms and groaned. Why out of all the dreams I could have that night? I stayed there for a few minutes and then met. I started packing everything in my luggage and putting it on my horse. "Come on, Isobel. Let's go!" Since I was sure I could get there before Rachel, the road took a slight detour. According to my recollections, I met Prince Rachel for the first time on his way to the Temple to receive blessings. Then on the second day of the trip, Rachel found an injured priest on the way. So she spent some time treating and caring for him. The priest turns out to be the priest of the Fire Temple, so Rachel can enter the Fire Temple without any problems. I wonder if this priest ever regretted letting Rachel go to the temple. This was a kind of reason for losing their temple treasury. Of course the details of each life were a little different because I acted differently, but the trajectory of Rachel's life was never that far off, as she was like a character in a novel in which she planned all the plots. And she was doing her job in acting like him. Some events must happen, the meeting of the Prince and the Priest of Fire are two of them. Just when I was thinking I came to a town with a fire station. I decided to settle first in a hostel and then walk around the city. The city where the temple is located has been as a tourist destination, and there is a must-do of something interesting to see. And I missed shopping without chatting with Rachel Chet. It's great to take the beauty of this world with you when you go shopping. The sun was setting after I had been shopping to my heart's content, and I chose a restaurant for dinner. I occupied a table near the window in front of a busy street. I was reading the menu when I heard a noise in the street. Thinking it was Isobel, I looked at the high priest sitting upstairs and reading the list. I almost screamed. “Your Majesty, what are you doing here?” I have been silent. "Dinner?" He answered with a raised brow. “No matter what the legends say that the Dark Head Priests are human too, I will eat them.” "Yes I know." I closed my eyes and nodded my head. I knew what I said wasn't on my part, but based on that I knew often that he could come out of his temple whenever he wanted. I grit my teeth, "Why are you in Fire Temple City? If you're so free, you can spy on your own! You don't even need me!" "But it's boring," he honestly said. "Boreal things have to be done by my subordinates. If the superior does it himself, what do subordinates do." He smiled innocently. “Then why are you here, sir?” " Like I said, I'm sorry. Are you here to have fun? I hold my head in my hand. Why does he have to appear now? I almost forgot the dream I had the night before and then almost appeared! That too without a mask on! The scenes I pushed in the back of my mind sounded like She walks back Stop thinking Stop thinking Odette I looked out the window Oh the shoes on the show window across the street look great Look, that girl was wearing a beautiful dress. The embroidery was really complimenting her... Her face... I dropped the menu on the table, knocked on the glass of water, my dress was about to splash. I should have cast a simple wind spell to solve the problem but my hands were trembling. At the last moment the high priest cut off his fingers and the glass returned to its original place. And who frightened you so much? ' he asked, looking out the window, 'No, I'm not,' I said as calmly as I could. Hold my trembling hands together.” I was just surprised. I didn't think I'd be able to see it here. "This was the girl who was stabbed to death in my past life. I was pouring tea for Rachel at the time, so I patted my back on the door. No one was there when the girl walked into the room she panicked. It was a tea party, everyone thought she was coming for a party." Walking to our table, I felt Rachel come to greet her. Then the knife pulled out. Just in time, Rachel hid behind me and I was stabbed. Not just once. I felt it from my neck, blood rushing from my back. My body feels a little cold. I put my hands on My neck to assure myself that there were no injuries. “Odite?” The high priest’s hand covered my hand. “Odette, it’s over, I know you, it’s over.” I slowly came to my senses, focused on covering my hands. The memory of being stabbed was still fresh in my mind. So Everything that triggered this kind of memory took me back to that time. With time, my reaction wasn't very good. When I was in my second life I would tolerate roasted meat rather than throw it away on the spot. I closed my eyes and shook my head to get the memories out of my head. I give her a faint smile, "I'm fine now, your grace. Thank you." "What scares you? The man who killed you in your last life?" I almost dropped the handkerchief I pulled out of my sleeve. Then I remembered that he loved making jokes like these. “What are you talking about, your grace, if I could really remember my past life, I wouldn’t be a loser anymore.” I lowered my eyes and went back to read my list. If he wasn't really joking, I didn't know how to deal with him. I thought we were friends, but in my third or fourth life he didn't give the slightest help. Of course he was joking. He had to be joking. But why do I live this life? revived? It felt like a curse, something a Dark High Priestess could do. Stop thinking, Odette. "Let us ask, your grace." I tried to smile as usual. I think I definitely did. ---------------- Author's Note Odette is spreading for dangerous reasons...things are getting hotter! see you later! ========== Chapter 15 While we were eating dessert, the high priest suddenly said, "The girl you just saw is the friend of the fire priest. Did you steal her friend?" He looked at me with desperate eyes. He seemed disappointed in my friend's taste. "I'm not such a cheap person! I don't lead people with an orator!" "He's better." He shook his head with satisfaction. "I can not bear my very unpleasant vassal." But you sell drugs that make people sick from boredom. May the goddess of love and her servants be more fond of such tasteless things.” Then Rachel must have been blessed by the goddess of love since she was born.” The high priest laughed. Love is a gift.” He sipped his wine and then said, “Then Rachel stole the girlfriend from that girl.” “Rachel adjusted to stealing his girlfriend.” His smile now indicated that he was indeed the High Priest of Darkness. He was the High Priest or Priest of the Curse Continent. to avoid doing so. He was like a great god imprisoned in his temple. So he preferred to prank people alongside harmless tricks to pass the time, even though he wouldn't do it himself. Instead, he commands people to do it now, like a twisted dark priest like me. Now at this point, I was beginning to suspect that the High Priest only followed those rules because he wanted to. If he doesn't, then it's very likely that he's breaking those rules. It was as if he was coming out of prison this time to be the person he wanted. When I got on my knees in front of his temple in my second life and begged him for help, I was surrounded. So I figured out how to make a drug that would make people look sick and make bad deals. All this came from this magic book now in my hand. second. Let's go back to our room and study it. To be honest, I didn't want that girl to kill people because her boyfriend left her. But she clearly did not like Mrs. Florence, Jo could have left her when she realized that her fiancé's heart had already left her. I wonder if there is any way to help that girl win back her boyfriend's heart. It was so difficult that not a single worthy young man had seen Rachel without falling in love. His mistress of the fire priest had already met Rachel. If he doesn't, I can ask the girl to take her injured boyfriend into the woods. Then Rachel did not meet the priestess of fire. Although Lord Hank and Rachel lost each other at the party, judging from the fact that they bumped into each other on the road. They will likely meet each other sooner or later. I turned another page of the magic book and sighed. On this page he talks about the fragrance that will make someone fall in love with you. Sometimes I wonder if Rachel has this kind of perfume. Or why do you fall in love with every handsome, decent man on the street you come across? I wonder if the High Priest would fall in love with her, too. Wait, he knew I had my stepmother. Does this mean he met her already? Was he asking me to spy on Rachel as part of his plan to get to know her? Am I just a ploy to get close to Rachel? What was I thinking why did my heart prick a little? Turning a blind eye, my fingers crushed the corner of the dictation book page. I tried to smooth the angle with curved eyebrows. Why am I so angry all of a sudden? Suddenly I felt the urge to throw a tantrum. To throw this magic book around the room. It's like going back to the time when I was still a bad-tempered woman. "Miu Miu Miu!" Isobel licked my hand. “Hmm, Isobel, go play by yourself… what…” “We are two hours away and someone has already offended you?” asked the man sitting in the dark nervously. Weird on his shoulder. was standing. "Why are you here?" open my mouth. “Would you believe me if I said I was worried that I might have nightmares?” and number. I want you to be here to see how badly you came up with a plan. He walked over to my seating area and leaned over my shoulder to look at the incantation book open on my desk. "A fragrance that makes people fall in love. Is that your plan?" "Have not decided yet". "Oh, really, I don't care, go ahead." He leaned against the window in the moonlight. "But what did the perfume do to make you want to throw the book across the room?" Now his facial expressions in my second life became very familiar to the expressions he gave me last night. With this dream I had the night before, it distracted me for a while. Without hesitation I asked, "Do you love my beautiful stepmother?" ---------- Thanks for reading the author's note! see you later! ========== Chapter 16 "Do you like my beautiful stepmother?" I regretted it as soon as the question came out of my mouth. The moonlight must have tricked my eyes, reminding me of this great priest before me. “Just who am I…” She stopped looking at his face. He raised an eyebrow suspiciously as if he couldn't believe how stupid I was. "Odette, who am I?" Leave a big sigh. “The Dark High Priestess?” I couldn't understand where this was going. "And is your stepmother related to the word 'dark' in any way?" 'But not' Are people attracted to things that are different from them? She is beautiful and every worthy young man who stares at her falls in love with her… “What kind of romance novels are you reading? Throw them away.” He smiled crossing his legs and staring at me with his red eyes, “If you have so much time for daydreaming, why don’t you go back to the book of magic. Too much daydreaming is bad for your brain.” . "A second ago I didn't know what hit me. Why did I ask him such a question? He's a heartless demon. What spell to help that girl win her boyfriend's heart? Or at least show him that no matter what he does, there's no hope for his girlfriend to come back to him?" I was. I know making people fall in love with her perfume seemed like a good idea, but for some unknown reason it made me feel uncomfortable. On this occasion it felt as if someone was controlling the Fire Priest's heart. Umm how is that? "Looks like you have a plan." The high priest, holding it with his long, thin fingers, cut the macaroons. Anger began to boil inside me. This is the box of macaroons I bought for yesterday afternoon tea. But this man showed up at midnight and refused to leave. After a while she said she should have breakfast. What do I do other than give her a candy box in the middle of the night? This annoying person. “Yes,” my teeth declared. He took another macaroon from the box. The volume inside the box was decreasing. You looked towards it. "Do you care to share what's on your mind? I can't read your thoughts. Except for the dark feelings that flow from you." He smiled gracefully and took another macaroon. I want to kill him! I think he saw this dark purpose. “Most of the men who chased Rachel fell in love at first sight. Most of the time, it was a great way to say they loved her face. So what if Rachel isn't pretty? “Are you planning to spoil your stepmother’s face?” The emotion you saw on her face? No, I didn't dare. If Rachel was burned or hanged because of the acts, I think Rachel's face was ruined. It will lead me to an even worse death. I will not try to do that. To make matters worse, I'll probably reincarnate next. Is there a difference between torturing and then resurrecting myself to torture me again? “I plan to create an illusion in my mind. To use this mantra so that when he sees Rachel, so Rachel looks like a normal looking girl. Let’s see if their love will last even after this.” “That’s it?” “No, I will give the girl a potion that will erase The priest's memory out of her mind for two days." "I don't think she'll take it voluntarily." "If I tell her it's a test for her. Lover. If he suddenly stops taking care of her, she'll realize how important she is. To make it official, medicine is necessary." who suffers at the end of the day. At the mention of sweets, I was furious. She ignored his hand and pushed him away. ---------- Author's Comment I hope you all enjoyed this chapter ============ Chapter! she did! *proud face* See you next time! ========== The Chapter 17 illusion lasted for about a day, during which time Kevin was feeling even cooler about Rachel. But once the confusion is over, Kevin charmingly returns to Rachel. The medicine I gave Doris lasted three days. It will be in those three days, Kevin has never visited Doris, similar to the way he has dealt with Doris in the past. And he doesn't care about me. All wrong witch! He seduced Kevin," Doris shrieked crazily. I will kill him! “Are you the future I’m going to kill every pretty girl that catches Kevin’s attention?” "At the same time Doris collapsed." Here's the same dose but much stronger. Now she will not remember him for the rest of his life. "I put the medicine near his door and left. The waiting man said at the end 'Dark God will not accept it.'" She doesn't need his approval. You won't succeed in killing Rachel. She'll cut herself to others in the process.” I cleaned my absent-mindedness to remind me that I didn't feel sorry for her. I didn't want to fall into the trap again. Her choice was to take drugs. Take it or not. "Now I wonder if Rachel's face was really enchanted. Kevin was obviously less excited when he was under the illusion, but when the illusion appeared, he became fascinated by her again." The high priest looked at me with his usual smile. He knew something but he didn't tell me. This means that I have to be closer to the truth. "But if he was enchanted, why didn't anyone notice anything? He was a skilled priest like Kevin, that's why he recognized the illusion and broke it a day later. Henry and Lord Hank were also skilled magicians" "Do you think humans know when the gods cast a spell on them?" He asked mysteriously. I frowned. Who is Rachel? Was he suggesting that some gods cast a spell on Rachel? Witch spell? I patted a cold finger on my forehead. "Sometimes it is better to walk away from good things than not to indulge in them." I followed him without looking, we stopped at the top of a gentle cliff in front of the Temple of Fire. “It's about time," they said. At that time the earth started to tremble from the Wind Temple like that time. I lost my balance and almost fell into his arms. Luckily I was able to snuggle up to a huge oak tree next to us at the last minute. A few minutes later, I saw Rachel, Henry, Kevin, and the silver-haired man running outside the temple. He left the city with his horses. This silver-haired man must have been Lucien, the big dog found before Rachel left. The high priest whispered: "Two down, three to go." "What are these pieces?" "Didn't you hear what I just said?" This is something I shouldn't stick my nose in. “But you already got me involved! You asked me to spy for you." He laughed: "Well, you have a point. It's my selfishness." So he asked the priest to lock me in my room in the temple and then do magic. The door prevents me from going back and spoiling the party. This time he ordered me to join in to show the others what a great big family we are. I think I should be more careful this time. Doris will never resort to stabbing people again. I let out a sigh of relief, and touched the protective charm I had made for the occasion. This should save me from being stabbed. "Lady Odette, it's time," declared Sarah. I gave my consent. I went down the corridor and knocked on the door of my father's office before Go downstairs to greet my stepmother. “Odette,” said my father. “What do you want?” “Dad, I’m breaking off my engagement with Enri.” “Odette” I sighed. “You know the decision is up to you. It's an arrangement between two families." Then he waved his hand, trying to dismiss me as the naive, cruel heiress he thought I was. "Henry is in love with Rachel, dad. Do you still want to continue this courtship? At risk of scandals? Our family's reputation is under threat?" I asked with a raised brow. "What or what?" Abs. "Are you sure you're not wrong? I know you wouldn't like the idea of ​​having a sister, but..." "Do you think I did? She heard me too." After a pause he said, "I'll talk to Enri." Henry, AP. He said: Marry Rachel. So I made a deal to preserve my family's reputation. We canceled the engagement and he can't marry Rachel until after I'm married. You can still unite our family while everyone is happy. The question was whether I would marry someone and whether Rachel would really choose Henry now. But I kept my mouth shut Are you sure you are not wrong? I know you wouldn't like the idea of ​​having a sister, but..." "Do you think I did? She heard me too." After a pause he said, "I'll talk to Enri." Henry, dad. He said, "Marry Rachel. So I made a deal to preserve my family's reputation. We called off the engagement and he can't marry Rachel until after I'm married. You can still unite our family while he's Everyone is happy. The question was whether I would marry someone and whether Rachel would really choose Henry now. But I kept my mouth shut Are you sure you are not wrong? I know you wouldn't like the idea of ​​having a sister, but..." "Do you think I did? She heard me too." After a pause he said, "I'll talk to Enri." Henry, dad. He said, "Marry Rachel. So I made a deal to preserve my family's reputation. We called off the engagement and he can't marry Rachel until after I'm married. You can still unite our family while he's Everyone is happy. The question was whether I would marry someone and whether Rachel would really choose Henry now. But I kept my mouth shutQ. Papa looked at me with a question in her eyes, patted her finger on his desk and finally said, "Henry is the fiancé your mother chose for you." "It's not mine because he loves my stepmother" I laughed and smiled. sigh. "I'll talk to Henry's family about it." "That's great. Now I'm going at your request to celebrate my dear stepmother's birthday." She cursed and then left the room. At least one annoying thing is now resolved. ---------- Author's notes and secrets ;) See you next time! ==== ====== Chapter 18 When I got to the park where the tea party was going on, people were buzzing. It was better to stay away from Rachel. I decided to find a group of acquaintances or a quiet corner. The truth is that after many lives, I was an introvert. I was never an open person. I was a human as I walked toward the group, someone tapped on my shoulder. I tense up and grab the oomph of the protection I made. "Odette, I was wondering where you were!" I turned to see Rachel smiling at me. "I'm holding back because of something unimportant." "I was so worried you'd miss the party." His huge smoky lavender eyes blinked. "not at all." It's best to stay away from her, but first... "Rachel, where did your research take you? You look skinny!" "For Fire Temple, but it was a hit! I met a new friend who is also at this party. Let me introduce you to her." Rachel's face lit up at the mention of the fire priest Kevin. I tried so hard not to roll my eyes. "Don't worry, don't bother. We'll have plenty of time after the party. Where do you think we'll go next?" I asked innocently as if I really cared about him. “The fragments are calling me to the east where the Water Temple is,” he closed his eyes. "I wish you the best, Rachel. You now have a lot of guests to attend. Don't let this hold you back," I asked Rachel to stop waving as quickly as possible. This fire priest is here, who knows if his beloved still fell on him? I don't want to die again. Rachel, though I was not a shield, everyone around her protected her, and I did not worry about her for a moment, the party was passing quietly, it was evening, the sun was setting. As my due date approached in my past life, I remembered watching the sunset as I slowly died. I hid myself in the shade of the trees, I would have gone back to my room if the father had not put servants at every entrance and exit. Be sure to report it if you enter again. "You are very upset." A cold wind blew on my right ear. I cried when I realized I had lost my voice. And do you want everyone to know that I have come to bless your stepmother, I doubt they will be happy. “The High Priest of Darkness came out of the shadow he was hiding in and gave me a cold spell.” You....."You look very nervous like I said." "And then you want to scare me?" "It seems strange." You looked towards it. It was unbearable. I complained that I didn't want to talk to him. "Why are you here?" I looked at him from the corner of my eye. I was still angry. "boring." He didn't hide much in my second life. If he had a different personality, I would have had some doubts. But he was the same person I met in my second life. Selfish, easily bored, lazy and difficult to understand. "Do you want to sneak in?" "Yes, absolutely. I would if I could. My father's spies are everywhere. I'm sure he made a wing to keep me from escaping. It's a great job to show others that we are one big family." I roll my eyes. So if you'll let me." He put his hand on my hip and after I blinked, we were in place. He immediately freed his hand around my waist with pillars of black marble, and we were in a dark temple, and I tried to check every nook and cranny of the temple except for him. I think he saw my bright red face shrug. Some memories I didn't I don't accept, I want to come into my mind right now. "Is this your structure?" "yes." He took off his cloak as he headed back to the temple. He returned behind the cloak. "Why did you bring me here?" "You said you wanted to get out of that party," she said with confusion in her eyes. We could have gone out for a walk here but unfortunately I didn't take any food with me.” Now that I said, I want tea and cake. I'll show you the kitchen. Where is the kitchen? "What should I have mentioned. Now I had to cook for this lazy priest?" Ah here. “The door to the nearby room opened. It was the living room. He laughed at my bewildered face: “Kidding,” he patted my face. With his finger, a tray with two cups of tea and two pieces of cake appeared on the low coffee table. Aren’t you in my room?” He patted Isobel’s fur. Isobel licked my fingers and then jumped off the table. Isobel ran out of the room and disappeared into the corridor. "Isobel knows where she's going. Blake might be looking forward to playing with her." Blake hit him. The High Priest had already sat on a chair, his cloak spread on the floor. He was looking at two slices of the cake, perhaps deciding which one to eat. "If you don't mind, I'll take your grace to the right." Without waiting for his response, he said he wanted it. I knew the cake and I took the plate. I congratulated him for taking the first bite. --------------------- The story of the author of the book 10 thousand views!!! Many thanks to my readers! Hope you like the story so far! As a celebration, I'll be posting it ========== Before chapter 10 d let me know what you think! ================================================== == == ============================================================== ==== =============================================================== ==================================================== ======= ===========> Then Rachel heads east with a group of her attackers, to the Sharks of the Water Temple. Rachel instinctively put her hand on the Sharpie. However, amid the attackers' protection, she was wounded in the process. The Wind Temple priests were afraid that Rachel and I would bother them, so they asked us to go home until the Temple Water outbreak subsided. So we went back to our family property. Rachel was stealing other people's property left and right, but I was kicked out of the temple. This is the reality of my life. Rachel's discovery infuriated many, especially the priests of the Temples of Fire and Water. As for the Wind Temple, he had to pretend to be mad at Rachel, but I knew he was proud that the Wind Temple student was the one who was accepted by The Precious Shards. Now the priests of the Bumi temple were also working as Rachel's next target was their temple. I knocked on Rachel's bedroom door. Rachel is my stepmother, if I didn't visit her when she was injured, bad rumors would start to spread. So despite not spending time with him, I had to leave. When I opened the door, I had a romantic scene between Rachel and her silver-haired boyfriend, Lucien. I wanted to stab myself in the eyes. Knocked down! Knocked down! Rachel let me in! What were they doing? I stood at the door in embarrassment, wishing the goodbye kiss would end soon. Finally he looked at Lucien and walked out the door. "Odette, did you see that?" Rachel hid half her face under the quilt, only her big lavender eyes were staring at me. "I'm so sorry." He covered his head with a quilt. All I could do was smile gracefully and pat. Please don't say "come" when you're not really ready. My throat cleared, "Are you okay?" Rachel nodded, her face still red. "Wound healing. I'm a little bored being in my room all the time." But half a dozen lovers lined up to meet you? "Do you want some books?" I gave advice like the caring older sister I was pretending to be. And I'm actually reading this. He pulled a large garlic from under his duvet. It was a magical record in which all the former High Priests and High Priests had been recorded in every temple for the past five hundred years. It was more like a book of family trees, but it had priests. I realized I needed to know. This record lists the priests and the chants or incantations they knew. “I’m curious to know that,” I said softly. “Yes! You know there’s a father inside of her too!” “It’s even more exciting,” I said in a dead end. “I must be ready. Not every temple allows me to return to Sharp in peace. Why do they have to fight?” I sighed in despair. Maybe you'd take the treasure they've been guarding for years?" But I found something interesting," said Rachel, turning the pages. "truly?" I know it's so much fun. Before I ran away from home, I read this huge book in my third life. “Look! This page is about the Priests in the Temple of Darkness! There is only one name! The High Priest of Darkness, Y. Arden. But that was five hundred years ago! The Priests of Darkness no longer enroll themselves in the Magical Register” “They are Priests of Darkness. They don't follow the rules.” I shrugged. “You have a point. Then it made my search more difficult.” Rachel gently turned her face. “The priests of the Dark Temple did not attend any social event. Nobody knows how powerful they are. Just when I thought checking the history would help me, it was blank! It's too deceitful for them!" And they're called Priests of Darkness for a reason." "And this High Priest doesn't even have the explanation of spells he knows! How deceived they are." Rachel muttered angrily. "Do you think this High Priest is still alive?" “I asked him indifferently.” Not at all! Priests are known to live long, but certainly not that long! I also told them they were very shy!” I laughed. Looks like it's time to leave this room. standing up. I don't want to.” My half-sister has taken so much time. “Come on. Oh, Enri!" Rachel smiled happily, "Enri, why are you so worried? I'm getting better every day!” “Something happened, Rachel.” Henry said anxiously. “The priests of the Temples of Earth, Water, Fire, and Air pointed to the Temple of Darkness. They said the High Priestess of Darkness was responsible for stealing the treasures of their temples.” “But we don’t steal! It has nothing to do with the dark temple! The sharks must come back together, that's what I point out." For the priests who spent their lives guarding those sharks, you're stealing. But why are they pointing the finger at the High Priest of Darkness?" He said he had proof. The high priest was not in the temple the day we rescued the shark. "I don't know the High Priest of Darkness!" I asked him already Rachel's eyes filled with tears. I was spying on her, but she had to hide the whole time! Now she has been arrested! All these priests were talking. should be fine. is not it? I squeeze my hands together to calm myself, of course he's right, he's the High Priest of Darkness. "No," Rachel said firmly. "It's my job. It has nothing to do with the poor High Priest of Darkness. These priests must be told. Henry help me, let's go and tell that to the priest." Henry reached out to pull her out. "Rachel... I'm still hurt," Henry said anxiously. “The High Priestess of the other temples had already said… they joined forces and planned to punish the High Priestess of Darkness for not following the rules. The High Priestess of Darkness follows the rules. She is indeed the leader of the Dark Temple. He left, “What?” I knew there were rules, but other High Priests could punish them if they wanted to? They won't get hurt. They were the Dark Priests of the Titans. I sighed. "That's not right. Enri, we have to explain ourselves now! Henry!" After a deep sigh, Henry pulled Rachel out of his bed and left the room. I started walking around the room. He's my boss, and I have to check on him. That's right, it's a compliment to check with your boss. I left Rachel's room and went to find Isobel. ---------------- Author's Note Things are getting exciting!! Will the High Priest of Darkness be safe? Check out the following ========== Chapter!! Thanks for reading! See you next time ;) Note: If you like my stories and want to support -> https://ko-fi.com/butterfly_effect (link is also on my profile) ========= Chapter 20 “Isobel, We go find the High Priest of Darkness.” I took Isobel and my fur cloak. I wrote a note saying I went to see the sea. It's Odette's bad whims that they know. And I went to the stables. I had to ride north where the Temple of Darkness was. If I ride there, I'll be there in about a week or so. I did not rest on the ground. To speed things up, I used transport spells that were set up in some major cities and they were so expensive I had no choice, right? " Isobel, can you go to the Hulk first? And look what's up there? "Isobel wagged her tail once, but it remained in my arms. Isobel bowed her head in confusion and meow." So he prevented you from coming. Let's go." I went to towns with transfer periods and spent exorbitant money on them. If it wasn't my boss, I wouldn't care! He had to pay me! Two days later, I finally reached the far north. It was snowing. I saw in front of me a white snow mountain. There was a temple On top of this mountain. Just as when I entered my second life. I climbed the hill for another hour and finally reached the temple. The land outside the temple was empty. Did Rachel succeed in convincing the priests that the priests of darkness were not responsible for stealing the sharks, or did they already leave after Punish them? Before I knocked on the big door that closed the temple, it opened. There was a long dark passage leading to the unknown on the other side of the door. I stepped. I tried to find my way to this huge temple, after a while I found a room with a throne on the stage. A person with black hair and a black robe covered in silver was sitting on it. His mask was still on his face, but his face was more white than usual. His eyes were closed, too. He looked more like a statue than a living person. "Your grace?" I asked hesitantly. I melted my throat and then asked, "This grace of yours is your help, Odati, coming to meet you." Only my own voice echoed in this vast room. The man on the throne was motionless. I turned hesitantly to the throne. I walked. When I was a few meters away from him, I realized that it was still really like a statue. He wasn't even breathing. I walked worried. I went and grabbed his hand. It was as cold as ice. “Your blessing?” I started to shake his hand with my other hand. “Your blessing!” I started to panic. He wouldn't kill like that. Will not die! He was the great High Priest of Darkness, with countless rules to prevent him from conquering the world. Because of his immense strength among all the chief priests, he was given the nickname "Ishvara". There was no response on his part. My eyes seemed full of tears. I didn't cry. There has to be a way. ways to contact him. Some distant memories occurred to me. "Aren't you curious about my name?" he asked while playing with my hair. "What a bitter joke." Have you heard the saying that names have power? “Yes…” I wondered where he was going. It's an old saying, "smile like it was an inside joke it was" Hassan hasn't been used for a hundred years or so. Then there is some strength in the name.” At that time, I furrowed my eyebrows and tried to decipher his hidden words again. “Not so much for you now. But to me there is strength in names.” His natural smile returned to his face and then leaned forward to whisper a few words in my ear, like a lover’s whisper. “I’ll be there when you call me.” Tomorrow morning I will be killed, and unfortunately it will be of no use.” She smiled bitterly, “You're cheating. No use dead girl." A cow brought me to the present. This was Blake hovering near the ceiling. Can I wake him up? I called "Eve." "Get up, Eve Arden!" , her fingers moved, then her eyelids began to flutter, he finally opened his eyes. He raised his hand to pick up a tear that fell from my eyes. “I knew it had to be you.” “You are the one who always wakes me from my sleep,” he smiled. “You can’t say I’m cheating now.” I opened my eyes wide as I realized I did it. I took a few steps back. My face turned red at first and as time went paler and more pallor. Who gave birth to us over and over again? Is this all fun for you? Are you funny, watch me Tortured and dying again and again?” The smile on his face disappeared a moment ago. He took off the mask that was covering his face and looked at me with his red eyes and said, “Yes, that's me.” - ----------- ---------- Author's note Today's Bomb ===== ====== Chapter! Are you surprised? Hope you liked today's class ======== See you next time! ========== Chapter 21 "Am I kidding you? The past? One of your many pranks to entertain you?" I spit words like poison. He gave me signals. some. She refused to think about it or believe it. I was shivering with anger. It was funny to him that I would struggle all the time and then die tragically. I've already tried them all. Death, torment, hope and then failure. "You were killed in your first birth," she said suddenly. "After your death. When Rachel and her gang came to take the last piece of the jewel from my temple. I was killed. And then of course I resurrected myself. I am the High Priest of Darkness, under my arms many blacks were spells." And you didn't know me in your first life! Why did you revive me? "" The mantra exhausted my strength. “Before I could act again, I had to rest for a long time. It was like a knife piercing my heart,” he said coldly. So you need to entertain. I am enjoying. "I laughed." And I thought you were really helping me. I've always been a clown! “I cried. He looked at me without emotion. I realized that he was actually a heartless beast. He was a real man without feelings. He wore a mask everywhere. I hugged him. The cloak approached me, I was cold” I won’t deny it. This was my primary intention. But I love your company. For the first time in five hundred years. After his parents died, I refused to see them, "If you read the recording, you will realize that the God of Darkness does not have many followers. The Ardennes are the only family that worships the god. May God bless the Ardennes. We can live long. It is hard to be wounded. Immortality." You can deal with a long prison in the temple. If that is possible,” his lips finally lit up with a playful smile. " You can only end your life when you are appointed as the next High Priest. It was only when I was twenty-five that my father gave me his place. He could no longer handle imprisonment and immortality. He lived in this temple. Six hundred years. Now it's my turn.” He has nothing to do with me. I won't give her my mercy, I'm not Rachel.” I thought you'd come to find me after you incarnated in your third birth, but you ran across the ocean to the continent. I was angry. "I sighed. You know I'm a selfish animal." “In that whole life, not once did you come and try to save me!” “I said no Rachel. I said you didn’t need knights in shining armor to protect you.” “So you say flaws are mine?” “I told you to call me when you need me?” he said without expressions asked. “You know I can’t leave the temple without a reason.” . I was so weak after a spell to revive you and me, sometimes I would fall into a deep sleep to recover. "You need to call me to wake me up" I opened and closed my mouth again. He told me whenever I needed him, call her. But I did not believe him or his promise. He told me over and over that I woke him up and thought he was joking. "Now what? Now you can sneak out of your temple! I don't see you slumbering!" “The mantra weakened me, after three births, I was healed.” "You said you'd be passive, you don't need entertainment! Why did you put me down? Do you understand the pain of torture and open your eyes to find that I have to repeat it again? To be tortured again?" I want to die in peace! I broke down and started crying. I cried for the first time in my five life. I finally got rid of the loneliness, regret, hate and despair that filled me. “I am. I've been in this prison since I was born. I want this eternity to end too.” He left his throne and walked toward me. Then he patted my head.” And even though I’m in a slumber, I can feel my surroundings through Blake. This is the use of familiarity." Can I finally rest in peace after this life? I want to live a normal life and die when the time is right. I don't want to be involved in Rachel's mess anymore." "I don't know." "It's your magic!" "Have you ever wondered why I would revive myself if I wanted to end my semi-immortal life?" It was true, he said he wanted to end everything, but why would I revive? When did his wish come true?” Because you did not prepare the groom. Next High Priest?” I blew, wiping the tears from my eyes, laughed and said, “Partially, but not the main reason. The game that the gods play in this world is chess pieces. Another obscure phrase. "Aren't you tired, dancing here?" His usual smile returned to his face. I didn't know it was real. Forgive him now, I know I still have some anger towards him, but if I had not been given the opportunity to be born again, I would still be a naive, childish, sick heir to the end. I have a chance to meet Isobel. I didn't get the chance or... . I had no opportunity to do anything else to get to know the world outside of my engagement to Henry. “Although you are not tired of sitting here, neither am I,” said the selfish High Priest. “Stop… Where are you taking me?” she cried in shock as I carried her deep into the temple. "Let me get off!" Soon I lost all my inner struggles from my mind and tried to get rid of them. ------------- This author's note ========== I think this chapter is my favorite so far ;) Hope you like this story! see you later! ========== CHAPTER 22 I woke up when Isobel jumped on me, and kept tricking me with her claws. "Okay, well, stop eating Isobel." I hugged Isobel with one hand and sat down, rolling my fingers in my hair. Then I sat by the window and saw the High Priest of Darkness sitting there. across the room. Oh, I was still in the temple. I held my face in my hands. "Good morning, you're finally awake!" He said. And I'm hungry. Throw pillow. "Stop!" I evaporated when I left the room. He only cares about breakfast. I was still angry with him. Who cooks breakfast for him? "Miano". Isobel jumped out of nowhere. Jump several times. Meow bar then ran towards the room. Seeing me standing, he turned his head and looked at me. “Where did you steal the food?” I asked after a long silence. I couldn’t take it any longer. “Please don’t use such dirty words to describe me. You asked me to make you breakfast. So I did.” “What.. you cooked it?” “And is there another high priest in this room?” “You know how to cook?” “Otherwise, how can I live in this temple for hundreds of years?” “Why didn’t you cook first?” “Lazy.” . He looked at him and chewed the food in his mouth. You terrible tyrant. “Did the high priest punish you for violating the rules?” A normal smile swam across his face. “Are you worried that I will get hurt by them?” "I avoided his gaze." But I remember a man who rode upright for three days and cried on his knees before my throne. did you dream “I did not kneel or weep before your throne,” I said bitterly, nodding his head indifferently. This is a game that the chief priests and I play. Their punishment tickles. They suffer. I fell asleep listening to his buzzing sound. I'm not that weak. “He looked at me alert with his own eyes and then the smile returned.” I don't care about you anymore," she muttered. Sorry? “He thought it was you. Rachel ordered the shark to be stolen. I told that stubborn priest that I had no desire to associate with this stepmother, even in the same sentence. “I doubt they trust you. “They do. When Rachel comes to my temple to steal a piece "maybe they thought it was just a ploy." "If it's from me, I'll accept it. I don't like respecting others. I rolled my eyes. And are you planning to take revenge on Rachel? He replied with a mysterious smile. "How did you die in your third birth?" He asked suddenly. “I was killed by a fire priest lover in your previous life. So what is your third life?” “I was hanged for trying to betray my father.” I froze and then held my head in my hand and shouted, "Betrayal! How can I forget? Even if I let every trap now, if my father's infidelity is discovered, I'll still be dead! I just want to die! When I get old! Is it hard?" Eve smiled at me. She moaned with grief." Of course you do. Blake is spying on you. If there was Blake, why did you tell me to spy on Rachel?" "If I hadn't found you in this life, you might have forgotten about your father's betrayal when it was too late." You looked towards it. "That way it's more fun." shrug. "I'm not mad at you anymore." He was angry because when I was reborn in the third birth, I didn't come to find him. Maybe I didn't trust him as much as I thought. My second life was definitely the happiest of my four lives, but they all still ended tragically. I probably didn't want to break my heart again. "Rachel's next target was Earth Temple." "Oh yeah. You don't have to spy for me this time. The town where Bhumi Mandir is located is boring." He shook his hand indifferently. And feel free to reconcile your father's desire to betray the Emperor in time. “Sigh. Can I ask my father to disown me? I don’t belong to him at the time. No, that to me seems cold-blooded. My father. A magic book has been pushed on the table. Eve Lee smiled gleefully, “Feel free to use it. “Do you wish to turn me into the High Priest of Darkness and try to die after that?” “Not at all,” he smiled innocently. Even after five hundred years, you still couldn't reach the rank of inferior High Priest. It will take a long time. “I wanted to pour a cup of tea in front of his face. I kicked Eve under the table before pushing him away from the magic book. — The magic book was pushed on the table. Eve smiled at me but badly.” Feel free to use it.” “You make me a dark giant. Are you trying to become a priest and then die?” He smiled innocently “Not at all.” It's going to take a long time." I wanted to pour the cup of tea in front of me on his face. I took Eve away from him. He kicked the magic book under the table before being pushed. - A magic book was pushed on the table. Eve smiled warmly at me, "Feel free to use it." “Are you going to try to turn me into the high priest of darkness and then die would you? He smiled innocently, not at all. “Five hundred years later, you still can’t reach the low level of a High Priestess. It will take much longer.” I wanted to pour the cup of tea in front of me on his face. I kicked Yves under the table before pushing him away from the book of spells. - I wanted to pour a cup of tea in front of me on his face. I kicked Yves under the table before pushing him away from the book of spells. - I wanted to pour a cup of tea in front of me on his face. I kicked Yves under the table before pushing him away from the book of spells. ----------- Thanks for reading the author's note! see you later! ========== Chapter 23 I was very disappointed. I didn't remember much about my father's infidelity case in my third life. I hid on a continent across the ocean for more than seven years. After I got home, I was arrested and then sent to prison. I haven't really heard much about this issue. Was my dad framed? You can't blame me for thinking that, Father was a priest in Pawan Mandir. But he was not the high priest. He was one of the many temple priests. He didn't even have a great deal of strength. The father was not a fool. This is not a king with the little power he has in the temple. In our country, the emperor or empress was considered neutral. The king blesses all the gods. They do not worship any particular deity. This prevented each temple from supporting its candidate. Thus, not all potential successors study in any temple. How did the father try to betray? What was he cheating on? I was pulling my hair when Isobel meowed. "You look very frustrated." The heartless demon known as Eve laughed shamelessly. You looked towards it. “You asked me to solve my father’s riddle, yet I devote all my mind power to it! I have no idea! Is your folded heart content now? This despair of seeing me?” I know you know. Blake was spying the whole time. His smile deepened. “I am the High Priest of Darkness, I do not work for free.” "so, what do you want?" "I'm going to take a nap now. It would be nice to have tea when I wake up. Even better if its timing is perfect. I was nervous but there was a small wound I needed to find you. There was no point in fooling my mind when it was clear that I didn't have this information. I left. The room to make some cookies ----------- - grabbed a tray of cake and tea, and went into the room where Eve was sleeping. When I opened the door, he was already awake, sitting in an armchair. I'm late "Do you want it or not?" He turned towards me and took a piece of biscuit from the tray. He put a bit in it and said, “I learned a lot last time, really. Two lives. The spoiled girl I met before definitely couldn't bake cookies.” “Try to be a good friend with Rachel, I'm sure you're good at baking three-ingredient cakes.” Layers.” “Want something?” He ate half. The cookie in front of me said "All just..." He put the cookie over my mouth and I took a stray bite. Then my face exploded. "Do you want to eat or not?" Threaten started laughing uncontrollably. "Why are you still shy?" He looked at me with a big smile on his face. He gently patted my head and took the tray from my hand and sat on the chair. And he said, "I think you know that your half-sister has finally become an Empress. An Empress." " Holy Empress Rachel... hey, that means she didn't marry the emperor? She thought she was married to the emperor and crowned the empress. Does this mean that she was a ruler?” “Of course, she does not aim for anything less than that. I don't think your half-sister chose to be one of the fools around you in the end.” “So my father created?” “Imagine if your daughter ascended to the throne, but you find yourself trying to find your husband. His missing daughter, your stepdaughter. What do you think?” “My stepmother? Did you think I would jeopardize Rachel's status as queen? So you planned to kill my father and me? That's stupid. On what grounds can I threaten the talented Holy Empress Rachel?” He blushed. “All I can say is that your stepmother is more stupid than you can imagine. I persuaded some of Rachel's foolish attackers to carry out this plan." "This...so an idiot killed me?" I cried in despair. "Sometimes fools are stronger than wise men." He's back. Holding a chair and another cookie in his hand, I was speechless, it was mine because I was killed in the third birth What will happen to the rest of my life? “Yes, it turns out he had a role in your death in your first life as well,” said Eve nonchalantly. "It looks like your father found out what your stepmother did a few months after you died. It was a big scandal, so I asked about you." Why are you telling me this? I asked you the right questions so you could tell me. "boring?" No, I didn't believe him, because of all this, I thought he wanted to tell me that my dad really cared about me. It was my stepmother who thought I should be more careful of who--who, looking at him for a moment then left the room, and when I came back had a bowl of macaroni for me. Put it on the table in front of him "I cooked more than I thought." Having said this, I turned my head, laughing as he didn't catch my red prickly ear. Then I pulled my little finger. Then he said to him, "Let's eat together." ------------------- This author's note is sweet ========================= == ================================================== =============== See you later! ========== Chapter 24 "Not because I'm complaining, but can you stay here longer?" Eve stood behind the chair I was sitting on, leaned over and whispered in my ear. "Can you speak properly!" I moved away from him. He laughed and finally sat down on the seat next to me. "And they don't care until I finally get back." I waved carelessly. He looked at me with his all-knowing red eyes, as if hoping for a scene this time to entertain her. "Why are you looking at me like that? You guessed me again!" It was always like this, I disappeared, went shopping all over the country, and my dad didn't say anything. Didn't care until I got back. "I've given you enough signs already, don't come to hate me when you encounter difficulties." He blushed, a familiar smile still floating on his face. advice? What do I miss? I thought about my past life. At this point, I was already dying in my second and fourth life. When I was alive at three, I was in hiding then. So I left my first life. At that moment I remembered that Henry had thrown me in front of all his family. My hatred for Rachel only increased. I was always thinking of ways to defeat Rachel. The final selection of the Wind Temple was only a few weeks away and there I met my final torment. At that time, I remembered, scandals and gossip began to circulate around me. Like the fact that I have many lovers, Enri pushed me. Like how I beat up my slaves. On the other hand, Rachel is described as an angel, an angel who came down on our land. This definitely made me more angry at the time. Final selection of Pawan Mandir for Priests and Priests. My last downfall. Those gossip. My stepmother had a hand in my death. Now I guess even that gossip is from my stepmother. But I have never been such a hater of my stepmother and Rachel in this life. I was following basic etiquette. Not too close, but not too aggressive. She doesn't plan to kill me in this life, does she? “Can my stepmother do me any harm?” I asked hesitantly. “Could you be afraid that I would jeopardize Rachel’s position in the Temple of the Winds?” Eve didn't say anything, but continued to carelessly feed Blake. “This is stupid, I am bad at magic. Everyone knows this. There is no way I can defeat a daughter goddess!” “But you were born again” “Stop…” Since I've lived four lives already, my ability to cast magic has greatly improved And I wasn't great at everything, but I was brilliant. This is because I spent more time in my first life studying magic after my death. I knew I didn't have time to read when I didn't hate Rachel. It is true that Rachel can master every spell by simply casting it. " Although my magical abilities aren't as bad as I previously thought, that doesn't mean I can't use them. I can beat my daughter. Rachel is a genius.” “Isobel, I need your help.” When you get back, I'll cook you a big meal. OK?” I smiled at Isobel and stroked her fur. Isobel meowed and then disappeared. “Great meal.” Eve raised his eyebrows. “And the person who helped you got nothing. How does the world change after sleep? What an unjust world.” “You priest of darkness, what do you know about justice?” “Contrary to popular belief, the god of darkness is a god who places great emphasis on equality and justice. And I am a friend of God’s command.” I rolled my eyes at him. “And do not forget that you are now a visitor to the Dark Temple.” He smiled at me. “What do you want? Macaroons? Maybe my stepmother isn't as bad as you say it is! Then I won't worry about anything." "You want to bet?" He leaned down, his face an inch away from me. I really believed it about my stepmother. That's all I was saying. If my stepmother was involved, that would explain a lot of things. Deal with Rachel. From experience, there is not even a drop of malice in Rachel's heart. So I was saddened that his captives, who were such reckless creatures who obeyed all his commands, had devised such a cruel plan to get rid of me in my first life. But what if she was his stepmother? In my third life, I remembered Rachel as soon as she entered the scene. Who still remembers me after seven years? But as soon as I was caught, rumors spread about Rachel's bullying. Gossip about painful details about me and my family that only insiders know. This always bothered me. Now if my stepmother is involved that can be explained. I don't like to bet with him unnecessarily. I escaped his sight. "are you scared?" His lips were wrinkled, his face barely an inch away from me. In the end, I decided to close my eyes while waiting for my sentence. ---------- Another sweet author's note ==================================================== ================================================== == = ==================== Chapter! Well, am I too generous? ; p tell me what you think! Thanks for reading, see you next time! ========== Chapter 25 My stepmother has already started working. Rumors spread throughout the capital that I had many lovers and that I did not always return home. "That's funny, what does that mean?" I closed my eyes. "Isobel, come on." Isobel stopped playing with Blake near the fire and ran towards me. Isobel sat in front of me and turned her head. I patted Isobel's head with this. "Help me give this to Sarah. Then I'll give you another big meal." I put the medicine bottle and the note in front of Isobel. After a "meow" sound, Isobel disappeared with the bottle and the note. Yves, who was lying on the couch with his face covered throughout, removed his face after Isobel's disappearance. " Are you going to leave it like that?” he asked. “That's boring.” “I beg your pardon, your heart bent on entertainment. "You nodded anxiously." It’s not worth my time, medicine should work.” A real potion from your spell book. I knew there was something sinister about this potion of truth in the Dark High Priest’s spell book!” I applauded excitedly. Liked Twisted Yaw? Why were you excited? I said it was worth my time to deal with. It wasn't worth my stepmother, but lecturing her was a very different thing, I had already asked Sarah to include this medicine in my stepmother's breakfast, and at breakfast I asked Sarah to mention the bad rumors my father had recently spread about me. This might raise a dose of truth. "Oh, that's nothing special. People who take this truth medicine won't stop talking until they reveal every lie they've read and every bad thing they've done in their lives." An evil smile crossed his face. " I wonder how many lies your stepmother made up to capture your father's heart.' Perhaps she is as innocent as snow, like my dear stepmother. I did not believe that sentence at all. Now that I am so excited about this huge drama, a dose of simple truth definitely couldn't make it. My stepmother is to the country to recover from her illness. Rachel's birthday party next week. Please go back to the property. I read the note Sarah sent me via Isobel. Ives said, "What an idiot for your stepmother. What a boring father." In order to maintain the family's prestige, the father sent my stepmother to the countryside, adding that the father needed Rachel to continue the marriage between my family and Henry, I have now announced that I will not take back Henry. The father cannot divorce my stepmother. So Our great work continues. I had to go to Rachel's birthday party. I had to find a gift for him. Never mind, I'll buy something from the town near the Temple of Darkness. “Will you come back?” asked Eve with a frowned brow. He was still resting on his sofa, reading a book. I raised my eyebrows and said: A sad amusement that leaves you rotting in boredom? He smiled and nodded: "I want a box of macaroons. Rent one. You sure did." Smile. When I threw the pillow at him, I looked at him. I hump the fare. I've never seen such a thick-skinned person. "I'm going to town to shop." I wear my coat. And I will show you the place. "He finally got off the sofa and went there. He helped me cover my cloak." After all this is my city. “He smiled sympathetically. She looked at him suspiciously. This looked like a trap. Don’t you need someone to grab your bags and things while you shop?” He said with a fake laugh at his smile. They were very angry. Now let’s go. He grabbed my hand and pulled me out of the structure. I was still thinking as his car pulled us down the hill to the town near the temple. He must be planning something. I have never been. He looked at them with great enthusiasm, or did you? Confused, Eve shopped with me in the afternoon helping me with luggage and bags like a really nice shopping partner. For my concerns, he also gave advice on which dress to buy. "Can you stop giving me this side look? You make me think I'm a bad person who's going to hurt you." “And you can confidently say that you are not?” “I am the High Priest of Darkness, Oda.” He helped me pull a lock of my hair. But I can say with great confidence that I will not harm you. shopping with me? I shook my head to clear my head. "Stop moving." He put his hand on my head. "I'm afraid you'll hurt the little mind you left." I rolled my eyes and threw my wallet at him. ---------------- Author's Note This is so cute ========== Chapter S, I think it will end the sweetness and start some events what time? see you later! ========== Chapter 26 I smile gracefully as I forgive myself the fifth person who came to me today. They all came from well-established aristocratic families and they all had the same element. Not all of them are heirs to their families. They were not important to their families. They all indicated that they do not mind marriage in my family. Rachel had a birthday party, but at the same time my father put me on dozens of blind dates. Was he worried about marrying me ASAP so that Rachel could marry into the Henry family? I couldn't take it anymore. I bothered my teeth. I looked at where this party was taking place and Rachel was there. “Happy Birthday Rachel,” I greeted her with a smile on my face. "This is my gift to you". I put the gift box with the necklace in her hand. "Thanks Odette! You're finally back from vacation! I missed you!" Rachel came and hugged me. I received a deer from the silver-haired Lucian who is standing behind Rachel. I rolled my eyes inside. Poor Lucien, you wouldn't be happy if you had this. Rachel had at least 5 other strikers at all times. "How's your search so far, Rachel?" I asked curiously. Last time I heard she was on her way to Prithvi temple. If she succeeded, Eve Temple was her next target. Eve was definitely planning something, it all started while he was there. In my first life, both of us were killed. He cast a reborn spell four times. This time he was finally retrieved from the sewer by casting that spell. For some unknown reason, she was convinced in time, he hatched the plot and eventually began implementing his plan in this life. "You got the pieces back, Odette! It's an uphill battle," she said sadly. "Lucian got hurt because he saved me!" When Lucian hugged her closely and comforted her, her eyes filled with tears. Rachel looked at Lucien gratefully and took his hand. "They won't understand why!" Rachel cried. "The shards want to reconnect! It hurts me to hear the cry of my soul!" Is your soul... wounded? This is a fun way to say it. All I can say is that I understand how the soul hurts. Now, Rachel said. Lucian gently wiped the tears from her face, "The last bit left. Then the pieces will be found again." “Congratulations, Rachel. But where is the last piece?” I asked innocently, not knowing where the last piece was.” It’s in the Dark Lord’s temple. “His beautiful eyes blurred for a second before his face settled again.” No matter how hard The thing is!” “I didn’t know how to act, all I could do was smile supportively and change the subject.” Look, you love your birthday present.” “It’s so beautiful, Odette!” Her eyes glittered in knots. “Thank you very much. And Lucien, help me wear them!” Her fingers rested on giant amethyst necklaces. Was the necklace like this? I thought it was very simple. I didn't think much about Rachel's gift. I thought about her situation and chose something suitable for her. Maybe you like sapphire or it's good. I turned it off. After a few friendly exchanges, I go back to my bedroom. Fortunately, the father did not care about my spying this time. I was reading a novel in my room in which I saw a flower. It is the only flower found in the Garden of the Dark Temple. I saw Eve standing in front of me, a lazy smile on his face. I closed my lips anxiously. "what are you doing here?" I asked in a confused tone. "Rachel is in this mansion too! What if I find you? Do you know her fate! If she suddenly had the intuition to break into my room?" In response, he nodded. “Without having to watch him, she stays with one of her companions and two more will line up to meet her. How predictable is your stepmother's life.” He had a point. “But that still doesn’t explain why you are here?” "B..." "Don't say you're bored." You looked towards it. "I bring you a message." I look upset. "message?" " Do you know where your half-sister will go next? “I asked on purpose. She nodded seriously.” She can come to see me... "I put the flower by the window," four days. "Why? Did he tell me this? Does he want me to do something?" "And all you have to do is...stay in this room." My eyes widened in confusion. “Do not step anywhere near the temple. Stay well in this room, Odette.” He stood in front of me, his hands tightly pressed to my shoulder, looking at me seriously. “But…” “Oh, I know, you must be curious. You can cry whatever you want. I can even teach you how to do magic. Give me a word, don’t go near the temple under any circumstances.” He leaned forward and whispered the last part. next to my ear. Should I cast the dreaded spell Eve gave me before I left? Thinking, I was moving from one side of my room to the other. I found that the hem of my dress was wilting from below. saw. Without noticing, I was twisting my clothes. What was Eve planning? I knew I had to spray the water, then everything would be clear. But I was afraid...afraid that the scene before me would see Rachel and her knights defeat or kill Eve. Wait, Odette. There is no point in killing yourself from the inside like this no matter what. I decided, I went back to my four-poster bed and covered myself with my feathered quilt. I took out the crystal ball that Eve had given me, threw bubbles at the mantra and whispered next to my ear. Mist started to fill a clear crystal ball at once. As the mist dissipated, a dark temple hall appeared. A hall with a throne. Yves sat on the throne, his face covered with his usual mask, his usual smile on his face. Rachel and her knights were armed with shiny weapons. There were seven of them. Eight against one, how fair is it? I started moving my finger. No matter how strong Eve is, Rachel is still with the seven most capable wizards. Add to the fact that Rachel is almost indomitable. “Good day, High Priest of Darkness.” Rachel rolled her face with a sweet smile. "I'm coming for a shark that I think you have right now. Can you be kind enough to give me those poor bits so they can join again?" Rachel put her hands in front of him, and after a flash, an object appeared in her hand that glowed so powerful that it hurt my eyes. The material emits beams of light in all colors but you cannot see any one color individually. The body was heart-shaped, but it did not contain a large part of it. It should be the last piece. heart? An idea came to my mind, but before I could understand it, I backed out. Rachel was still smiling sweetly and with a sparkling heart in her hand, she seemed like a saint coming to cleanse the world. The Seven Knights looked around Rachel at Eve, it might seem like a peaceful exchange if you exclude the fact that their weapons could strike at any moment. "Meet again?" Eve asked with a smile on his lips. "Yes, meet again. The last shark summons my soul. It earns its reunion with the other sharks." Soon there was silence. It was the longest few seconds I've ever had. Then Eve said, "Sure." He hit his finger and then I saw the ground shaking. Soon the knights surrounded Rachel and began to cast spells on the wives. Eve patted his foot and a black mist surrounded him. The spells cast on him were all destroyed as soon as he touched the mist. After a few seconds, the black mist dissipated. Eve nodded, "I'm impatient, I asked for a sliver in my temple, so I'll give it to you." He pointed to a high stone pillar in front of Rachel, the shiny piece resting on a pillow. “There is such bad behavior of priests these days.” Rachel's gaze was fixed on the pieces on the pillow. She moved forward with her hand outstretched as if she had forgotten. Henry put his hand on her shoulder and said, "Rachel, it could be a trap!" "No, it's not. The piece is referring to me. It's the last piece!" His eyes were feverish. "Churi might have traps, Rachel! It can't be that easy!" One of Rachel's knights shouted. Rachel tried to stop them one by one. But Rachel, with a frenzied look on her face, ignoring every warning of her knights, and pushing any hand that got in her way, the shark got closer and closer. He finally got the last sliver in his hand. Once the latter melted sharply with a heart-like body in his hand. I was blinded by the rays of light for a moment. When my vision returned, my whole heart was now floating in the air. Eve was still sitting on his throne, with the same confident smile on his face. No wonder he did. Maybe he didn't repeat his life over and over again like me. Yves said he was killed in his first life. Was he killed because he refused to give Rachel a piece? But Rachel did not kill anyone in her search. Yes, the high priest was mortally wounded, but he was not killed. Seeing his attitude from the start, he did not care about Sharpe. Or in other words, they didn't care about the sharks when they were still separated. Wanted them in one? And Rachel, unknowingly, do you work for him? He wanted to take the crystal heart out of Rachel's hand, but Rachel and her knights killed them? But why didn't he do that? He had the strength. Can Rachel just catch the shark? For centuries only Rachel managed to pierce the wings around the Shard in the Wind Temple. Rachel Key? Just who is he? At that very moment, the crystal heart started to shine again and then went straight into Lucian's body. Rachel had a man with silver hair. Rachel's friend. The man who followed Rachel broke the curse of the stray dog ​​that had saved him. Lucian took her heart. Finally Eve abdicated his throne. He got on his knees and put his left hand on his heart and bowed his head. He said, "Lucian, God of Light, please accept my humble compliments." ---------------- Author's note work. Previous Chapter Activity ========== There are some clues in the class. See if you can catch them! see you later! ========== Chapter 28 Gods of Light... What? My eyes moved wide. "God of Light?" Rachel grumbled. So Eve's goal was to revive the God of Light? But wasn't he the High Priest of the Lord of Darkness? And why did he kill him in his first life? I was more confused. Lucian, or the supposed god of light, grabbed his head in pain. "Lucian!" Rachel cried. Hug her and try to calm her pain. "What happened? Why are you in so much pain?" Tears began to fill his eyes. Lucien cried out in pain, holding her head. "Lucian!" A torrent of tears flowed from his face. And what can I do to relieve your pain? I wish I could bear your pain, Lucien. Seeing you this way breaks my heart. “The God of Light is not complete,” Eve said, “until the last piece is returned. Otherwise it is mortal who keeps the memories of the Lord without any divine power. Especially since those memories are not meant for men to come.” “The last piece?” asked Rachel. The last piece of my soul, which my soul called me to!” Phrase this again. Wait... a soul? This is the last part... Rachel said" Don't you dare, Arden!" Lucien shrieked gnashing his teeth. He stood forward and saved Rachel from Eve. Try to use his strength. Who. As Eve said, her strength was not even close to the divine level, if Rachel was the last piece, then everything would make sense, If Eve's goal was to revive the God of Light, he would have captured Rachel. In the context of "The Last Piece to Save Rachel", the last Piece is meant to take Rachel's life. Otherwise, Lucien wouldn't have to work on the "Last Snippet" reference. Eve tried to kill Rachel in his first life. Lucian may not have had the power of God but he had the memory of God. He could find a way to save himself and Rachel. It adds to the fact that the gods have blessed Rachel so much. He is himself a genius unparalleled by the high priests of other temples.” What Dare?” Eve asked. He returned to his throne. “I haven’t moved an inch since you entered the Dark Temple. I am now explaining the position of my hand.” Lucien looked at Eve uncertainly. Wait, what's the point of that last piece? Rachel arched herself behind the tight protection of all her seven knights. Eve's lips quivered, 'It's inside your soul.' Rachel asked 'My soul?' Confused. Then his face became fixed. “How can I save Lucien?” How can I return this last piece of my soul to Lucian? “No, Rachel, you don't have to! His hand was gently caressing Rachel's face. I could have lived without the last piece Rachel, being Rachel, you've never been of this.” You're not looking! You're hurting! I must help you! Tell me, your grace, how can I save Lucien?” He reached out and looked at Eve with his watery eyes. It's as simple as that," Eve's lips folded into a perfect smile. "All you have to do is die." He broke his finger and immediately Rachel caught his heart in pain. The corner of his mouth began to bleed. Then the knights began attacking Eve. He insisted, "You Rachel, what's wrong with you?" ". Lucian immediately tried to heal Rachel with his power, but he did nothing, Rachel coughed up more blood. "I do her wish," said Eve. Rachel, don't die. Rachel… Rachel…” Lucien muttered softly. He was doing his best, but Rachel’s breath became softer and softer. After Lucien gave one last smile, closing her eyes forever I did it. Something sharp in my heart, couldn’t have happened. ..Is Rachel dying like this? Is it simple? Although Rachel made my life miserable, she was still a person. A man who was the benevolence of all in his life. Even Eve did not manage to commit a murder in his first life. But in this life He easily lost his life in a few seconds. There is something wrong, something unusual. When Rachel's life dries up, something bright and shiny comes out of her body. Then it disintegrated into a million pieces, with one piece flying into Lucian's body. Strength and light crept into his body until he finally transformed. . His form did not change, but the enthusiasm he displayed was definitely different from the mortal he was before. He hit Rachel's face one last time and then stood up. “You will regret it, Arden,” he said, disappearing from the temple. Eve's face turned red. There was a worried look on his face. Anxiety... Before I could finish my thoughts, a hand got stuck in my throat and choked me. With my vision blurred, I begin. “It has nothing to do with him, God of Light,” Eve’s voice was heard out of nowhere. Shall we go back to the temple? Then my stranger must be the god of light that I felt. The hand of God on my neck loosened a little, as my vision floated, air rushed into my lungs. Eve was kneeling in front of Lucien, who looked at me with concern in his eyes. "Nothing to do with that?" Lucien was joking. "Don't you think you would have killed my dear Rachel had it not been for her birthday present?" Angrily jumped. "Yeah, it may be damned in defeat," said Eve, "but it's still my job." "It has nothing to do with Odette. She doesn't know that I slayed the gift." "I can't kill you," said Lucien. "But I can kill him." His grip on my neck became stronger again. "If my death calms your anger and Odette's life, then I can do your will," said Eve firmly. Then he began to recite the mantra. According to Eve's words, Lucian loosened his grip on me. I was savagely thrown to the ground. After panting for air, my eyes cleared and I noticed that Eve's face was already pale. Finally he shed blood. She said holding her breath: "What was It should be dragged into this mess at first. My father wants to be the only daughter and be the heir.” But the gods dragged her into their game. He changed his fate. His half-sister’s gaze is a blessing to Rachel… I am making up for the mess the gods have created… Please leave him alone… “I admire your dedication to saving Your beloved…” said the God of Light, “But nothing can bring Rachel back in me. Nobody can calm my anger. You don't even die! " A beam of light spurted out from his palm. Like lightning, it shot into my stomach.” Oddite!” His face turned even more ash and he coughed uncontrollably. I lay on the cold marble. Temple gone stone was bleeding from my stomach. I was wonderfully calm, that was for me. So familiar, I die again, will this be the end? Is God responsible for my misfortune? Were you just a chess piece at his game? To be abandoned after the end of his mission. Something cool to touch my hand. It was Eve, who was wandering his way through the temple. His expression in my second life was similar to that of the night before my death. A sign of sadness, a sign of regret, and what next? "I'm sorry, I ran," she said faintly. She raised an eyebrow in surprise. Did the dictator just apologize? She said wistfully, "I thought I could make it happen by giving that poor girl who was framed in the God game another chance at life. I was so full. No one can escape from God." He was caressing my face. " This is your last life...and my life. All your troubles will be over.” When I tried to hold his face with my other hand, my fingers began to tremble. I smiled with relief, and I finally realized that the curse of reincarnation for me was not only for his amusement, but a part of him cursing me. I said in a soft voice: “What… is You can hug me one last time. I feel cold." Eve hugged me back. As I became colder and colder due to the loss of blood, I felt a presence like God in the temple. Eve whispered in my ear: "Odette has lived a long time, don't forget that when you grow up your will dies." I looked up inches from My face a moment ago to find a sad mask on his face. In its place was his usual smile. Then I realized that this was his whole plan! No wonder I didn't die after bleeding for so long! ----------------- -- Author's Note All readers have complained about the previous chapter =========== So here's the next chapter === === = === Chapter! == Chapter 29 " Lucien, does that girl really mean a lot to you? Do you have to kill my only supporter for revenge?” A cold voice was heard in the Temple. “You don’t understand,” Lucian shouted sadly. “Thousands of years ago you didn’t understand, you still don’t understand! Rachel is my life! Without it, what's the point of being God again?" That's a shocking word. I didn't know if I would appreciate his love or turn a blind eye to such a dramatic declaration. I now realize that my injury looks serious, but I'm not dying the way I thought it should be. God’s power is fatal to us, but the wound wasn’t as painful as I expected. It wasn’t like being stabbed in my previous life. That was weird… I was still in Eve’s arms. He also had the decency to play with my wristband. Wait… Didn’t he play with a bracelet My a while ago? On my way back from town, the day I bought Rachel her birthday present. I looked at him and returned with a familiar smile. Did you cast a protective spell on the bracelet? To absorb a portion of the energy he threw at Lucian? A sigh brought me back to reality. "I don't understand where your intense love comes from! How long have you two known each other? A few weeks! And then you have to get rid of everything? Even your life?" A cold voice tinged with disgust. In the center of the temple is a voice dressed in black in front of Lucian. Lucian replied, "A person without a heart will not understand you for a million years." Then he started attacking the masked man. "You must order the murder of Rachel!" "Dear brother, I'm saving you, if you don't come back, other gods are planning to replace you! All this plan is to humiliate you, don't you understand? They took you with that girl's soul." Mix up a piece and rebuild it to trap Rachel! Look what you would have done if Eve Rachel had not been killed. You are about to give up your divine power! You will die a mortal death! “This is my choice! At least as a human, I could spend the rest of my life with Rachel. What do I get now, God of Light? Rachel's not with me!" Brother, continue to fight the god of darkness. According to legends, the god of light and the god of darkness were actually twins. The head figure should be in front of Lucian. God of darkness. "When are you going to get some brains, brother? You're a god! You have the power of a god! If you want your Rachel so badly, collect the pieces of her soul floating around you, while they're still there! Then you have little chance of resurrecting him, but what do you do? My only killer My follower is destroying my skeleton!” I nodded angrily. His head figure, the God of Darkness, raised his hand. A circle began to form in his palm. With a flick of her other hand, Lucian's ruins in the temple began to form a doll in the shape of Rachel. He forcefully pushed the globe toward the marble statue and then applauded. And see how you harness the power of God! He might damage his body, but you can build him one! Only useless crying when faced with a problem. What a shame for my brother. What a shame, Lord. The masked character left her brother and went to Elena, who was crying with joy when the marble doll named Rachel opened her eyes. God's dark face is still covered in the shadows of the hood if Lucian's twin brother, are they both alike? Then I realized that my wound had stopped bleeding and there was not an iota of pain left. But oh my god, Eve kept singing, 'You'd better leave now.' Medal of God can appear at any time. Rachel's revival, while a fine feat, is against the Book of Orders. Like you, sir. “The Dark God nodded in agreement and then disappeared into the dark mist. I watched the whole exchange with my mouth. Was the Dark God with the System God? Were you afraid?” The God of Darkness said Eve, the usual mask of laziness on his face, “System is a nightmare. The God of Light is an idiot. The God of Darkness is an old man, send him away as soon as possible.” “Yes?” “Come, I’m tired. Let’s sleep a little.” Then he dragged me and grabbed my hand, leaving the wreckage, the lovebirds, and the third wheel (Rachel Knights) behind. --------------------- Author's Note There is a lot in this ===================== == ============= I promise Rachel will never be seen again, ha ha ha, although her legend lives on... Note: I'm considering a title for my new story, companion to this story, the main characters are mentioned over here! Guess who the lucky ones are ;) Here are some titles to consider, who wouldn't like better? - the villain who failed to bring down the gods - the villain who defeated evil - after the evil failed to bring down the god =========== Chapter 30 I couldn't sleep. What happened to me this evening was blowing my mind. Rachel was killed and then rose from the dead. The silver-haired suitor's dog Rachel is actually a god of light. Just because the dog and God charm is only a reflection, doesn't mean I can accept it! More importantly, I was just a chess piece in God's game. All my sorrows seem irrelevant to him. Eve and the God of Darkness were talking about the game the gods were playing, but what exactly is that game? Rolled for the tenth time. I couldn't sleep, and had to get some answers. "Eve, get up." His call is trembling. "Get up! Get up! Get up!" The man in front of me groaned and covered his eyes with his forearm. "You said you could wake me up whenever you wanted, but I never expected that. Can't your curiosity wait?" "number." "I'm so glad you now know how to use my name, and I'm so happy." He smiled to kill me. "what do you want to know?" "Right. What are the gods planning?" "We the people, except for the gods, have all lost their memories. Once they made a pact with Satan, it forced them to give up their memories in exchange for more power. Eve bit him into a macaroon with his hand and said 'Many years ago humans, gods and animals lived in peace, the gods ignored the existence of Animals and humans are their servants. Humans, with the help of the gods, began to invade the land of animals, and at that time the gods were still hiding in our land all the time, and they found humans amusing. This delicate equilibrium persisted for a long time. Have you thought about what happened next? Were the animals unhappy? “If I had been in animal mode, would I have done it. Animals were originally neglected by humans and humans and humans encroached upon their habitats. Animals were a large group, some as weak as men, but some as in the power of the gods. The mighty decided to rebel against the gods. They planned to drag the gods down.” “Where did Rachel come from?” The old man said that the animals chose camels with a heart of gold and sent them to the Temple of Light. “He turned his eyes. Like I said, gods were far from humans. And the God of Light was a fool…” Was he referring to the God of Darkness as an old man? Put another one together. "So the god of light loved Rachel. But how did he kill her? She is a god!" " While gods and men used magic, animals were born with their powers and abilities. Didn't you learn anything from bedtime stories? All clues are found. The bedtime stories of the invaders and the stories are gone.” He smiled savagely. In those stories, evil beasts had all kinds of powers and abilities. Like poison, like the sound that hypnotizes people, they can make the best indomitable weapons out of their bones. They can change their appearance to look like a human, But they were also an animal at the same time.” “Was Rachel an animal?” “No, she was deadly. An animal hypnotizes her and she goes through exactly the plan. The animals gave her a dagger specially designed to pierce the spirit of God. The hypnotic Rachel has killed the god of light. The soul of the God of Light finally shattered into a million pieces.” “And the gods didn’t see anything at that time?” I asked. The God of Darkness and his High Priest knew many details. “Okay,” Eve smiled mischievously. Do you think it is possible? These are dark thoughts and dark plans.” “So… the Dark God knew about this plan? And didn't it stop him from killing his brother?" Eve blushed, "He found it amusing. The most interesting thing he's found in years. He wasn't neutral at first. He is the god of darkness. He can start a war to entertain himself. That's all I know." Earth. May be inspired by it." So when the monsters plotted to kill his brother, he stood still and the plan worked? “He is God, and God is proud and narcissistic. “Eve laughed. Who knew his brother was so stupid?” So he thought his brother might catch the trap and kill Rachel, but in the end his brother was a god who found love more important than his life. “But by collecting his soul pieces, they can revive him. Why did the gods keep these pieces in their temples?” I indicated. “The gods were all thirsty for power, when the twin brothers of Light and Darkness were so powerful, they were like kings over them. Now one of them has fallen. Do you think they will abandon the God of Light? Revive them and control them again? “But wouldn’t the god of darkness agree? “Who knows what the old man was thinking at the time? Perhaps he was having fun. Perhaps he thought that his foolish brother should be punished. Perhaps he was ashamed to say anything. If it were me, I would have let this fool rot in hell.” “But.” Animals still fail in the end, right?” “Of course, even if the other gods sat in the back seat when the animals were killed. The gods responded with a great god. Expressing his gratitude by banishing the forbidden forest. The gods are greedy.” She nodded indifferently. The god of darkness said that the gods recreated Rachel as a trap for the god of light. If they wanted the God of Light gone, why would Rachel start over to revive him now? See how sleep deprivation can wreak havoc on your brain? I used my mind. "It's the dark side." There is a god who wants to revive his brother. Except for the fact that Rachel has gone missing. Or all his knights weep in their temples for the annoyance of their chief priests. I didn't know where Rachel had gone, but I think Lucien brought her back to her divine presence. After Rachel left, she became the only heir to the family. My father was once again concerned about the problem of my marriage. "Odette," she sighed. And I think you have an understanding of the situation we're facing. Rachel... has been out of contact for a few months. Henry's family... ah... worried. “Does he care about his newborn bride or does Henry cry like a loser all day long?” After a minute of silence, the father answered: "Both." Now you see what a loser Henry is and how he loves Rachel, do you still want me to marry him? "I raised an eyebrow." not at all! The father's angry face was red. “I will not allow my daughter to marry such a loser!” “Ah. Are we done then?” “The thing is, run. I'm afraid they might set their eyes on you again.” Now that Rachel is gone, you'll be a candidate again. You know the Henry family wants to join us.” Everyone in this world is a chess piece, “I whispered. My father was surprised by my words. After a while he said, "I don't know if I want to marry Henry. So you should marry as soon as possible. Before anyone of his choosing, he loses all hope for Rachel. I'm just a priest in the Temple of the Winds, but Enri's grandfather is the High Priest." If his grandfather asks the emperor to marry into your family, I can't stop it. My mind. I quickly pushed him into the back of my mind. We met several times even after that incident, but he was bothering me as before. We were only the master and his servants. Nothing else He cursed me for reincarnation, partly because he felt sorry for me, but in large part because he wanted to entertain. I guessed things were off. And what do I want you to do?” “Here is the list of eligible young men who can marry into our family. Odette, You don't have to leave the house. Invite them to a family dinner. “I nodded once and left the room. Everyone in this world is a chess piece in each other’s game. I sighed. ------- --------- - ---- I met the candidate after a father had been chosen The candidate for me was undoubtedly one of the most worthy and desirable choices of a husband in society. But I was not thrilled when he struck me with witty remarks or when he invited me to dance. I knew to avoid the fate of marrying Henry, someone he loved. Soon he had to marry. But all this He felt wrong. None of them understood me. They still thought I was dear, there was an innocent heir, some people said that after marriage I will stay at home, they said that now there is no need to study in the temple. But I am no longer the stupid crazy heir. I want to make sense In life Something has to be done I have some work Something to be proud of They will never understand the fatigue I have felt in so many lives The worry that one day another Rachel will come and steal everything. Even though I was surrounded by many people, I felt lonely. "If you marry me, I can buy you one, whether it's jewelry or a handbag!" said the man standing in front of me. I don't need anyone to buy me anything. I can buy it...Someone chirping said: "She likes to buy things herself. With her own money." I turned my head and smiled as I saw Eve standing behind me. "who are you?" The man shouted angrily. "Why are you here?" I asked at the same time. "I'm bored. You have a great party here, can I join it?" How does he usually smile, but why did I suddenly feel a chill in my spine? Does he look angry? "Of course, of course." I replied with a stern smile. It's a party for me to find my future husband, it would be very strange for him to find out the truth. Or could he have known her already? To make matters worse, that's all the father had to walk on. "Odette, is everything all right?" Asked. Then he noticed Eve, confused for a moment, undoubtedly trying to match Eve to his list of candidates. "Odette, he was really angry. Angry for what? Because I decided to pick a husband without telling me?" If you'll forgive us, Dad," she muttered as Eve was moving forward. what does that mean? "I said with wet teeth." I think that is my question. What does this mean? A party to choose a husband? “We… you… but…” I couldn't say a full sentence. In the end it was the anger building inside me that helped me make all the talk, 'You never said anything!' How will I know? How do I know you made another joke? huh! “I never used my feelings as a joke. She smiled this evening with her first real smile. Odette, "Father's voice went from behind me." Do you care to explain a little? Daddy seemed excited. Dad was the guy I was into. He was talking to me. He said, 'Mrs. Odette, I've never met him in my life.' Seems a bit mean, poor mango. This is…” “Oh, shut up if you don’t want to go bald the next moment!” "I was going to cry." How disgusting and boring,” said Eve. Was it more interesting if he was going to turn into a big fat frog?” “Father saw that he was fainting.” “And yes I am here to kidnap your daughter in the dark temple.” Eve smiled gracefully. Then I fainted. Father.” “Do you have to say something like that?” “Well, isn’t that weird?” I rolled my eyes in response. ------------ Author's note to continue with the conclusion. Hope you enjoy this chapter === ======= I really love XD. Also in this universe - just posted! A demo of Odette's story. Daddy saw that he was passing out. “And yes, I came here to kidnap your daughter in the dark temple.” Eve smiled gracefully. Then the father fainted. “Do you have anything to say?” “Well, isn't that a joke?” I closed my eyes in response. ------------- Author's Note Follow the epilogue. We hope you enjoy this chapter ==========! I really like XD. Also in this universe - just posted! View from Odette's story. We hope you enjoy this chapter ==========! I really like XD. Also in this universe - just posted! View from Odette's story. We hope you enjoy this chapter ==========! I really like XD. Also in this universe - just posted! View from Odette's story. And there is a defeated villain in every story. What happens to the defeated villain? After Lorelei's plot to overthrow the gods fails, her power and voice are stripped away. The mermaid becomes tied to a lake, her enemy (God) protects her. It is a story between a defeated villain and his enemies. Oops! Esta Imageum Nao as Diracris de Contodo by Sego Nosa. The publisher, which is well received, continues to shoot the various rimova-o au carrega uma. Conclusion A girl with dark dark hair and ruby ​​red eyes sat under a huge tree. Snow was falling from the sky, and slowly the fur coat turned white. " If you ask them they will stay.” Where is the Golden Winged Crow sitting on the branch? The girl replied, “I know. If you ask them to stay a few years, they will. Because they love me.” And then why didn’t you?” asked the raven again. “Because this is life. Everything has an end. You live, grow and die. It makes life precious and meaningful.” “I do not die, but I find my life worthy.” With interest.“A laugh erupted from the girl.” No, you don’t. Years ago I lost the meaning of life. If so, why would you comfort a little girl like me now?” “Silence of the girl’s face.” My parents all wanted me to die after living a long and meaningful life. She said: I will respect their wish. The girl put her palm on the tree trunk in front of her. The tree that her parents planted on their wedding day. “Even if I am sad.” Those tears finally flowed down his face. The crow disappeared on the branch a few seconds ago. After a few seconds a head-shape appeared behind Girl.” “I certainly will not comfort you. But when I found out, more than 10 chapters have already been published. And the Reborn Four Times isn't quite as good as the Villainness title now. So... as I mentioned earlier in another writer's comment, I love reincarnation stories. I also love a good villain who realizes his mistakes and turns a good story. But the stories available these days didn't satisfy me, so I decided to write one myself! Here's the inspiration for this story. Thanks again for watching this story. Your comments and support really motivate me to keep writing this story! see you later! If you really like my stories and want to support: https://ko-fi.com/butterfly_effect 1/2/2020-2/5/2020 Also in this universe - published now! View from Odette's story. com/butterfly_effect 1/2/2020-2/5/2020 Also in this world - now posted! View from Odette's story. com/butterfly_effect 1/2/2020-2/5/2020 Also in this world - now posted! View from Odette's story. Oops! Esta Imageum Nao as Diracris de Contodo by Sego Nosa. The publisher, which is well received, continues to shoot the various rimova-o au carrega uma. Each story has a defeated villain. What happens to the defeated villain? After Lorelei's plot to overthrow the gods fails, her power and voice are stripped away. The mermaid became tied to a lake, protected by her enemy (God). It is a story between a defeated villain and his enemies. The mermaid became associated with a lake. It is a story between a defeated villain and his enemies. The mermaid became associated with a lake. It is a story between a defeated villain and his enemies.
